Table Of Contents
UNITED ST ATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
___________________________________________________________________________________________________________
FORM 10-K
☒ ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
FOR THE FISCAL  YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2019  
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
COMMISSION FILE NO. 001-34223
___________________________________________________________________________________________________________
CLEAN HARBORS, INC .
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
___________________________________________________________________________________________________________
 Massachusetts  04-2997780
(State or Other Jurisdiction of Incorporation or Or ganization)  (IRS Employer Identification No.)
 42 Longwater  Drive Norwell MA    02061-9149
 (Address of Principal Executive Of fices)  (Zip Code)
Registrant’ s Telephone Number , Including area code: (781) 792-5000
Securities r egister ed pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934:
Title of each class Trading Symbol  Name of each exchange on which
register ed
Common Stock, $0.01 par value CLH  New York Stock Exchange
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer , as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. Yes ý No ☐ 
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Exchange Act. Yes ☐
 No ý
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934 during the preceding twelve months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports) and (2) has been
subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ý No ☐ 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to
Rule 405 of Regulation S-T  during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit and post such
files). Yes ý No ☐ 
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a lar ge accelerated filer , an accelerated filer , a non-accelerated filer , smaller reporting
company , or an emer ging growth company . See the definitions of “lar ge accelerated filer ,” “accelerated filer ,” “smaller reporting company ,” and
"emer ging growth company" in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act. (Check one):
Large accelerated filer ☒  Accelerated filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer ☐  Smaller reporting company ☐
  Emer ging growth company ☐
If an emer ging growth company , indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying
with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). Yes ☐   No ý
On June 28, 2019 (the last business day of the registrant's most recently completed second fiscal quarter), the aggregate market value of the
voting and non-voting common stock of the registrant held by non-af filiates of the registrant was approximately $3.7 billion , based on the closing
price of such common stock as of that date on the New York Stock Exchange. Reference is made to Part III of this report for the assumptions on
which this calculation is based.
On February 19, 2020 , there were outstanding 55,829,761  shares of Common Stock, $0.01 par value.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORA TED BY  REFERENCE
Certain portions of the registrant's definitive proxy statement for its 2020  annual meeting of stockholders (which will be filed with the
Commission not later than April 22, 2020 ) are incorporated by reference into Part III of this report.
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC.
ANNUAL REPORT ON FORM 10-K
YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2019
TABLE OF CONTENTS
  Page
No
Part I  
Item 1. Business 1
Item 1A. Risk Factors 15
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 22
Item 2. Properties 22
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 24
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 24
Part II  
Item 5. Market for the Registrant's Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of
Equity Securities 25
Item 6. Selected Financial Data 27
Item 7. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 28
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures About Market Risk 43
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 44
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 86
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 86
Item 9B. Other Information 88
Part III  
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 88
Item 11. Executive Compensation 88
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 88
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 88
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 88
Part IV  
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 89
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 89
SIGNATURES 90
Table Of Contents
Disclosure Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
In addition to historical information, this annual report contains forward-looking statements, which are generally identifiable
by use of the words "believes," "expects," "intends," "anticipates," "plans to," "seeks," "should," "estimates," "projects," "may,"
"likely" or similar expressions. Forward-looking statements are neither historical facts nor assurances of future performance. These
forward-looking statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results to differ materially from
those reflected in these forward-looking statements. Factors that might cause such a difference include, but are not limited to, those
discussed in this report under Item 1A, "Risk Factors," and Item 7, "Management's Discussion and Analysis on Financial Condition
and Results of Operations." Readers are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which reflect
management's opinions only as of the date hereof. We undertake no obligation to revise or publicly release the results of any
revision to these forward-looking statements. Readers should also carefully review the risk factors described in other documents
which we file from time to time with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC"), including the quarterly reports on
Form 10-Q to be filed by us during 2020.
PART I
ITEM 1.    BUSINESS
General
Clean Harbors, Inc. and its subsidiaries (collectively, "we," "Clean Harbors" or the "Company") is a leading provider of
environmental, energy and industrial services throughout North America. We are also the largest re-refiner and recycler of used oil
in the world and the largest provider of parts cleaning and related environmental services to commercial, industrial and automotive
customers in North America. One of our primary goals as a company is supporting our customers in finding environmentally
responsible solutions to further their sustainability goals in today's world.
We have two operating segments; (i) the Environmental Services segment and (ii) the Safety-Kleen segment.
•Environmental Services - Environmental Services segment results are predicated upon the demand by our customers for
waste services directly attributable to waste volumes generated by them and project work for which waste handling and/or
disposal is required. In managing the business and evaluating performance, management tracks the volumes and mix of
waste handled and disposed of through our owned incinerators and landfills, as well as utilization of such incinerators,
labor and billable hours and equipment among other key metrics. Levels of activity and ultimate performance associated
with this segment can be impacted by several factors including overall U.S. GDP and U.S. industrial production, weather
conditions, efficiency of our operations, technology, changing regulations, competition, market pricing of our services and
the management of our related operating costs. Environmental Services results are also impacted by the demand for
planned and unplanned industrial related cleaning and maintenance services at customer sites and for environmental
cleanup services on a scheduled or emergency basis, including response to national events such as major chemical spills,
natural disasters or other events where immediate and specialized services are required.
•Safety-Kleen - Safety-Kleen segment results are impacted by an array of core service and product offerings that serve to
attract small quantity waste producers as customers and integrate them into the Clean Harbors waste network. Core service
offerings include parts washer services, containerized waste services, vac services, used motor oil collection and contract
blending and packaging services. Key performance indicators tracked by the Company relative to these services include
the number of parts washer services performed and pricing and volume of used motor oil and waste collected. Results
from these services are primarily driven by the overall number of parts washers placed at customer sites and volumes of
waste collected, as well as the demand for and frequency of other offered services. These factors can be impacted by
overall economic conditions in the marketplace, especially in the automotive related area. In addition to its core service
offerings, Safety-Kleen offers high quality recycled base and blended oil products to end users including fleet customers,
distributors and manufacturers of oil products. Other product offerings include automotive related fluids and shop
supplies. Relative to its oil related products, management tracks the Company's volumes and relative percentages of base
and blended oil sales along with various pricing metrics associated with the commodity driven marketplace. The segment’s
results are significantly impacted by overall market pricing and product mix associated with base and blended oil products
and, more specifically, the market prices of Group II base oils. Costs incurred in connection with the collection of used oil
and other raw materials associated with the segment’s oil related products can also be volatile. Our OilPlus® closed loop
initiative, which results in the sale of our renewable oil products directly to our end customers, may also be impacted by
changes in customer demand for high-quality, environmentally responsible recycled oil.
Clean Harbors, Inc. was incorporated in Massachusetts in 1980 and our principal executive offices are located in Norwell,
Massachusetts. We maintain a website at the following Internet address: http://www.cleanharbors.com. Through a link on this
1
Table Of Contents
website, we provide free access to our annual reports on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K
and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 as
soon as reasonably practicable after electronic filing with the SEC. Our guidelines on corporate governance, the charters for our
board committees and our code of ethics for members of the board of directors, our chief executive officer and our other senior
officers are also available on our website, and we will post on our website any waivers of, or amendments to, such code of ethics.
Our website and the information contained therein or connected thereto are not incorporated by reference into this Form 10-K.
Health and Safety
Health and Safety is our #1 core value. Employees at all levels of our Company share this philosophy and are committed to
ensuring our safety goals are met. Our commitment to health and safety benefits all of our stakeholders to include our employees,
our customers, the community and the environment. In 2019, the continued success of our Safety Starts with Me: Live It 3-6-5
program, which is a key component in our overall safety approach along with our many other programs, enabled us to achieve low
Total Recordable Incident Rate, or "TRIR" and Days Away, Restricted Activity and Transfer Rate, or "DART." For the year ended
December 31, 2019, our Company wide TRIR and DART were 1.05 and 0.61, respectively. For the year ended December 31, 2018,
our Company wide TRIR and DART were 1.08 and 0.63, respectively. As a result of our unrelenting focus on safety, in 2019 the
Company achieved its lowest TRIR and DART rates in history.
In order to protect our employees, continue to lower our incident rates and satisfy our customers' demands to retain the best
service providers with the lowest TRIR and DART rates, we are fully committed to continuously improving our health and safety
performance through ongoing safety initiatives and training as well as technological solutions aimed at keeping all of our 14,400
employees safe. All employees recognize the importance of protecting themselves, their fellow employees, their customers and all
those around them from harm. Our commitment is supported by the Safety Starts with Me: Live It 3-6-5 program, which includes
three Safety philosophies, six Golden Rules of Safety and each employee’s five personal reasons why they choose to be safe at
work, on the road and at home.
Compliance
We regard compliance with applicable environmental regulations as a critical component of our overall operations. We strive
to maintain the highest professional standards in our compliance activities. A detailed compliance program has been developed for
each of our permitted facilities, service centers and other locations under the direction of our compliance staff and based on the
operations specific to each location. The compliance staff is responsible for the facilities' permitting and regulatory compliance,
compliance training, transportation compliance and related record keeping. To ensure the effectiveness of our regulatory
compliance program, our compliance staff monitors daily operational activities. We also have an Environmental Health and Safety
Compliance Internal Audit Program designed to identify any weaknesses or opportunities for improvement in our ongoing
compliance programs. We also perform periodic audits and inspections of the disposal facilities owned by other companies which
we utilize.
Our facilities are frequently inspected and audited by regulatory agencies, as well as by customers. Although our facilities
have been cited on occasion for regulatory violations, we believe that each of our facilities is currently in substantial compliance
with applicable permit requirements.
Strategy
Our strategy is to develop and maintain ongoing relationships with a diversified group of customers that have recurring needs
for our products and services. We seek to expand market awareness of the breadth of our service offerings to current and future
customers through targeted marketing opportunities. We strive to be recognized as the premier supplier of a broad range of value-
added services based upon quality, responsiveness, customer service, information technologies and cost effectiveness.
The principal elements of our business strategy in no particular order are:
•Cross-Sell Across Businesses - We believe the breadth of our service offerings allows us to provide additional services to
existing customers. We believe we can provide industrial and field services to customers that traditionally have only used
our technical services and technical services to customers that use our industrial services or oil and gas field services. At
the same time, we see a variety of cross-selling opportunities between our Environmental Services and Safety-Kleen
segments. Reflecting this strategy, we have been successfully cross-selling the products and services of Safety-Kleen, such
as parts washers, various recycling services, cleaning products, and our OilPlus® products through our closed loop
initiative, to legacy Clean Harbors customers. We believe leveraging our ability to cross-sell across our segments will
drive additional revenue for our Company.
2
Table Of Contents
•Capture Large-Scale Projects - We provide turnkey offsite transportation and landfill or incineration disposal services
for soil and other contaminated materials generated from remediation activities. We also assist remediation contractors and
project managers with support services including groundwater disposal, waste disposal, roll-off container management and
many other related services. We believe this will drive incremental waste volume to our existing facilities, thereby
increasing utilization and enhancing overall profitability.
•Expand Throughput Capacity of Existing Facilities - We operate and have made substantial investments in an extensive
network of hazardous waste management facilities and oil re-refineries, which provide us with significant operating
leverage as volumes increase. In addition, there are opportunities to expand waste handling capacity or waste oil
processing at these facilities by modifying the terms of the existing permits and by adding equipment and new technology.
Through selected permit modifications, we can expand the range of treatment services offered to our customers without
the significant capital investment necessary to acquire or build new waste management facilities.
•Execute Strategic Acquisitions and Divestitures - We actively pursue selective acquisitions with certain services or
market sectors where we believe the acquisitions can enhance and expand our business. We believe that we can expand
existing services through strategic acquisitions in order to generate incremental revenues from existing and new customers
and to obtain greater market share. In order to maximize synergies, we rapidly integrate our acquisitions into our existing
processes. To complement our acquisition strategy, we regularly review and evaluate our existing operations to determine
whether our business model should change through the divestiture of certain businesses. Accordingly, from time to time,
we divest certain non-core businesses and reallocate our resources to businesses that we believe better align with our long-
term strategic direction. For additional information on our acquisitions and divestitures, see "Acquisitions and
Divestitures" below.
•Focus on Cost, Pricing and Productivity Initiatives - We continually seek to increase efficiency and to reduce costs
through enhanced technology, process improvements and strategic expense management. For instance, in 2019, we
successfully undertook site consolidations, greater internalization of maintenance costs, and procurement and supply chain
improvements. Additionally, we seek areas in our business where strategic investments in automation, process
improvements, tools and employees can serve to increase productivity, efficiency and safety compliance.
•Expand Geographic Coverage of Service Offerings - We believe our Environmental Services and Safety-Kleen
segments have a competitive advantage due to their vast network of locations across North America, particularly in areas
where we maintain service locations at or near a treatment, storage and disposal facility ("TSDF"). By opening additional
service locations we believe that we can increase our market share within these segments. We believe this will drive
additional waste into our existing facilities, thereby increasing utilization and enhancing overall profitability. In addition,
our management team continues to assess the competitive landscape in order to identify new business opportunities.
Acquisitions and Divestitures
Acquisitions are an element of our business strategy that involve expansion through the purchase of businesses that
complement our existing Company and create opportunities for profitable growth.
In 2019, we acquired two privately-owned businesses for a combined preliminary purchase price of $25.2 million. One
acquisition expands the environmental services and hazardous materials management services of the Environmental Services
segment while the second complements the Safety-Kleen segment's core service offerings, such as used motor oil collection, parts
washers, oil filter recycling and vacuum services.
In 2018, we acquired the U.S. Industrial Cleaning Business of Veolia Environmental Services North America LLC (the
"Veolia Business") as well as a privately-owned company for a combined purchase price of $151.2 million. The acquisitions
provide significant scale and industrial services capabilities, while increasing the size of our existing U.S. Industrial Services
business. The acquisitions were financed with cash on hand. The Veolia Business is included in our Environmental Services
segment while the privately-owned company has components included in both the Environmental Services and Safety-Kleen
segments.
In 2017, we acquired Lonestar West Inc. ("Lonestar"), a public company headquartered in Alberta, Canada, for CAD $41.8
million ($33.1 million USD at acquisition date), net of cash acquired. The acquisition price included the assumption of
approximately CAD $21.3 million ($16.8 million USD at acquisition date) in outstanding debt, which we subsequently repaid. The
acquisition supports our growth in the daylighting and hydro excavation services markets. In addition to increasing the size of our
hydro vacuum fleet, Lonestar's network of locations provides us with direct access to key geographic markets in both the United
States and Canada. The acquired company is included in our Environmental Services segment.
3
Table Of Contents
For additional information relating to our acquisition activities during 2019, 2018 and 2017, see Note 4, "Business
Combinations," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report.
Other business transactions also include divestitures based on our ongoing review of portfolio assets to determine the extent to
which they are contributing to our objectives and growth strategy.
In 2017, we completed the sale of our Transformer Services business, which was a non-core business previously included
within the Environmental Services segment, for $45.5 million ($43.4 million net of $2.1 million in transactional related costs). For
additional information relating to these divestitures, see Note 5, "Disposition of Businesses," to our consolidated financial
statements included in Item 8 of this report.
Protecting the Environment and Corporate Sustainability
Clean Harbors recognizes that sustainability stewardship is a core aspect of our brand and a key component of our long-term
success. Our core business is to provide industry, government and the public a wide range of sustainable solutions through
environmental, energy and industrial service offerings that protect and restore North America's natural environment. Our
sustainability program expands our commitment beyond the services and products to include our operations, employees and
community. The program focuses on the following key strategies:
Health and Safety
As we have noted above, Health and Safety is our #1 core value and as such is at the forefront of our sustainability program.
Safety is not just the hallmark of our Company but is also at the heart of what we provide to customers. Our programs and
procedures focus on delivering services with unparalleled safety to our employees, our customers, local communities and other key
stakeholders. Our approach to safety extends to our people, equipment and locations, many of which have qualified for Voluntary
Protection Program status under Occupational Safety and Health Administration.
Customer Solutions
Technologies and operational improvements have allowed Clean Harbors to developed initiatives that focus on minimizing
the Company’s and our customers’ impact on the environment. As a leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial
services throughout North America, we help our customers prevent the release of chemicals and hazardous waste streams into the
environment. We also are the leading service provider in the recovery and decontamination of pollutants that have been released.
This includes the safe destruction or disposal of hazardous materials in a manner that ensures these materials are no longer a danger
to the environment. When providing these services, we are committed to the recycling, reuse and reclamation of these waste
streams whenever possible using a variety of methods more fully explained below in the sections describing our general operations.
Many of our branded services exemplify our commitment to sustainability and providing environmental solutions to the
marketplace. Where possible, liquids such as solvents, chemicals and used oil are continuously recycled to our high-quality
standards and made into useful products. Tolling programs provide a closed process in which the customer’s spent solvents are
recycled to their precise specifications and returned directly to them.
Our Safety-Kleen OilPlus® Program, unique to the oil industry, is designed to help companies manage their oil needs in a
more sustainable way. By having us collect used oil and deliver new re-refined oil products, customers are implementing a closed-
loop process for sustainability to the oil industry. We deploy our fleet of trucks, tankers, rail-cars and barges to collect used oil. In
2019 we gathered 235 million gallons of used oil in North America and our state-of-the-art processes enable us to fully realize oils'
remarkable capacity to be recycled, re-refined and reused. Our plants have re-refined more than 3.7 billion gallons of used oil since
their opening, allowing such oils to have a second life as recycled lubricants and avoiding more than 28.7 million metric tons of
greenhouse gases.
Energy Usage
One of the Company’s sustainability goals is to contribute to a cleaner environment by reducing energy usage, specifically
our dependency on fossil fuels. Energy usage at our facilities is the focus of our Facility Energy Conservation program, which
provides ongoing oversight and recommendations to our facilities to help support their electricity management efforts. We continue
to evaluate solar energy as a viable option for our facilities and have built solar arrays at select sites for their ongoing energy needs.
Clean Harbors makes fleet energy management a key focus, beginning with ongoing reviews by our logistics team to reduce
total miles driven. We also evaluate options for reducing fuel costs including routine use of rail transportation, implementation of
alternative fuel vehicles and using our Performance Plus and EcoPower re-refined engine oils throughout our fleet. Clean Harbors
is constantly upgrading our truck fleet with the most fuel-efficient systems and parts and has also
4
Table Of Contents
designed custom, multi-compartment trucks that can be used to collect and deliver oil at the same time, decreasing fuel
consumption.
Operations
Clean Harbors instills sustainability within its operations through continuous improvements and well-defined strategic
initiatives that show the highest positive impact on the environment, the communities and the economy in which we work and live.
Our fleet of transportation vehicles represents one of our largest opportunities to apply environmentally sustainable business
practices. Our Asset Refurbishment Program is a comprehensive effort to rebuild assets to "like new" quality with the goal of
reusing or recycling 100% of all materials. With four asset refurbishment facilities now operational, we are rebuilding an average of
more than two vehicles every week.
To provide an efficient and safe alternative for hazardous waste disposal, Clean Harbors developed and built an incinerator at
our El Dorado facility which uses world-class air emissions control technology that meets the most stringent emissions standards
under the U.S. Clean Air Act.
Engagement
Clean Harbors believes that by staying engaged with our customers, communities and other stakeholders, we can contribute
to the long-term health of the environment, society and the economy. When warranted, we utilize formal reporting platforms to
inform customers and other stakeholders of our sustainability efforts, including EcoVadis and Ecodesk.
We develop partnerships with key environmental programs to build awareness, while fostering more sustainable business
practices. One of our most highly visible public programs for various government and community entities is known as our Home
Hazardous Waste service line. Communities trust us to collect paints, solvents, batteries, fluorescent lamps, pesticides, cleaners and
other hazardous materials during one-day, multi-day and mobile programs that otherwise might be improperly disposed of or
become dangerous to the communities where they are stored.
Our commitment and our business go hand in hand as we work to provide services and products that complement our
customers' sustainability plans and hold ourselves and others accountable to environmental, social and corporate governance
standards.
Competitive Strengths
•Leading Provider of Environmental, Energy and Industrial Services - We are a leading provider of environmental,
energy and industrial services. We own nine commercial hazardous waste incinerators, making us the largest operator of
such facilities in North America. We are also one of the few industrial services companies with national footprints in both
the U.S. and Canada. We provide multi-faceted, high-quality services to a broad mix of customers. We attract and better
serve our customers because of our vast capabilities and breadth of services as well as our overall size, scale and
geographic location of our large network along with valuable and unique assets used in providing our services.
•Integrated Network of Assets - We believe we operate, in the aggregate, the largest number of commercial hazardous
waste incinerators, landfills, treatment facilities and TSDFs in North America. Our broad service network enables us to
effectively handle a waste stream from its origin through disposal and to efficiently direct and internalize our waste
streams to reduce costs. As our processing of waste increases, our size allows us to leverage our network and increase our
profit margins as we can internalize a greater volume of waste in our incinerators, landfills and other disposal facilities.
Furthermore, these assets are very difficult to duplicate because significant permitting and regulatory approvals would
need to take place in order for new commercial waste disposal sites to come on line. High barriers of entry for such assets
provide increased value to our network.
•Comprehensive Service Capabilities - Our comprehensive service offerings allow us to act as a full-service provider to
our customers. Our breadth of service offerings creates incremental revenue growth as customers seek to minimize the
number of outside vendors and demand "one-stop-shop" service providers.
•Largest Collector and Recycler of Used Motor Oil - As the largest re-refiner and recycler of used oil in North America,
during 2019 we returned approximately 191 million gallons of new re-refined oil, lubricants and byproducts back into the
marketplace. In 2019, our re-refining process eliminated more than two million metric tons of greenhouse gas ("GHG"),
which is the equivalent of growing more than 53 million trees for 10 years in an urban environment or taking over 393,000
passenger cars off the road for one year.
•Large and Diversified Customer Base - Our customers range from small companies to Fortune 500 companies and
include public and private entities that span multiple industries and business types, including government entities. This
diversification limits our credit exposure to any one customer and potential cyclicality to any one industry. As a
5
Table Of Contents
percentage of our 2019 revenues, the top ten industries we serviced totaled approximately 78% and included general
manufacturing (16%), chemical (14%), automotive (9%), refineries (8%), base and blended oils (7%), government (6%),
utilities (5%), transportation (5%), oil and gas (4%) and engineering and consulting (4%).
•Stable and Recurring Revenue Base - We have long-standing relationships with our large customers, many of whom
have worked with our Company for decades. Our diversified customer base provides stable and recurring revenues, as a
significant portion of our revenues are derived from previously served customers with recurring needs for our services. In
addition, switching costs for many of our hazardous waste customers are high. This is due to many customers' desire to
audit disposal facilities prior to their qualification as approved sites and to limit the number of facilities to which their
hazardous waste are shipped in order to reduce potential liability under United States and Canadian environmental laws
and regulations. We have been selected as an approved vendor by large and small generators of waste because we possess
comprehensive collection, recycling, treatment, transportation, disposal and hazardous waste tracking capabilities and
have the expertise necessary to comply with applicable environmental laws and regulations. Those customers that have
selected us as an approved vendor typically continue to use our services on a recurring basis.
•Regulatory Compliance - We continue to make capital investments in our facilities to ensure that they are in compliance
with current federal, state, provincial and local regulations. Companies that rely on in-house disposal may find the current
regulatory requirements to be too capital intensive or complicated, and may choose to outsource many of their hazardous
waste disposal needs.
•Effective Cost Management - Our significant scale allows us to maintain low costs through standardized compliance
procedures, significant purchasing power, leveraging our investment in technology and our ability to efficiently utilize
logistics and transportation to economically direct waste streams to the most efficient facility. We also have the ability to
use internal resources to transport and process the substantial majority of all hazardous waste that we manage for our
customers. In addition, our Safety-Kleen results are significantly impacted by the overall market pricing and product mix
associated with base and blended oil products and, more specifically, the market prices of Group II base oils. We charge
fees related to our used oil collection services which allow us to effectively manage the profit spreads inherent in our
business.
•Proven and Experienced Management Team - Our executive management team provides depth and continuity. Our 11
executive officers collectively have over 190 years of experience and expertise in the environmental, energy and industrial
services industries. Our chief executive officer founded our Company in 1980 and, since the Company's formation, has
served as both the Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of the Board.
Operations
General
Seasonality and Cyclical Nature of Business.    Our operations may be affected by seasonal fluctuations due to weather and
budgetary cycles influencing the timing of customers' spending for products and services. Typically during the first and fourth
quarters of each year there is less demand for our products, oil collection, recycling services and environmental services due to the
lower levels of activities by our customers as a result of the cold weather, particularly in Canada and the northern and midwestern
regions of the United States. As a result, reduced volumes of waste are received at our facilities, higher operating costs are realized
due to sub-freezing weather and high levels of snowfall, factory closings for year-end holidays reduce waste volumes and lower
volumes of used oil are generated for our collection.
Geographical Information.    For the year ended December 31, 2019, we generated $2,863.5 million or 83.9% of our direct
revenues in the United States and $548.6 million or 16.1% of our direct revenues in Canada. For the year ended December 31,
2018, we generated $2,721.8 million or 82.5% of our direct revenues in the United States and $578.5 million or 17.5% of our direct
revenues in Canada. For additional information about the geographical areas from which our direct revenues are derived and in
which our assets are located, see Note 3, "Revenues," and Note 20, "Segment Reporting," respectively, to our consolidated financial
statements included in Item 8 of this report.
Environmental Services
We collect, transport, treat and dispose of hazardous and non-hazardous waste, including resource recovery, physical
treatment, fuel blending, incineration, landfill disposal, wastewater treatment, lab chemical disposal, explosives management and
CleanPack® services. Our CleanPack® services include the collection, identification, categorization, specialized packaging,
transportation and disposal of laboratory chemicals and household hazardous waste. We also perform a wide range of industrial
maintenance and specialty industrial services and utilize specialty equipment and resources to perform field services at any chosen
location on a planned or emergency response basis. All of these services are designed to protect the environment and
6
Table Of Contents
address environmental related challenges through the use of innovation and the latest technologies. We provide customers with
sustainable solutions that seek to recycle waste materials whenever possible.
Technical Services.    We provide technical services through a network of service centers from which a fleet of vehicles are
dispatched to pick up customers' waste either on a predetermined schedule or on demand, and to deliver the waste to permitted
facilities, which are usually Company-owned. Our service centers can also dispatch chemists to a customer location for collection
of chemical and laboratory waste for disposal. InSite Service® offerings is a branded on-site/in-plant service delivery program
through which we offer a full range of environmental, industrial and waste management services. This signature program is built on
safety, quality, efficiency and integrity, and has been offered by Clean Harbors for more than 25 years. By leveraging Clean
Harbors' expertise and capabilities, our on-site staffs are dedicated to developing the safest, most cost-effective and sustainable
solutions to service customers’ needs.
Collection, Transportation and Logistics Management.    As an integral part of our services, we collect industrial waste from
customers and transport such waste to and between our facilities for treatment or bulking for shipment to final disposal locations.
Customers typically accumulate waste in containers, such as 55-gallon drums, bulk storage tanks or 20-cubic-yard roll-off
containers. In providing this service, we utilize a variety of specially designed and constructed tank trucks and semi-trailers as well
as third-party transporters, including railroads.
Treatment and Disposal.    We recycle, treat and dispose of hazardous and non-hazardous industrial waste. The waste handled
includes substances which are classified as "hazardous" because of their corrosive, ignitable, infectious, reactive or toxic properties,
and other substances subject to federal, state and provincial environmental regulation. We provide final treatment and disposal
services designed to manage waste which cannot be otherwise economically recycled or reused. The waste that we handle comes in
solid, sludge, liquid and gas form.
We operate a network of TSDFs that collect, temporarily store and/or consolidate compatible waste streams for more efficient
transportation to final recycling, treatment or disposal destinations. These facilities hold special permits, such as Part B permits
under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act ("RCRA") in the United States, which allow them to process, transfer and
dispose of waste through various technologies including recycling, incineration, landfill and wastewater treatment depending on
each location's permitted and constructed capabilities.
Resource Recovery and Fuel Blending.    We operate recycling systems for the reclamation and reuse of certain waste,
particularly solvent-based waste generated by industrial cleaning operations, metal finishing and other manufacturing processes.
Resource recovery involves the treatment of waste using various methods, which effectively remove contaminants from the original
material to restore its fitness for its intended purpose and to reduce the volume of waste requiring disposal.
We also operate a recycling facility that recycles refinery waste and spent catalyst. The recycled oil and catalysts, depending
on market conditions, are sold to third parties.
Incineration.    Incineration is the preferred method for the treatment of organic hazardous waste because it effectively
destroys the contaminants at high temperatures. High temperature incineration effectively eliminates organic waste such as
herbicides, halogenated solvents, pesticides and pharmaceutical and refinery waste, regardless of form as gas, liquid, sludge or
solid. Federal and state incineration regulations require a destruction and removal efficiency of 99.99% for most organic waste.
As of December 31, 2019, we had nine active incinerators operating in five incinerator facilities that offer a wide range of
technological capabilities to customers. In the United States, we operate a fluidized bed thermal oxidation unit for maximum
destruction efficiency of hazardous waste with an estimated annual practical capacity of 58,808 tons and three solids and liquids
capable incinerator facilities with a combined estimated annual practical capacity of 377,387 tons. We also operate one hazardous
waste liquid injection incinerator in Canada with total annual practical capacity of 125,526 tons.
Our incinerator facilities in Kimball, Nebraska; Deer Park, Texas; El Dorado, Arkansas; and Aragonite, Utah, are designed to
process liquid organic waste, sludge, solids, soil and debris. Our Deer Park facility has two kilns and a rotary reactor. Our El
Dorado facility specializes in the treatment of bulk and containerized hazardous liquids, solids and sludge. In 2017, we opened a
new hazardous waste incinerator at our El Dorado, Arkansas facility, which specializes in high-temperature incineration of
regulated waste such as industrial and laboratory chemicals, manufacturing byproducts, fertilizers and other solid and liquid
materials that would otherwise be hazardous to the environment and public health if not properly managed. Our facilities in
Kimball and Deer Park also have on-site landfills for the disposal of ash produced as a result of the incineration process.
Our incinerator facility in Lambton, Ontario, is a liquid injection incinerator designed primarily for the destruction of liquid
organic waste. Typical waste streams include wastewater with low levels of organics and other higher concentration organic liquid
waste not amenable to conventional physical or chemical waste treatment.
7
Table Of Contents
Landfills.    Landfills are primarily used for disposal of inorganic waste. In the United States and Canada, we operate nine
commercial landfills. Seven of our commercial landfills are designed and permitted for disposal of hazardous waste and two of our
landfills are operated for non-hazardous industrial waste disposal and, to a lesser extent, municipal solid waste. In addition to our
commercial landfills, we also own and operate, as described above, two non-commercial landfills that only accept waste from our
on-site incinerators.
Of our seven commercial landfills used for disposal of hazardous waste, five are located in the United States and two are
located in Canada. As of December 31, 2019, the useful economic lives of these landfills included approximately 24.6 million cubic
yards of remaining capacity. We estimate the useful economic lives of landfills to include permitted airspace and unpermitted
airspace that our management believes to be probable of being permitted based on our analysis of various factors. In addition to the
capacity included in the useful economic lives of these landfills, there are approximately 31.9 million cubic yards of additional
unpermitted airspace capacity included in the footprints of these landfills that may ultimately be permitted, although there can be no
assurance that this additional capacity will be permitted. As of December 31, 2019, the useful economic lives of our two non-
hazardous industrial landfills have 3.6 million cubic yards of remaining permitted capacity. These two facilities are located in the
United States and have been issued operating permits under Subtitle D of RCRA. Our non-hazardous landfill facilities are
permitted to accept commercial industrial waste, including waste from foundries, demolition and construction, machine shops,
automobile manufacturing, printing, metal fabrications and recycling.
Wastewater Treatment.    We operate nine wastewater treatment facilities that offer or employ a range of wastewater treatment
technologies. These wastewater treatment operations involve processing hazardous and non-hazardous waste through use of
physical and chemical treatment methods. These facilities treat a broad range of industrial liquid and semi-liquid waste containing
heavy metals, organics and suspended solids.
Total Project Management.    We also provide total project management services in areas such as chemical packing, on-site
waste management, remediation, compliance training and emergency spill response, while leveraging Clean Harbors' network of
service centers and environmental capabilities.
Industrial Services.    We perform industrial maintenance services and specialty industrial services at refineries, mines,
upgraders, chemical plants, pulp and paper mills, manufacturing and power generation facilities. We provide these services
throughout North America.
Our crews handle as-needed in-plant services to support ongoing in-plant cleaning and maintenance services, including
liquid/dry vacuum, hydro-blasting, dewatering and materials processing, water and chemical hauling and steam cleaning. We
provide a variety of specialized industrial services including plant outage and turnaround services, decoking and pigging, chemical
cleaning, high and ultra-high pressure water cleaning, pipeline inspection and coating services and large tank and surface
impoundment cleaning. We also provide daylighting services which, through the use of specialized hydro vac equipment, deliver
safer, cleaner and more precise hydro excavation services to safely uncover highly sensitive underground targets. Our crews also
handle oilfield transport and production services supporting drilling, production and completion programs.
Field and Emergency Response Services.    Our crews and equipment are dispatched on a planned or emergency basis and
perform services such as confined space entry for tank cleaning, site decontamination, large remediation projects, demolition, spill
cleanup on land and water, railcar cleaning, product recovery and transfer, scarifying and media blasting and vacuum services.
Additional services include filtration and water treatment services.
We are also a leader in providing response services for environmental emergencies of any scale from man-made disasters
such as oil spills and natural disasters such as hurricanes.
Oil and Gas Field Services.    We provide integrated seismic and right-of-way services for efficient resource discovery and
site preparation. These services include: (i) seismic surveying that minimizes costs, environmental impact and time in field; (ii)
mulching/line clearing that expedites additional geophysical activities and minimizes environmental impact; and (iii) shot-hole
drilling that provides safe and efficient operations in every terrain, including hostile and inaccessible regions. We also provide
surface rentals services by supporting oil and gas companies' drilling and well completion programs. Key to our services is our
ability to provide solids control to support the drilling process. Our technologies help manage liquids, solids and semi-solid
material during the drilling operation, and include centrifuges, tanks and drilling fluid recovery. We also can provide container
rentals for safe collection of drill cuttings and other waste, as well as manage disposal of drilling fluids and solids and can supply
surface rental equipment to support drill sites by providing wellsite trailers, wastewater treatment systems and holding tanks, light
towers, generators and handling tools.
Lodging Services.    Our fixed lodges provide turnkey remote accommodations throughout Western Canada and Texas and
range in size up to approximately 600 beds. These are open lodges, with amenities that include catering and housekeeping services,
fully equipped common areas, fitness rooms and computer rooms, wireless internet and public phones, powered
8
Table Of Contents
parking stalls, laundry facilities and daily towel service. We also offer mobile camp operations, which provide services for remote
workforce accommodation facilities throughout Western Canada, currently in British Columbia, Saskatchewan and Alberta, with
multiple accommodation types. These include client and open camps, operator camps and drill camps. Furthermore, hospitality
services are available as a standalone service to clients which have other accommodation arrangements.
Safety-Kleen
Our Safety-Kleen business offers an array of environmental services and complementary products to a diverse range of
customers including automobile repair shops, car and truck dealers, metal fabricators, machine manufacturers, fleet maintenance
shops and other automotive, industrial and retail customers.
As the largest provider of parts cleaning services in North America, Safety-Kleen offers a complete line of specially designed
parts washers to customer locations and then delivers recurring service that includes machine cleaning and maintenance and
disposal and replacement of clean solvent or aqueous fluids. We also sell automotive and industrial cleaning products which include
antifreeze, windshield washer fluid, degreasers, glass and floor cleaners, hand cleaners, absorbents, mats and spill kits.
Utilizing our collection network, we provide pickup and transportation of hazardous and non-hazardous containerized waste
for recycling or disposal, primarily through the Clean Harbors network of recycling, treatment and disposal facilities. We also
collect used oil which serves as feedstock for our oil re-refineries discussed below, or process the oil into recycled fuel oil, or
“RFO,” which is then sold to customers such as asphalt plants, industrial plants, pulp and paper companies. The used oil is also
processed into vacuum gas oil which can be further re-refined into lubricant base oils or sold directly into the marine diesel oil fuel
market.
Our vacuum services remove solids, residual oily water and sludge and other fluids from customers' oil/water separators,
sumps and collection tanks. We also remove and collect waste fluids found at large and small industrial locations, including metal
fabricators, auto maintenance providers and general manufacturers.
Utilizing used oil collected by Safety-Kleen branches, we manufacture, formulate, package, distribute and market high-
quality lubricants. We offer these products and services direct to business end-users and customers that can in turn market to
retailers and end-users. The used oil collected by Safety-Kleen's branch network is processed or re-refined to convert into a variety
of products, mostly base lubricating oils, and much smaller quantities of asphalt-like material, glycols and fuels. As the largest re-
refiner of used oil in North America, we can process the used oil collected through our six re-refineries located in East Chicago,
Indiana; Newark, California; Wichita, Kansas; Tacoma, Washington; Fallon, Nevada; and Breslau, Ontario.
Our primary goal is to produce and sell high-quality blended oils, which are created by combining our re-refined base and
other base oils with performance additives in accordance with our proprietary formulations and American Petroleum Institute
licenses. Our Performance Plus® brand and “green” proprietary brand EcoPower® are sold to on- and off-road corporate fleets,
government entities, automotive service shops and industrial plants, which are serviced through our internal distribution network,
as well as an extensive United States and Canada-wide independent distributor network. We also sell unbranded blended oils to
distributors that resell them under their private label brands. Our OilPlus® program consists of selling our renewable oil products
directly to our end customers. We sell the base oil that we do not blend and sell ourselves to independent blenders/packagers that
use it to blend their own branded or private label oils. With more than 200 million gallons of used oil processed annually, we were
able to return approximately 191 million gallons of new re-refined oil, lubricants and byproducts back into the marketplace in 2019.
We believe our position as the largest collector and re-refiner of used oil in North America, along with our vast service and
distributions network, provide a distinct competitive advantage in our ability to provide our customers with collection and oil
distribution services through our OilPlus® closed loop program.
Competition
The hazardous waste management industry is highly competitive. The sources of competition vary by locality and by type of
service rendered, with competition coming from national and regional waste services companies and hundreds of privately-owned
firms. Veolia North America, Waste Management, Inc., US Ecology, Inc. and Stericycle, Inc. are the principal national firms with
which we compete. Each of these competitors is able to provide one or more of the environmental services we offer.
Under federal and state environmental laws in the United States, generators of hazardous waste remain liable for improper
disposal of such waste. Although generators may hire various companies that have the proper permits and licenses, because of the
generators' potential liability, they are very interested in the reputation and financial strength of the companies they use for the
management of their hazardous waste. We believe that our technical proficiency, safety record, customer service oriented culture
and overall reputation are important considerations to our customers in selecting and continuing to
9
Table Of Contents
utilize our services. We also believe that the depth of our recycling, treatment and disposal capabilities, our ability to collect and
transport waste products efficiently and our pricing are additional significant factors in the market for treatment and disposal
services.
Competition within our Environmental Services segment varies by locality and type of service rendered.
•For our landfill and waste services, competitors include several major national and regional environmental services
firms, as well as numerous smaller local firms. We believe the availability of skilled technical professional personnel,
quality of performance, diversity of services, safety record, quality of assets and use of current technologies, as well
as price, are the key competitive factors in this service industry.
•For our industrial, field and emergency responses services, competitors vary by locality and by type of service
rendered, with competition coming from national and regional service providers and hundreds of privately-owned
firms that offer energy or industrial services. Envirosystems and Hydrochem PSC in the United States, and CEDA
International Corporation and Newalta in Canada, are the principal national firms with which we compete. Each of
these competitors is able to provide one or more of the industrial and field services we offer. We believe the
availability of specialized equipment and latest technologies, skilled technical professional personnel, quality of
performance, diversity of services, safety record and price are the key competitive factors in this industry.
•For our energy related services, competitors vary by locality and type of services provided, with competition coming
from national, regional and local service providers. Competition is based on a number of factors, including safety,
quality, performance, reliability, service, price, response time and, in some cases, breadth of service offering.
For our Safety-Kleen segment, competitors vary by locality and by type of service rendered, with competition coming from
Heritage-Crystal Clean and Veolia North America, along with several regional and local firms. With our Safety-Kleen Oil Plus®
closed loop offering, we are competing in certain markets with other North American lubricant distributors.
The principal methods of competition for all of our services and products are quality, price, reliability of service rendered or
products sold and technical proficiency. We believe that we offer a more comprehensive range of environmental, energy and
industrial services than our competitors in major portions of the United States and Canada.
Employees
As of December 31, 2019, we employed approximately 14,400 active full-time employees, of which 988 in the United States
and 676 in Canada were represented by labor unions. We believe that our relationship with our employees is positive. As part of our
commitment to employee safety and quality customer service, we have an extensive compliance program and trained
environmental, health and safety staff. We adhere to a risk management program designed to reduce potential liabilities to us and to
our customers. We also continually strive to invest in our employees through training programs as well as competitive
compensation and benefit programs.
Intellectual Property
We have invested significantly in the development of proprietary technology and also to establish and maintain an extensive
knowledge of leading technologies. We incorporate these technologies into the services we offer and provide to our customers. As
of December 31, 2019, we held a total of 35 U.S. and 12 foreign issued or granted patents (which will expire between 2020 and
2031), one U.S. and one foreign pending patent application, 93 U.S. and 53 foreign trademark registrations and one U.S. and eight
foreign pending trademark applications. We also license software and other intellectual property from various third parties. We
enter into confidentiality agreements with certain of our employees, consultants and corporate partners, and control access to
software documentation and other proprietary information. We believe that we hold adequate rights to all intellectual property used
in our business and that we do not infringe upon any intellectual property rights held by other parties.
Management of Risks
We adhere to a program of risk management policies and practices designed to reduce potential liability, as well as to manage
customers' ongoing environmental exposures. This program includes installation of risk management systems at our facilities, such
as fire suppression, employee training, environmental consciousness, auditing and policy decisions restricting the types of waste
handled. We evaluate all revenue opportunities and decline those that we believe involve unacceptable risks.
We dispose of waste at our incinerator, wastewater treatment and landfill facilities, or at facilities owned and operated by
other firms that we have audited and approved. We apply established technologies to treatment, storage and recovery of
10
Table Of Contents
hazardous waste. We believe our operations are conducted in a safe and prudent manner and in substantial compliance with
applicable laws and regulations.
Insurance and Financial Assurance
Our insurance programs cover the potential risks associated with our multifaceted operations from two primary exposures:
direct physical damage and third-party liability. We maintain a casualty insurance program providing coverage for vehicles,
employer's liability and commercial general liability in the aggregate amount of $105.0 million, $102.0 million and $102.0 million,
respectively, per year, subject to retentions of $2.0 million per occurrence for auto and commercial general liability and $1.0
million for employers' liability in the United States and $2.0 million in Canada. We also have workers' compensation insurance
whose limits are established by state statutes.
We have pollution liability insurance policies covering potential risks in three areas: as a contractor performing services at
customer sites, as a transporter of waste and as a processor of waste at our facilities. The contractor's pollution liability insurance
has limits of $20.0 million per occurrence and $25.0 million in the aggregate, covering offsite remedial activities and associated
liabilities.
For sudden and accidental in-transit pollution liability, our auto liability policy provides the primary $5.0 million per
occurrence of transportation pollution insurance. Our pollution liability policies provide an additional $75.0 million per occurrence
and $80.0 million in the aggregate for a total of $80.0 million per occurrence and $85.0 million in the aggregate, respectively. A
$2.0 million deductible per occurrence applies to this coverage in the United States and Canada.
Federal and state regulations require liability insurance coverage for all facilities that treat, store or dispose of hazardous
waste. RCRA, the Toxic Substances Control Act and comparable state hazardous waste regulations typically require hazardous
waste handling facilities to maintain pollution liability insurance in the amount of $1.0 million per occurrence and $2.0 million in
the aggregate for sudden occurrences and $3.0 million per occurrence and $6.0 million in the aggregate for non-sudden
occurrences. Our liability insurance coverage meets or exceeds all federal and state regulations.
Our international operations are insured under locally placed insurance policies that are compulsory in a specific country. In
addition, we have a global foreign liability policy that will provide excess and difference in condition coverage in international
countries.
Under our insurance programs, coverage is obtained for catastrophic exposures, cyber security as well as those risks required
to be insured by law or contract. It is our policy to retain a significant portion of certain expected losses related primarily to
employee benefit, workers' compensation, commercial general and vehicle liability. Provisions for losses expected under these
programs are recorded based upon our estimates of the actuarially determined value of the aggregate liability for claims. We believe
that policy cancellation terms are similar to those of companies in other industries.
Operators of hazardous waste handling and certain other permitted facilities are required by federal, state, provincial and
local regulations to provide financial assurance for closure and post-closure care of those facilities should the facilities cease
operation. Closure would include the cost of removing the waste stored at a facility which ceased operating and sending the
material to another facility for disposal and the cost of performing certain procedures for decontamination of the facility. As of
December 31, 2019, our total estimated closure and post-closure costs requiring financial assurance by regulators were $472.7
million for our U.S. facilities and $56.8 million for our Canadian facilities. We have obtained all of the required financial assurance
for our facilities through a combination of surety bonds, funded trusts, letters of credit and insurance from qualified insurance
companies.
Environmental Regulation
While our business has benefited substantially from increased government regulation of hazardous waste transportation,
storage and disposal, the environmental services industry itself is the subject of extensive and evolving regulation by federal, state,
provincial and local authorities. We are required to obtain federal, state, provincial and local permits or approvals for each of our
hazardous waste facilities. Such permits are difficult to obtain and, in many instances, extensive studies, tests and public hearings
are required before the approvals can be issued. We have acquired all operating permits and approvals now required for the current
operation of our business, or have applied for, or are in the process of applying for, all permits and approvals needed in connection
with continued operation and planned expansion or modifications of our operations.
We make a continuing effort to anticipate regulatory, political and legal developments that might affect operations, but are not
always able to do so. We cannot predict the extent to which any environmental legislation or regulation that may be enacted or
enforced in the future may affect our operations.
A new regulation primarily impacting the shipping business but which we are monitoring closely as it could impact our
business is known as “IMO 2020”. On January 1, 2020, the International Maritime Organization (the "IMO") implemented a
11
Table Of Contents
new regulation for a 0.50% global sulphur cap for marine fuels. Under the new global cap, ships that traverse the oceans will be
required to use marine fuels with a sulphur content of no more than 0.50% sulphur, versus the previous cap of 3.50%, in an effort to
reduce the amount of sulphur oxide and decrease pollution and greenhouse gas emissions from the global shipping fleet, which now
uses an estimated 3.5 to 4 million barrels per day of fuel oil. The shipping industry is the last major transportation sector to utilize
fuel with high levels of sulfur, which is the reason the IMO pushed the industry to more closely align with other transport sectors
for pollution reduction.
There are several variables around this regulatory change whereby the impacts of such changes are not yet clear, including
anticipated levels of compliance and enforcement. However, it is expected that the implementation of IMO 2020 will result in a
significant increase in demand for a broad range of low sulfur distillates including diesel, marine gas oil, marine diesel oil and
vacuum gas oil ("VGO") among others. There is uncertainty about the global refinery industry’s ability to meet that spike in
demand, which could have substantial consequences for the pricing of those products, particularly VGO. The price of VGO
typically has a direct impact on the pricing and/or levels of production of base oil. Changes in the marine fuel market as a result of
IMO 2020 are also expected to affect the availability of used motor oil, which today is frequently used in the marine market and
some of which may be displaced as a result of this new regulation.
United States Hazardous Waste Regulation
Federal Regulations.    The most significant federal environmental laws affecting us are the RCRA, the Comprehensive
Environmental Response, Compensation and Liability Act, also known as the "Superfund Act," the Clean Air Act, the Clean Water
Act and the Toxic Substances Control Act ("TSCA").
RCRA.    RCRA is the principal federal statute governing hazardous waste generation, treatment, transportation, storage and
disposal. Pursuant to RCRA, the Environmental Protection Agency ("EPA") has established a comprehensive "cradle-to-grave"
system for the management of a wide range of materials identified as hazardous waste. States that have adopted hazardous waste
management programs with standards at least as stringent as those promulgated by the EPA have been delegated authority by the
EPA to administer their facility permitting programs in lieu of the EPA's program.
Every facility that treats, stores or disposes of hazardous waste must obtain a RCRA permit from the EPA or an authorized
state agency unless a specific exemption exists, and must comply with certain operating requirements ("Part B" permitting process).
RCRA also requires that Part B permits contain provisions for required on-site study and cleanup activities, known as "corrective
action," including detailed compliance schedules and provisions for assurance of financial responsibility. See Note 10, "Closure and
Post-Closure Liabilities," and Note 11, "Remedial Liabilities," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this
report for a discussion of our environmental liabilities. See "Insurance and Financial Assurance" above for a discussion of our
financial assurance requirements.
The Superfund Act.    The Superfund Act is the primary federal statute regulating the cleanup of inactive hazardous substance
sites and imposing liability for cleanup on the responsible parties. It provides for immediate EPA coordinated response and removal
actions for hazardous substances released into the environment. It also authorizes the government to respond to the release or
threatened release of hazardous substances or to order responsible persons to perform any necessary cleanup. The statute provides
for strict and, in certain cases, joint and several liability to the parties involved in the generation, transportation and disposal of
hazardous substances for the cost of these responses and related costs, and for the cost of damages to natural resources. Under the
statute, we may be deemed liable as a generator or transporter of a hazardous substance which is released into the environment, or
as the owner or operator of a facility from which there is a release of a hazardous substance into the environment. See Note 18,
"Commitments and Contingencies," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report for a description of
the principal such proceedings in which we are now involved.
The Clean Air Act.    The Clean Air Act was passed by Congress to control the emissions of pollutants into the air and
requires permits to be obtained for certain sources of hazardous air pollutants, such as vinyl chloride or air criteria pollutants, such
as carbon monoxide. In 1990, Congress amended the Clean Air Act to require further reductions of air pollutants with specific
targets for non-attainment areas in order to meet certain ambient air quality standards. These amendments also require the EPA to
promulgate regulations which (i) control emissions of 187 hazardous air pollutants; (ii) create uniform operating permits for major
industrial facilities similar to RCRA operating permits; (iii) mandate the phase-out of ozone depleting chemicals; and (iv) provide
for enhanced enforcement.
The Clean Water Act.    This legislation prohibits discharge of pollutants into the waters of the United States without
government authorization and regulates the discharge of pollutants into surface waters and sewers from a variety of sources,
including disposal sites and treatment facilities. The EPA has promulgated "pretreatment" regulations under the Clean Water Act,
which establish pretreatment standards for introduction of pollutants into publicly owned treatment works. In the course of the
treatment process, our wastewater treatment facilities generate wastewater, which we discharge to publicly owned treatment
12
Table Of Contents
works pursuant to permits issued by the appropriate government authorities. We are required to obtain discharge permits and
conduct sampling and monitoring programs.
TSCA.    We operate a network of collection, treatment and field services (remediation) facilities throughout North America
whose activities are regulated under provisions of TSCA. TSCA established a national program for the management of substances
classified as polychlorinated biphenyls ("PCBs") which include waste PCBs as well as RCRA waste contaminated with PCBs. The
rules set minimum design and operating requirements for storage, treatment and disposal of PCB waste. Since their initial
publication, the rules have been modified to enhance the management standards for TSCA-regulated operations including the
decommissioning of PCB transformers and articles, detoxification of transformer oils, incineration of PCB liquids and solids
landfill disposal of PCB solids, and remediation of PCB contamination at customer sites.
Other Federal Regulations.    In addition to regulations specifically directed at our transportation, storage and disposal
facilities, there are a number of regulations that may "pass-through" to the facilities based on the acceptance of regulated waste
from affected customer facilities. Each facility that accepts affected waste must comply with the regulations for that waste, facility
or industry. Examples of this type of regulation are National Emission Standards for Benzene Waste Operations and National
Emissions Standards for Pharmaceuticals Production. Each of our facilities addresses these regulations on a case-by-case basis
determined by its requirement to comply with the pass-through regulations.
In our transportation operations, we are regulated by the U.S. Department of Transportation, the Federal Railroad
Administration, the Federal Aviation Administration and the U.S. Coast Guard, as well as by the regulatory agencies of each state in
which we operate or through which our vehicles pass.
Health and safety standards under the Occupational Safety and Health Act ("OSHA") are also applicable to all of our
operations.
State and Local Regulations. Pursuant to the EPA's authorization of RCRA equivalent state run programs, a number of U.S.
states have regulatory programs governing the operations and permitting of hazardous waste facilities. Accordingly, the hazardous
waste treatment, storage and disposal activities of a number of our facilities are regulated by the relevant state agencies in addition
to federal EPA regulation.
Some states classify as hazardous some waste that are not regulated under RCRA. For example, Massachusetts considers
waste oil as "hazardous waste" while RCRA does not. Accordingly, we must comply with state requirements for handling state
regulated waste, and, when necessary, obtain state licenses for treating, storing and disposing of such waste at our facilities.
Our facilities are also regulated pursuant to state statutes, including those addressing clean water and clean air. Local sewer
discharge and flammable storage requirements are applicable to certain of our facilities. Our facilities are also subject to local
siting, zoning and land use restrictions. We believe that each of our facilities is in substantial compliance with the applicable
requirements of federal and state licenses which we have obtained. Once issued, such licenses have maximum fixed terms of a
given number of years, which differ from state to state, ranging from three to ten years. The issuing state agency may review or
modify a license at any time during its term. We anticipate that once a license is issued with respect to a facility, the license will be
renewed at the end of its term if the facility's operations are in compliance with applicable requirements. However, there can be no
assurance that regulations governing future licensing will remain static, or that we will be able to comply with such requirements.
Canadian Hazardous Waste Regulation
In Canada, the provinces retain control over environmental issues within their boundaries and thus have the primary
responsibility for regulating management of hazardous waste. The federal government regulates issues of national scope or where
activities cross provincial boundaries.
Provincial Regulations.    Most of Canada's industrial development and the major part of its population are located in four
provinces: Ontario, Quebec, Alberta and British Columbia, each of which have detailed environmental regulations. We operate
major waste management facilities in each of these provinces, as well as waste transfer facilities in Nova Scotia and Manitoba.
The main provincial acts dealing with hazardous waste management are:
•Ontario—Environmental Protection Act;
•Quebec—Environmental Quality Act;
•Alberta—Environmental Protection and Enhancement Act; and
•British Columbia—Waste Management Act.
13
Table Of Contents
These pieces of legislation were developed by the provinces independently and, among other things, generally control the
generation, characterization, transport, treatment and disposal of hazardous waste. Regulations developed by the provinces under
the relevant legislation are also developed independently, but are often quite similar in effect and sometimes in application. For
example, there is some uniformity in manifest document design and utilization.
Provincial legislation also provides for the establishment of waste management facilities. In this case, the facilities are also
controlled by provincial statutes and regulations governing emissions to air, groundwater and surface water and prescribing design
criteria and operational guidelines.
Waste transporters require a permit to operate under provincial waste management regulations and are subject to the
requirements of the Federal Transportation of Dangerous Goods Act, as discussed below. They are required to report the quantities
and disposition of materials shipped.
Canadian Federal Regulations.    The Canadian federal government has authority for those matters which are national in
scope and in impact and for Canada's relations with other nations. The main federal laws governing hazardous waste management
are:
•Canadian Environmental Protection Act (1999) ("CEPA 99"), and
•Transportation of Dangerous Goods Act.
Environment Canada is the federal agency with responsibility for environmental matters and the main legislative instrument
is the CEPA 99. This act charges Environment Canada and Health Canada, the Federal agency responsible for the health of
individuals, with protection of human health and the environment and seeks to control the production, importation and use of
substances in Canada and to control their impact on the environment.
The Export and Import of Hazardous waste Regulations under CEPA 99 control the export and import of hazardous waste and
hazardous recyclable materials. By reference, these regulations incorporate the Transportation of Dangerous Goods Act and
Regulations, which address identification, packaging, marking and documentation of hazardous materials during transport. CEPA
99 requires that anyone proposing to export or import hazardous waste or hazardous recyclable materials or to transport them
through Canada, must notify the Minister of the Environment and obtain a permit to do so. Section 9 of CEPA 99 allows the federal
government to enter into administrative agreements with the provinces and territories for the development and improvement of
environmental standards. These agreements represent cooperation towards a common goal rather than a delegation of authority
under CEPA 99. To facilitate the development of provincial and territorial agreements, the federal, provincial and territorial
governments participate in the Canadian Council of Ministers of the Environment ("CCME"). The CCME comprises the 14
environment ministers from the federal, provincial and territorial governments, who normally meet at least once a year to discuss
national environmental priorities and to determine work to be carried out under the auspices of the CCME.
Canadian Local and Municipal Regulations.    Local and municipal regulations seldom reference direct control of hazardous
waste management activities. Municipal regulations and by-laws, however, control such issues as land use designation, access to
municipal services and use of emergency services, all of which can have a significant impact on facility operation.
Compliance with Environmental Regulations
The environmental regulations discussed above require that we remediate contaminated sites, operate our facilities in
accordance with enacted regulations, obtain required financial assurance for closure and post-closure care of our facilities should
such facilities cease operations and make capital investments in order to keep our facilities in compliance with environmental
regulations.
As further discussed in Note 10, "Closure and Post-Closure Liabilities," and Note 11, "Remedial Liabilities," to our
consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report, we have accrued environmental liabilities as of December 31,
2019, of $189.8 million. For the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, we spent $18.7 million and $10.1 million, respectively,
to address environmental liabilities.
As discussed more fully above under the heading "Insurance and Financial Assurance," we are required to provide financial
assurance with respect to certain statutorily required closure, post-closure and corrective action obligations at our facilities. We
have placed the required financial assurance primarily through qualified insurance companies.
As described in Note 18, "Commitments and Contingencies," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of
this report, we are involved in legal proceedings arising under environmental laws and regulations. Alleged failure to comply with
laws and regulations may lead to the imposition of fines or the denial, revocation or delay of the renewal of permits and
14
Table Of Contents
licenses by government entities. In addition, such government entities, as well as surrounding landowners, may claim that we are
liable for environmental damages. Citizens groups have become increasingly active in challenging the grant or renewal of permits
and licenses for hazardous waste facilities, and responding to such challenges has further increased the costs associated with
establishing new facilities or expanding current facilities. A significant judgment against us, the loss of a significant permit or
license or the imposition of a significant fine could have a material effect on our business and future prospects.
ITEM 1A.    RISK FACTORS
An investment in our securities involves certain risks, including those described below. You should consider carefully these
risk factors together with all of the information included in or incorporated by reference in this report before investing in our
securities.
Risks Affecting All of Our Businesses
Our businesses are subject to operational and safety risks.
Provision of environmental, energy and industrial services to our customers by both of our business segments involves risks
such as equipment defects, malfunctions and failures and natural disasters, which could potentially result in releases of hazardous
materials, damage to or total loss of our property or assets, injury or death of our employees or a need to shut down or reduce
operation of our facilities while remedial actions are undertaken. Our employees often work under potentially hazardous conditions.
These risks expose us to potential liability for pollution and other environmental damages, personal injury, loss of life, business
interruption and property damage or destruction. We must also maintain a solid safety record in order to remain a preferred supplier
to our major customers. While we seek to minimize our exposure to such risks primarily through (i) comprehensive training
programs, (ii) our Environmental Health and Safety Compliance Internal Audit Program, (iii) vehicle and equipment maintenance
programs and (iv) insurance, such programs and insurance may not be adequate to cover all of our potential liabilities.
Our businesses are subject to numerous statutory and regulatory requirements, which may increase in the future.
Our businesses are subject to numerous statutory and regulatory requirements. Our ability to continue to hold licenses and
permits required for our businesses is subject to maintaining satisfactory compliance with such requirements. We may incur
significant costs to maintain compliance. Also, these requirements may increase in the future as a result of statutory and regulatory
changes. Regulators, in addition to investors, customers and the public in general, have been increasingly focused on
Environmental, Social and Governance (ESG) and cyber-security practices of companies. We may be subject to additional
regulations and disclosure requirements in the future arising from the increased focus on ESG and cyber-security responsibility. In
addition, customers may require us to implement or report on certain ESG responsible procedures or standards to continue doing
business with us. The occurrence of any of the foregoing could have a material impact on our financial condition or results of
operations. Further, although we are very committed to compliance and safety, we may not, either now or in the future, be in full
compliance at all times with such statutory and regulatory requirements. Consequently, we may be required to pay fines/penalties
for noncompliance and may incur significant costs to maintain or improve our compliance with such requirements.
Our operations are increasingly dependent upon technology. Failure of these technologies, failure to upgrade or innovate
these technologies or failure to identify and develop new technologies could have an adverse impact on our results.
Our information technology systems are critical to our operations, customer experience and financial reporting. Malfunctions
of these technologies, including disruptions due to natural or man-made disasters (e.g. terrorism, cyber intrusion), could interrupt
operations or negatively impact our service to our customers and hurt our business reputation. System failures could also impede
our ability to collect and report financial results timely or comply with regulations associated with our operations.
Identification of new and emerging technologies may be a risk and an opportunity to our business. Research and development
of new technologies may require significant spending which may negatively impact our operating results. Failure to innovate and
focus on new technologies that provide superior alternatives to traditional environmental services, waste disposal or oil collection
and re-refining service offerings may negatively impact our financial results.
A cyber security incident could negatively impact our business and our relationships with customers.
We use computers in substantially all aspects of our business operations and also mobile devices and other online activities to
connect with our employees and customers. Such uses give rise to cyber security risks, including security breach, espionage, system
disruption, theft, disruption of our business operations, remediation costs for repairs of system damage and inadvertent release of
information. Our business involves the storage and transmission of numerous classes of sensitive and/or confidential information
and intellectual property including, but not limited to, private information about employees and
15
Table Of Contents
financial and strategic information about our Company and our business partners. Furthermore, as we pursue our strategy to grow
through acquisitions and new initiatives that improve our operations and cost structure, we are also expanding and improving our
information technologies, resulting in a larger technological presence and corresponding exposure to cyber security risk. If we fail
to assess and identify cyber security risks associated with acquisitions and new initiatives, we may become increasingly vulnerable
to such risks. Additionally, while we have implemented measures to prevent security breaches and cyber incidents, our preventative
measures and incident response efforts may not be entirely effective. The theft, destruction, loss, misappropriation or release of
sensitive and/or confidential information or intellectual property, or interference with our information technology systems or the
technology systems of third parties on which we rely, could result in business disruption, negative publicity, brand damage,
violation of privacy laws, loss of customers, potential liability and competitive disadvantage, which could have a material advers
affect on our financial position or results of operations.
If we become unable to obtain, at reasonable cost, the insurance, surety bonds, letters of credit and other forms of
financial assurance required for our facilities and operations, our business and results of operations would be adversely
affected.
We are required to provide substantial amounts of financial assurance to government agencies for closure and post-closure
care of our licensed hazardous waste treatment facilities and certain other permitted facilities should those facilities cease operation,
and we are also occasionally required to post surety, bid and performance bonds in connection with certain customer projects. As of
December 31, 2019, our total estimated closure and post-closure costs requiring financial assurance by regulators were $472.7
million for our U.S. facilities and $56.8 million for our Canadian facilities. We have obtained all of the required financial assurance
for our facilities through a combination of surety bonds, letters of credit and insurance from qualified insurance companies. The
financial assurance related to closure and post-closure obligations of our U.S. facilities will renew in 2020. Our Canadian facilities
utilize surety bonds, which renew at various dates throughout 2020, as well as letters of credit.
Our ability to continue operating our facilities and conducting our other operations would be adversely affected if we became
unable to obtain sufficient insurance, surety bonds, letters of credit and other forms of financial assurance at reasonable cost to meet
our regulatory and other business requirements. The availability of insurance, surety bonds, letters of credit and other forms of
financial assurance is affected by our insurers', sureties' and lenders' assessment of our risk and by other factors outside of our
control such as general conditions in the insurance and credit markets.
Our insurance coverage and self-insurance reserves may be inadequate to cover all significant risk exposures, and
increasing costs to maintain adequate coverage may significantly impact our financial condition and results of operations.
We carry a range of insurance policies intended to protect our assets and operations, including general liability insurance,
property damage, business interruption and environmental risk insurance. While we endeavor to purchase insurance coverage
appropriate to our risk assessment, we are unable to predict with certainty the frequency, nature or magnitude of claims for direct or
consequential damages, and as a result our insurance program may not fully cover us for losses we may incur. In addition, as a
result of a number of catastrophic weather and other events, insurance companies have incurred substantial losses and in many
cases they have substantially reduced the nature and amount of insurance coverage available to the market, have broadened
exclusions and/or have substantially increased the cost of such coverage. If this trend continues, we may not be able to maintain
insurance of the types and coverage we desire at reasonable rates. A partially or completely uninsured claim against us (including
liabilities associated with cleanup or remediation at our facilities), if successful and of sufficient magnitude, could have a material
adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Any future difficulty in obtaining insurance could also
impair our ability to secure future contracts, which may be conditioned upon the availability of adequate insurance coverage. In
addition, claims associated with risks for which we are self-insured (workers' compensation, employee medical, comprehensive
general liability and vehicle liability) may exceed our recorded reserves, which could negatively impact future earnings.
Tax interpretations and changes in tax regulations and legislation could adversely affect our results of operations.
We are subject to income taxes in the United States, Canada and various state and local jurisdictions. Tax interpretations,
regulations and legislation in the various jurisdictions in which we operate are subject to change and uncertainty and can impact net
income, income tax expense and deferred income tax assets or liabilities. Our interpretation of tax rules and regulations, including
those relating to foreign jurisdictions, requires judgment that may be challenged by taxation authorities upon audit. Although we
believe our assumptions, judgments and estimates are reasonable, changes in tax laws or our interpretation of tax laws and the
resolution of any tax audits could significantly impact the amounts provided for income taxes in our consolidated financial
statements.
16
Table Of Contents
Fluctuations in foreign currency exchange could affect our financial results.
We earn revenues, pay expenses, own assets and incur liabilities in countries using currencies other than the U.S. Dollar. In
fiscal 2019, we recorded approximately 16.1% of our direct revenues in Canada. Because our consolidated financial statements are
presented in U.S. Dollars, we must translate revenues, income and expenses as well as assets and liabilities into U.S. Dollars at
exchange rates in effect during or at the end of each reporting period. Therefore, increases or decreases in the value of the U.S.
Dollar against other currencies in countries where we operate affect our results of operations and the value of balance sheet items
denominated in foreign currencies.
Failure to correctly identify and manage acquisitions and divestitures could adversely impact our future results.
We continuously evaluate potential acquisition candidates and from time to time acquire companies that we believe will
strategically fit into our business and growth objectives. If we are unable to successfully integrate and develop acquired businesses,
we could fail to achieve anticipated synergies and cost savings, including any expected increases in revenues and operating results,
which could have a material adverse effect on our financial results. We also continually review our portfolio of assets to determine
the extent to which assets or group of assets are contributing to our objectives and growth strategy. When we decide to sell a
business or specific asset group, we may be unable to do so on satisfactory terms and within our anticipated time frame.
We have acquired, and expect generally to acquire, all the outstanding shares of our more significant acquired companies.
Due to this acquisition method our investment in those companies are or will be subject to all of their liabilities other than their
respective debts which we paid or will pay at the time of the acquisitions. Unknown liabilities or other obligations may adversely
affect our financial condition and results of operations.
Certain adverse conditions have required, and future conditions might require, us to make substantial write-downs in our
assets, which have adversely affected or would adversely affect our balance sheet and results of operations.
We review our long-lived tangible and intangible assets for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate
that the carrying value of an asset may not be recoverable. We also test our goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets for
impairment at least annually on December 31, or when events or changes in the business environment indicate that the carrying
value of a reporting unit or indefinite lived intangible may exceed its fair value. During each of 2019, 2018 and 2017, we
determined that no asset write-downs were required. However, if conditions in any of the businesses in which we operate were to
deteriorate, we could determine that certain of our assets are impaired and we would then be required to write-off all or a portion of
the value of such assets. Any significant write-offs would adversely affect our balance sheet and results of operations.
Our growth and success are dependent upon key personnel. If we lose key personnel and are unable to hire additional
qualified personnel in a timely manner, our business may be harmed.
Our ability to continue to grow, operate our facilities and provide our services is dependent upon the expertise of certain key
managerial and technical personnel. The market for skilled and experienced personnel is highly competitive. Our ability to retain
key personnel and/or attract new qualified personnel may have an impact on our business and financial results.
Natural disasters or other catastrophic events could negatively affect our business, financial condition and results of
operations.
Natural disasters such as hurricanes, tornados or earthquakes could negatively affect our operations and financial
performance. Such events could result in physical damage to one or more of our facilities or equipment, the temporary lack of an
adequate workforce in a market and the temporary disruption in rail or truck transportation services upon which we rely. These
events could prevent or delay shipments and reduce both volumes and revenue. Weather conditions and other event driven special
projects also cause interim variations in our results. We may be required to suspend operations in some or all of our locations,
which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations.
Additional Risks Affecting Our Environmental Services Business
The hazardous waste management business which our Environmental Services segment operates is subject to significant
environmental liabilities.
We have accrued environmental liabilities valued as of December 31, 2019 at $189.8 million, substantially all of which we
assumed in connection with certain acquisitions. We calculate our environmental liabilities on a present value basis in accordance
with generally accepted accounting principles, which take into consideration both the amount of such liabilities and the timing
when we project that we will be required to pay such liabilities. We anticipate our environmental liabilities will be payable over
many years and that cash flows generated from our operations will generally be sufficient to fund the payment of
17
Table Of Contents
such liabilities when required. However, events not now anticipated (including future changes in environmental laws and
regulations or their enforcement) could require that such payments be made earlier or in greater amounts than we now estimate,
which could adversely affect our financial condition and results of operations.
We may also assume additional environmental liabilities as part of future acquisitions. Although we will endeavor to
accurately estimate and limit environmental liabilities presented by the businesses or facilities to be acquired, some liabilities,
including ones that may exist only because of the past operations of an acquired business or facility, may prove to be more difficult
or costly to address than we then estimate. It is also possible that government officials responsible for enforcing environmental laws
may believe an environmental liability is more significant than we then estimate, or that we will fail to identify or fully appreciate
an existing liability before we become legally responsible to address it.
The hazardous waste management industry in which we participate is subject to significant economic and business risks.
The future operating results of our Environmental Services segment may be affected by such factors as our ability to utilize
our facilities and workforce profitably in the face of intense price competition, maintain or increase market share in an industry
which has in the past experienced significant downsizing and consolidation, realize benefits from cost reduction programs, generate
incremental volumes of waste to be handled through our facilities from existing and acquired sales offices and service centers,
obtain sufficient volumes of waste at prices which produce revenue sufficient to offset the operating costs of our facilities,
minimize downtime and disruptions of operations and develop our field services business. In particular, economic downturns or
recessionary conditions in North America, and increased outsourcing by North American manufacturers to plants located in
countries with lower wage costs and less stringent environmental regulations, have adversely affected and may in the future
adversely affect the demand for our services. Our Environmental Services business is also cyclical to the extent that it is dependent
upon a stream of waste from cyclical industries such as chemical and petrochemical. If those cyclical industries slow significantly,
the business that we receive from them would likely decrease.
The extensive environmental regulations to which we are subject may increase our costs and potential liabilities and limit
our ability to expand our facilities.
Our operations and those of others in the environmental services industry are subject to extensive federal, state, provincial
and local environmental requirements in both the United States and Canada, including those relating to emissions to air, discharged
wastewater, storage, treatment, transport and disposal of regulated materials and cleanup of soil and groundwater contamination. In
particular, if we fail to comply with government regulations governing the transport of hazardous materials, such failure could
negatively impact our ability to collect, process and ultimately dispose of hazardous waste generated by our customers. Efforts to
conduct our operations in compliance with all applicable laws and regulations, including environmental rules and regulations,
require programs to promote compliance, such as training employees and customers, purchasing health and safety equipment and in
some cases hiring outside consultants and lawyers. Even with these programs, we and other companies in the environmental
services industry are routinely faced with government enforcement proceedings, which can result in fines or other sanctions and
require expenditures for remedial work on waste management facilities and contaminated sites. Certain of these laws impose strict
and, under certain circumstances, joint and several liability on current and former owners and operators of facilities that release
regulated materials or that generate those materials and arrange for their disposal or treatment at contaminated sites. Such liabilities
can relate to required cleanup of releases of regulated materials and related natural resource damages. The landscape of
environmental regulation to which we are subject can change. Changes to environmental regulation often present new business
opportunities for us; however, such changes may also result in increased operating and compliance costs or, in more significant
cases, changes to how our facilities are able to operate. We constantly monitor the landscape of environmental regulation; however,
our ability to navigate through any changes to such regulations may result in a material effect on our operations, cash flows or
financial condition.
From time to time, we have paid fines or penalties in government environmental enforcement proceedings, usually involving
our waste treatment, storage and disposal facilities. Although none of these fines or penalties that we have paid in the past has had a
material adverse effect upon us, we might in the future be required to make substantial expenditures as a result of government
proceedings which would have a negative impact on our financial condition and results of operations. Furthermore, regulators have
the power to suspend or revoke permits or licenses needed for operation of our plants, equipment, and vehicles based on, among
other factors, our compliance record, and customers may decide not to use a particular disposal facility or do business with us
because of concerns about our compliance record. Suspension or revocation of permits or licenses would impact our operations and
could have a material impact on our financial results. Although we have never had any of our facilities' operating permits revoked,
suspended or non-renewed involuntarily, it is possible that such an event could occur in the future.
Some environmental laws and regulations impose liability and responsibility on present and former owners, operators or
users of facilities and sites for contamination at such facilities and sites without regard to causation or knowledge of
18
Table Of Contents
contamination. Past practices have resulted in releases of regulated materials at and from certain of our facilities, or the disposal of
regulated materials at third-party sites, which may require investigation and remediation, and potentially result in claims of
personal injury, property damage and damages to natural resources. In addition, we occasionally evaluate various alternatives with
respect to our facilities, including possible dispositions or closures. Investigations undertaken in connection with these activities
may lead to discoveries of contamination that must be remediated, and closures of facilities might trigger compliance requirements
that are not applicable to operating facilities. We are currently conducting remedial activities at certain of our facilities and paying a
portion of the remediation costs at certain sites owned by third parties. While, based on available information, we believe these
remedial activities will not result in a material effect upon our operations or financial condition, these activities or the discovery of
previously unknown conditions could result in material costs.
In addition to the costs of complying with environmental laws and regulations, we incur costs defending against
environmental litigation brought by government agencies and private parties. We are now, and may in the future be, a defendant in
lawsuits brought by parties alleging environmental damage, personal injury and/or property damage, which may result in our
payment of significant amounts.
Environmental and land use laws also impact our ability to expand our facilities. In addition, we are required to obtain
government permits to operate our facilities, including all of our landfills. Even if we comply with all applicable environmental
laws, we might not be able to obtain requisite permits from applicable government authorities to extend or modify such permits to
fit our business needs.
If our assumptions relating to expansion of our landfills should prove inaccurate, our results of operations and cash flow
could be adversely affected.
When we include permitted or probable expansion airspace in our calculation of available airspace, we adjust our landfill
liabilities to the present value of projected costs for cell closure and landfill closure and post-closure. It is possible that our
estimates or assumptions could ultimately turn out to be significantly different from actual results. In some cases we may be
unsuccessful in obtaining an expansion permit or we may determine that an expansion permit is no longer probable. To the extent
that such estimates, or the assumptions used to make those estimates, prove to be significantly different than actual results, or our
beliefs that we will receive expansion permits change adversely in a significant manner, our landfill assets, including the assets
incurred in the pursuit of the expansion, may be subject to impairment. Furthermore, lower prospective profitability may result due
to increased interest accretion and depreciation or asset impairment charges related to the removal of previously included expansion
airspace. In addition, if our assumptions concerning expansion airspace should prove inaccurate, certain of our cash expenditures
for closure of landfills could be accelerated and adversely affect our results of operations and cash flow.
A significant portion of our Environmental Services business depends upon the demand for cleanup of major spills and
other remedial projects and regulatory developments over which we have no control.
Our operations can be affected by the commencement and completion of cleanup of major spills and other events, customers'
decisions to undertake remedial projects, seasonal fluctuations due to weather and budgetary cycles influencing the timing of
customers' spending for remedial activities, the timing of regulatory decisions relating to hazardous waste management projects,
changes in regulations governing the management of hazardous waste, secular changes in the waste processing industry towards
waste minimization and the propensity for delays in the demand for remedial services and changes in the myriad of government
regulations governing our diverse operations. We do not control such factors and, as a result, our revenue and income can vary from
quarter to quarter, and past financial results for certain quarters may not be a reliable indicator of future results for comparable
quarters in subsequent years.
Additional Risks Affecting Our Safety-Kleen Business
Fluctuations in oil prices may negatively affect our Safety-Kleen business.
A significant portion of our Safety-Kleen business involves collecting used oil from certain of our customers, re-refining a
portion of such used oil into base and blended lubricating oils and then selling both such re-refined oil and the recycled oil
("RFO"), to other customers. Changes in the reported spot market prices of oil affect the prices at which we can sell our re-refined
oil and RFO. If applicable rates increase or decrease, we typically will charge a higher or lower corresponding price for these oil
products. The prices at which we sell these oil products can also be affected by changes in certain indices measuring changes in the
price of heavy fuel oil, with increases and decreases in the indices typically translating into a higher or lower price for these oil
products. The cost to collect used oil, including the amounts we pay to obtain a portion of our used oil and therefore ability to
collect necessary volumes and the fuel costs of our oil collection fleet, typically also increases or decreases when the relevant
indices increase or decrease. However, even though the prices we can charge for these oil products and the costs to collect and re-
refine used oil and process RFO typically increase and decrease together, there is no assurance that when our costs to collect and re-
refine used oil and process RFO increase we will be able to increase the prices we charge for these
19
Table Of Contents
oil products to cover such increased costs, or that our costs to collect and re-refine used oil and process RFO will decline when the
prices we can charge for such oil products decline. These risks are exacerbated when there are rapid fluctuations in these oil
indices.
Environmental laws and regulations have adversely affected and may adversely affect Safety-Kleen's parts cleaning and
other solvent related services.
In connection with its parts cleaning and other solvent related services, Safety-Kleen has been subject to fines and certain
orders requiring it to take environmental remedial action. Safety-Kleen may also be subject to monetary fines, civil or criminal
penalties, remediation, cleanup or stop orders, injunctions, orders to cease or suspend certain practices or denial of permits required
for the operation of its facilities. The outcome of any proceeding and associated costs and expenses could have a material adverse
impact on Safety-Kleen’s financial condition and results of operations.
Recent and potential changes in environmental laws and regulations may also adversely affect future Safety-Kleen parts
cleaning and other solvent related services. Interpretation or enforcement of existing laws and regulations, or the adoption of new
laws and regulations, may require Safety-Kleen to modify or curtail its parts cleaning operations or replace or upgrade its facilities
or equipment at substantial cost, which we may not be able to pass on to our customers, and we may choose to indemnify our
customers from any fines or penalties they may incur as a result of these new laws and regulations. On the other hand, in some
cases if new laws and regulations are less stringent, Safety-Kleen’s customers or competitors may be able to manage waste more
effectively themselves, which could decrease the need for Safety-Kleen’s parts cleaning and other solvent related services or
increase competition, which could adversely affect Safety-Kleen’s results of operations.
Safety-Kleen is subject to existing and potential product liability lawsuits.
Safety-Kleen has been named from time to time as a defendant in product liability lawsuits in various courts and jurisdictions
throughout the United States. As of December 31, 2019, Safety-Kleen was involved in approximately 55 such proceedings
(including cases which have been settled but not formally dismissed) wherein persons claim personal injury resulting from the use
of its parts cleaning equipment or cleaning products. These proceedings typically involve allegations that the solvents used in
Safety-Kleen’s parts cleaning equipment contain contaminants or that Safety-Kleen’s recycling process does not effectively remove
the contaminants that become entrained in the solvents during their use. In addition, certain claimants assert that Safety-Kleen
failed to adequately warn the product user of potential risks, including a historic failure to warn that such solvents contain trace
amounts of toxic or hazardous substances such as benzene.
Safety-Kleen maintains insurance that we believe will provide coverage for these claims (over amounts accrued for self-
insured retentions and deductibles in certain limited cases). This insurance may not provide coverage for potential awards of
punitive damages against Safety-Kleen. Although Safety-Kleen has vigorously defended and will continue to vigorously defend
itself and the safety of its products against all of these claims, these lawsuits are subject to many uncertainties and outcomes cannot
be predicted with assurance. Safety-Kleen may also be named in additional product liability lawsuits in the future, including claims
for which insurance coverage may not be available. If any one or more of these lawsuits were decided unfavorably against Safety-
Kleen and the plaintiffs were awarded punitive damages, or if insurance coverage were not available for any such claim, our
financial condition and results of operations could be materially and adversely affected. Additionally, if any one or more of these
lawsuits were decided unfavorably against Safety-Kleen, such outcome may encourage more lawsuits against us.
Risks Relating to Our Levels of Debt and Letters of Credit
Our substantial levels of outstanding debt and letters of credit could adversely affect our financial condition and ability to
fulfill our obligations.
As of December 31, 2019, we had outstanding $845.0 million of senior unsecured notes, $734.7 million of senior secured
term loans, and $146.9 million of letters of credit. Our substantial levels of outstanding debt and letters of credit may:
•adversely impact our ability to obtain additional financing in the future for working capital, capital expenditures,
acquisitions or other general corporate purposes or to repurchase our senior unsecured notes from holders upon any
change of control;
•require us to dedicate a substantial portion of our cash flow to payment of interest on our debt and fees on our letters of
credit, which reduces the availability of our cash flow to fund working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions and other
general corporate purposes;
•subject us to the risk of increased sensitivity to interest rate increases based upon variable interest rates, including interest
on $384.7 million of our $734.7 million senior secured term loans for which we do not currently have interest rate hedges
and borrowings (if any) under our revolving credit facility;
20
Table Of Contents
•increase the possibility of an event of default under the financial and operating covenants contained in our debt
instruments; and
•limit our ability to adjust to rapidly changing market conditions, reduce our ability to withstand competitive pressures and
make us more vulnerable to a downturn in general economic conditions of our business than our competitors with less
debt.
Our ability to make scheduled payments of principal or interest with respect to our debt, including our outstanding senior
unsecured notes, our secured term loans, any revolving loans and our finance leases, and to pay fee obligations with respect to our
letters of credit, will depend on our ability to generate cash and our future financial results. If we are unable to generate sufficient
cash flow from operations in the future to service our debt and letter of credit fee obligations, we might be required to refinance all
or a portion of our existing debt and letter of credit facilities or to obtain new or additional such facilities. However, we might not
be able to obtain any such new or additional facilities on favorable terms or at all.
Despite our substantial levels of outstanding debt and letters of credit, we could incur substantially more debt and letter of
credit obligations in the future.
Although our revolving credit agreement and the indentures and loan agreements governing our other outstanding debt
contain restrictions on the incurrence of additional debt (including, for this purpose, reimbursement obligations under outstanding
letters of credit), these restrictions are subject to a number of qualifications and exceptions and the additional debt which we might
incur in the future in compliance with these restrictions could be substantial. In particular, as of December 31, 2019, we had up to
approximately $229.2 million available for additional borrowings and letters of credit under our revolving credit facility. Our
revolving credit agreement and the indentures and loan agreement governing our other outstanding debt also allow us to borrow
significant amounts of money from other sources. These restrictions also do not prevent us from incurring obligations (such as
operating leases) that do not constitute “debt” or “indebtedness” as defined in the relevant agreements. To the extent we incur in the
future additional debt and letter of credit or other obligations, the related risks would increase.
The covenants in our debt agreements restrict our ability to operate our business and might lead to a default under our
debt agreements.
Our revolving credit agreement and the indentures and loan agreement governing our other outstanding debt limit, among
other things, the extent to which the Company or our restricted subsidiaries can:
•incur or guarantee additional indebtedness (including, for this purpose, reimbursement obligations under letters of credit)
or issue preferred stock;
•pay dividends or make other distributions to our stockholders;
•purchase or redeem capital stock or subordinated indebtedness;
•make investments;
•create liens;
•incur restrictions on the ability of our restricted subsidiaries to pay dividends or make other payments to us;
•sell assets, including capital stock of our subsidiaries;
•consolidate or merge with or into other companies or transfer all or substantially all of our assets; and
•engage in transactions with affiliates.
As a result of these covenants, we may not be able to respond to changes in business and economic conditions and to obtain
additional financing, if needed, and we may be prevented from engaging in transactions that might otherwise be beneficial to us.
Our revolving credit facility requires, and our future credit facilities may require, us to maintain under certain circumstances certain
financial ratios and satisfy certain other financial condition tests. Our ability to meet these financial ratios and tests can be affected
by events beyond our control, and we may not be able to meet those tests. The breach of any of these covenants could result in a
default under our outstanding or future debt. Upon the occurrence of an event of default, the lenders could elect to declare all
amounts outstanding under such debts, including accrued interest or other obligations, to be immediately due and payable. If
amounts outstanding under such debt were accelerated, our assets might not be sufficient to repay in full that debt and our other
debt.
Our revolving credit agreement and the indenture and loan agreement governing our other outstanding debt also contain
cross-default and cross-acceleration provisions. Under these provisions, a default or acceleration under one instrument
21
Table Of Contents
governing our debt may constitute a default under our other debt instruments that contain cross-default and cross-acceleration
provisions, which could result in the related debt and the debt under such other instruments becoming immediately due and
payable. In such event, we would need to raise funds from alternative sources, which funds might not be available to us on
favorable terms, on a timely basis or at all. Alternatively, such a default could require us to sell assets and otherwise curtail
operations to pay our creditors. The proceeds of such a sale of assets or curtailment of operations might not enable us to pay all of
our liabilities.
Other Risks Relating to Our Common Stock
The Massachusetts Business Corporation Act and our By-Laws contain certain anti-takeover provisions.
Sections 8.06 and 7.02 of the Massachusetts Business Corporation Act provide that Massachusetts corporations which are
publicly-held must have a staggered board of directors and that written demand by holders of at least 40% of the outstanding shares
of each relevant voting group of stockholders is required for stockholders to call a special meeting unless such corporations take
certain actions to affirmatively "opt-out" of such requirements. In accordance with these provisions, our By-Laws provide for a
staggered board of directors which consists of three classes of directors of which one class is elected each year for a three-year
term, and require that written application by holders of at least 25% (which is less than the 40% which would otherwise be
applicable without such a specific provision in our By-Laws) of our outstanding shares of common stock is required for
stockholders to call a special meeting. In addition, our By-Laws prohibit the removal by the stockholders of a director except for
cause. These provisions could inhibit a takeover of our Company by restricting stockholders' action to replace the existing directors
or approve other actions which a party seeking to acquire us might propose. A takeover transaction would frequently afford
stockholders an opportunity to sell their shares at a premium over then market prices.
ITEM 1B.    UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS
Not applicable.
ITEM 2.    PROPERTIES
Our principal executive offices are in Norwell, Massachusetts. In the first quarter of 2020, we purchased our primary
executive office building in Norwell which occupies 104,008 square feet. We also currently lease 52,418 square feet of additional
office space in Norwell under arrangements which may not expire until 2042. We also have regional administrative offices in Texas
and South Carolina, as well as Alberta, Canada and Hyderabad, India. Our properties are sufficient and suitable for our current
needs.
We have a network of more than 480 service locations across 49 states, eight Canadian provinces, Puerto Rico and Mexico.
Those service locations include service centers, satellite locations, branches, active hazardous waste management properties,
lodging facilities and oil processing facilities. The service centers and branches are the principal sales and service centers from
which we provide our environmental, energy and industrial services. The active hazardous waste management properties include
incinerator facilities, commercial and non-commercial landfills, wastewater treatment facilities, TSDFs, solvent recovery
management and recycling facilities, oil accumulation centers, oil terminals and oil re-refineries. Some of our properties offer
multiple capabilities. The following sets forth certain information as of December 31, 2019 regarding our properties.
Service Centers, Satellite Locations and Branches
We have approximately 360 service centers, satellite locations and branches throughout the United States and Canada which
serve as principal sales and service centers from which we provide parts cleaning services, containerized waste services, oil
collection services and other environmental services.
Active Hazardous Waste Management Properties
Incinerator Facilities.    We own five operating incinerator facilities that have a total of nine incinerators with 561,721 tons of
total practical capacity and an overall average utilization rate for 2019 of 84.6%. Our practical capacity is not based on a theoretical
24-hour, seven-day operation, but rather is determined as the production level at which our incinerators can operate with an
acceptable degree of efficiency, taking into consideration factors such as longer term customer demand, permanent staffing levels,
operating shifts, holidays, scheduled maintenance and mix of product. Capacity utilization is calculated by dividing actual
production tons by practical capacity at each incinerator.
22
Table Of Contents
 # of IncineratorsPractical Capacity
(Tons)Utilization Rate
Year Ended
December  31, 2019
Arkansas 3 145,072 88.8%
Nebraska 1 58,808 87.9%
Utah 1 66,815 88.4%
Texas 3 165,500 78.9%
Ontario, Canada 1 125,526 83.5%
 9 561,721 84.6%
Our incinerators offer a wide range of technological capabilities to customers through this network. We provide incineration
in the United States through one fluidized bed thermal oxidation unit and three solids and liquids-capable incinerator facilities and
we operate in Canada one active hazardous waste liquid injection incinerator.
Commercial and Non-Commercial Landfills.    In the United States and Canada, we operate nine commercial landfills with
approximately 28.2 million cubic yards of remaining highly probable airspace. Seven of our commercial landfills are designed and
permitted for the disposal of hazardous waste and two landfills are operated for nonhazardous industrial waste disposal and, to a
lesser extent, municipal solid waste. In addition to our commercial landfills, we also own and operate two non-commercial landfills
that only accept waste from our on-site incinerators. See "Landfill Accounting" within Note 2, "Significant Accounting Policies," to
our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report for additional information on our commercial and non-
commercial landfills.
Wastewater Treatment Facilities.    We operate a total of nine facilities, of which eight are owned and one is leased, that offer
a range of wastewater treatment technologies and services. Wastewater treatment consists primarily of three types of services:
hazardous wastewater treatment, sludge de-watering or drying and non-hazardous wastewater treatment.
Treatment, Storage and Disposal Facilities.    We operate 18 TSDFs, of which 16 are owned and two are leased, in the United
States and Canada. Our TSDFs facilitate the movement of materials among our network of service centers and treatment and
disposal facilities. Transportation may be accomplished by truck, rail, barge or a combination of modes, with our own assets or in
conjunction with third-party transporters. Specially designed containment systems, vehicles and other equipment permitted for
hazardous and industrial waste transport, together with drivers trained in transportation and waste handling procedures, provide for
the movement of customer waste streams.
Solvent Recovery Management and Recycling Operations.    We own two facilities specializing in solvent recovery
management.
Oil Processing, Blending and Packaging Facilities
Oil Accumulation Centers.    We operate a total of nine accumulation centers, of which eight are owned and one is leased,
used for accumulating waste oil from our branches.
Oil Terminals.    We operate a total of 53 oil terminals, of which 33 are owned and 20 are leased, which collect or process
used oil prior to delivery to re-refineries or distribution as RFO.
Oil Recycling and Re-refining Facilities.    We own six oil re-refineries, five in the United States and one in Canada. With
more than 200 million gallons of used oil processed annually, we were able to return 191 million gallons of new re-refined oil,
lubricants and byproducts back into the marketplace in 2019.
Oil Packaging and Blending Facilities.    We operate a total of five oil packaging and blending facilities, of which three are
owned and two are leased, which are used for blending and packaging oil from our branches.
Lodging Facilities
Lodge Operations.    We own and operate six fixed lodges, five of which are in Western Canada and a single lodge in Texas.
These lodges are all located on sites which are leased by the Company under long-term land lease agreements.
Camps.    We operate various camp facilities that can grow and shrink in size and location. Generally, we have ongoing
operations at one to two larger facilities that we expect to operate on a multi-year basis. Additionally, we have five office
complexes, two mini-camps and approximately 20 single and double occupancy drill camps in our fleet that can operate at any
time. All of our camp facilities are owned and located on various sites throughout Western Canada. Sites for the larger facilities are
generally leased, whereas sites for our smaller facilities are generally provided by our customers.
23
Table Of Contents
ITEM 3.    LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
See Note 18, "Commitments and Contingencies," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report for
a description of legal proceedings.
ITEM 4.    MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not applicable.
24
Table Of Contents
PART II
ITEM 5.    MARKET FOR REGISTRANT'S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Common Stock
Our common stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange ("NYSE") under the symbol CLH. On February 19, 2020, there
were 261 stockholders of record of our common stock, excluding stockholders whose shares were held in nominee, or "street
name" accounts through brokers or banks. On our last record date, 21,644 additional stockholders beneficially held shares in street
name accounts.
We have never declared nor paid any cash dividends on our common stock, and we do not intend to pay any dividends on our
common stock in the foreseeable future. We intend to retain our future earnings, if any, for use in the operation and expansion of
our business, payment of our outstanding debt and for our stock repurchase program. In addition, our current credit agreement and
indentures limit the amount we could pay as cash dividends on or for repurchase of our common stock. For additional information
surrounding our stock repurchase program, see Note 15, "Stockholders' Equity," to our consolidated financial statements included
in Item 8 of this report.
Securities Authorized For Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans
See Item 12, "Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters," for a
description of the securities which are authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
PeriodTotal Number
of Shar es
Purchased (1)Average Price
Paid Per  Shar e
(2)  Total Number  of
Shar es Pur chased
as Part of
Publicly
Announced Plans
or Programs  Appr oximate Dollar  Value
of Shar es that May Yet Be
Purchased Under  the Plans
or Programs (3)
(in thousands)
October 1, 2019 through October 31, 2019 617$ 74.78 — $ 289,684
November 1, 2019 through November 30, 2019 21,966 83.36 19,000 288,095
December 1, 2019 through December 31, 2019 59,899 84.27 40,329 284,684
Total 82,482$ 83.95 59,329 
______________________
(1)Includes 23,153 shares withheld by us from employees to satisfy employee tax obligations upon vesting of restricted
shares granted under our long-term equity incentive programs.
(2)The average price paid per share of common stock repurchased under our stock repurchase program includes commissions
paid to the brokers.
(3)Our board of directors has authorized the repurchase of up to $600.0 million of our common stock. We have funded and
intend to fund the repurchases through available cash resources. The stock repurchase program authorizes us to purchase
our common stock on the open market or in privately negotiated transactions periodically in a manner that complies with
applicable U.S. securities laws. The number of shares purchased and the timing of the purchases has depended and will
depend on a number of factors, including share price, cash required for business plans, trading volume and other
conditions. During April 2018, we implemented a repurchase plan in accordance with Rule 10b5-1 promulgated under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Future repurchases will be made under the Rule 10b5-1 plan as well as
open market or privately negotiated transactions as described above. We have no obligation to repurchase stock under this
program and may suspend or terminate the repurchase program at any time.
25
Table Of Contents
COMPARISON OF 5-YEAR CUMULATIVE TOTAL RETURN
AMONG CLEAN HARBORS, INC.,
NYSE COMPOSITE INDEX, S&P MIDCAP 400 INDEX, REFUSE SYSTEMS AND CUSTOM PEER GROUP
Performance Graph
The following graph compares the five-year return from investing $100 in each of our common stock, the NYSE Composite
Index, the S&P Midcap 400 Index, and a custom peer group. In 2018, we selected a custom peer group that more closely aligns
with the breadth and size of our business. This peer group is comprised of American Water Works Company, Inc., Casella Waste
Systems, Inc., Civeo Corporation, Covanta Holding Corporation, Heritage-Crystal Clean, Inc., Iron Mountain Incorporated,
Newpark Resources, Inc., Oil States International, Inc., Republic Services, Inc., Stericycle, Inc., Superior Energy Services, Inc., US
Ecology, Inc., and Waste Management, Inc. In 2019, we removed the Refuse Systems comparative, which had previously been
included in the Comparison of 5-Year Cumulative Total Return chart below, because we believe our custom peer group is more
relevant.
The values illustrated assume reinvestment of dividends on the ex-dividend date and compares relative performance since a
particular starting date. In this instance, the starting date was December 31, 2014, when our common stock closed at $48.05 per
share. The graph is presented pursuant to SEC rules and is not meant to be an indication of our future performance.
26
Table Of Contents
ITEM 6.    SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
The following summary of consolidated financial information has been derived from the audited consolidated financial
statements included in Item 8, "Financial Statements and Supplementary Data," of this report and in the Form 10-Ks we previously
filed with the SEC. This information should be reviewed in conjunction with Item 7, "Management's Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations," and the financial statements and notes thereto included in Item 8, "Financial
Statements and Supplementary Data," of this report.
 For the years ended December 31,
(in thousands, except per share amounts) 2019  2018 2017  2016 2015
Statement of Operations Data:        
Total revenues $3,412,190 $3,300,303$2,944,978 $2,755,226$3,275,137
Net income (loss) (1)97,740 65,636 100,739 (39,873) 44,102
Earnings (loss) per share: (1)     
     Basic 1.75 1.17 1.77 (0.69) 0.76
     Diluted 1.74 1.16 1.76 (0.69) 0.76
Other Financial Data:        
Adjusted EBITDA (2)540,317 491,005 425,657 400,354 504,167
 As of December 31,
(in thousands) 2019 2018  2017  2016 2015
Balance Sheet Data:        
Total assets $4,108,904$3,738,321 $3,706,570 $3,681,920$3,431,428
Long-term obligations (including current portion) 1,561,651 1,572,556 1,629,537 1,633,272 1,382,543
Stockholders' equity 1,269,813 1,169,756 1,188,202 1,084,241 1,096,282
___________________________________________
(1)The 2019 results include a $6.1 million pre-tax loss on early extinguishment of debt and a $0.7 million gain on the sale of
a non-core line of business within our Environmental Services segment. The 2018 results include a $2.5 million pre-tax
loss on early extinguishment of debt. The 2017 results include a net benefit of $93.0 million resulting from impacts of the
tax law changes enacted in December of 2017, a $7.9 million pre-tax loss on early extinguishment of debt and a $30.7
million pre-tax gain on the sale of a non-core line of business within our Environmental Services segment. The 2016
results include a $34.0 million goodwill impairment charge and a $16.9 million pre-tax gain on the sale of a non-core line
of business within our Environmental Services segment. The 2015 results include a $32.0 million goodwill impairment
charge in our Environmental Services segment. In 2016, we did not record any income tax benefit as a result of the
goodwill impairment charge. In 2015, we recorded an income tax benefit of $2.0 million as a result of the goodwill
impairment charge.
(2)The following is a reconciliation of net income (loss) to Adjusted EBITDA for the following periods (in thousands). See
additional information regarding this non-GAAP measure under the heading "Adjusted EBITDA" in Item 7,
"Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations," of this report.
 For the years ended December 31,
(in thousands, except for percentages) 2019 2018  2017  2016 2015
Net income (loss) $97,740 $65,636 $100,739 $(39,873)$44,102
Accretion of environmental liabilities 10,136 9,806 9,460 10,177 10,402
Depreciation and amortization 300,725 298,625 288,422 287,002 274,194
Goodwill impairment charges — —  —  34,013 31,992
Other (income) expense, net (2,897) 4,510 6,119 (6,195) 1,380
Loss on early extinguishment of debt 6,131 2,488 7,891 — —
Gain on sale of businesses (687) —  (30,732) (16,884) —
Interest expense, net 78,670 81,094 85,808 83,525 76,553
Provision (benefit) for income taxes 50,499 28,846 (42,050) 48,589 65,544
Adjusted EBITDA $540,317 $491,005 $425,657 $400,354 $504,167
As a percentage of total revenues 15.8% 14.9% 14.5% 14.5% 15.4%
27
Table Of Contents
ITEM 7.    MANAGEMENT'S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
Overview
We are North America’s leading provider of environmental, energy and industrial services supporting our customers in
finding environmentally responsible solutions to further their sustainability goals in today's world. We believe we operate, in the
aggregate, the largest number of hazardous waste incinerators, landfills and treatment, storage and disposal facilities ("TSDFs") in
North America. We serve a diverse customer base, including Fortune 500 companies, across the chemical, energy, manufacturing
and additional markets, as well as numerous government agencies. These customers rely on us to deliver a broad range of services
including but not limited to end-to-end hazardous waste management, emergency response, industrial cleaning and maintenance
and recycling services. We are also the largest re-refiner and recycler of used oil in North America and the largest provider of parts
cleaning and related environmental services to commercial, industrial and automotive customers in North America.
We have two operating segments; (i) the Environmental Services segment and (ii) the Safety-Kleen segment. Performance of
our segments is evaluated on several factors of which the primary financial measure is Adjusted EBITDA as described more fully
below. The following is a discussion of how management evaluates its segments including key performance indicators that
management uses to assess the segments’ results, as well as certain macroeconomic trends and influences that impact each
reportable segment:
•Environmental Services - Environmental Services segment results are predicated upon the demand by our customers
for waste services directly attributable to waste volumes generated by them and project work for which waste
handling and/or disposal is required. In managing the business and evaluating performance, management tracks the
volumes and mix of waste handled and disposed of through our owned incinerators and landfills, as well as utilization
of such incinerators, labor and billable hours and equipment among other key metrics. Levels of activity and ultimate
performance associated with this segment can be impacted by several factors including overall U.S. GDP and U.S.
industrial production, weather conditions, efficiency of our operations, technology, changing regulations, competition,
market pricing of our services and the management of our related operating costs. Environmental Services results are
also impacted by the demand for planned and unplanned industrial related cleaning and maintenance services at
customer sites and for environmental cleanup services on a scheduled or emergency basis, including response to
national events such as major chemical spills, natural disasters or other events where immediate and specialized
services are required.
•Safety-Kleen - Safety-Kleen segment results are impacted by an array of core service and product offerings that serve
to attract small quantity waste producers as customers and integrate them into the Clean Harbors waste network. Core
service offerings include parts washer services, containerized waste services, vac services, used motor oil collection
and contract blending and packaging services. Key performance indicators tracked by the Company relative to these
services include the number of parts washer services performed and pricing and volume of used motor oil and waste
collected. Results from these services are primarily driven by the overall number of parts washers placed at customer
sites and volumes of waste collected, as well as the demand for and frequency of other offered services. These factors
can be impacted by overall economic conditions in the marketplace, especially in the automotive related area. In
addition to its core service offerings, Safety-Kleen offers high quality recycled base and blended oil products to end
users including fleet customers, distributors and manufacturers of oil products. Other product offerings include
automotive related fluids and shop supplies. Relative to its oil related products, management tracks the Company's
volumes and relative percentages of base and blended oil sales along with various pricing metrics associated with the
commodity driven marketplace. The segment’s results are significantly impacted by overall market pricing and
product mix associated with base and blended oil products and, more specifically, the market prices of Group II base
oils. Costs incurred in connection with the collection of used oil and other raw materials associated with the segment’s
oil related products can also be volatile. Our OilPlus® closed loop initiative, which results in the sale of our renewable
oil products directly to our end customers, may also be impacted by changes in customer demand for high-quality,
environmentally responsible recycled oil.
Highlights
Total revenues for 2019 increased 3.4% to $3.4 billion, compared with $3.3 billion in 2018. Our Environmental Services
segment increased direct revenues $95.9 million in 2019 compared with 2018 due to greater activity at our sales and service
branches and improvements in average pricing which was driven by a more profitable mix of waste streams across our incinerator
network. Direct revenues recorded by Safety-Kleen increased $16.8 million in 2019 compared to 2018 as a result of continued
growth across Safety-Kleen’s core service offerings and higher volumes of blended oil sales. Foreign currency
28
Table Of Contents
translation of our Canadian operations negatively impacted our consolidated direct revenues by $12.9 million in 2019 as compared
to 2018.
Income from operations in 2019 was $229.5 million, compared with $182.6 million in 2018. We reported net income in 2019
and 2018 of $97.7 million and $65.6 million, respectively. Adjusted EBITDA, which is the primary financial measure by which our
segments are evaluated, increased 10.0% to $540.3 million in 2019 from $491.0 million in 2018. The increased level of Adjusted
EBITDA in 2019 was primarily attributable to higher revenue amounts as described above and improved operating margins.
Additional information regarding Adjusted EBITDA, which is a non-GAAP measure, including a reconciliation of Adjusted
EBITDA to net income, appears below under "Adjusted EBITDA."
Net cash from operating activities for 2019 was $413.2 million, an increase of $40.0 million from 2018. Adjusted free cash
flow, which management uses to measure our financial strength and ability to generate cash, was $208.5 million in 2019, which
represented a $13.2 million increase over 2018 primarily due to greater levels of operating income and lower levels of working
capital, which was due in part to a change in timing of interest payments associated with the debt refinancing completed in the third
quarter of 2019. These increases were partially offset by increased capital and environmental spending. Additional information
regarding adjusted free cash flow, which is a non-GAAP measure, including a reconciliation of adjusted free cash flow to net cash
from operating activities, appears below under "Adjusted Free Cash Flow."
29
Table Of Contents
Segment Performance
The primary financial measure by which we evaluate the performance of our segments is Adjusted EBITDA. The following
table sets forth certain financial information associated with our results of operations for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018
and 2017 (in thousands, except percentages).
 Summary of Operations
 For the years ended December  31, 2019 over  2018 2018 over  2017
 2019 2018  2017 $ Change  % Change $ Change % Change
Direct Revenues(1):         
Environmental Services $2,237,068 $2,141,194  $1,857,474 $ 95,874  4.5% $283,720 15.3%
Safety-Kleen 1,178,129 1,161,282  1,087,886 16,847  1.5 73,396 6.7
Corporate Items (3,007 ) (2,173 ) (382) (834) N/M (1,791 ) N/M
Total 3,412,190 3,300,303  2,944,978 111,887  3.4 355,325 12.1
Cost of Revenues(2):         
Environmental Services 1,620,038 1,576,705  1,373,789 43,333  2.7 202,916 14.8
Safety-Kleen 749,407 725,734  690,344 23,673  3.3 35,390 5.1
Corporate Items 18,374 3,112 (1,460 ) 15,262  N/M 4,572 N/M
Total 2,387,819 2,305,551  2,062,673 82,268  3.6 242,878 11.8
Selling, General and Administrative Expenses:       
Environmental Services 170,746 183,633  162,375 (12,887 ) (7.0) 21,258 13.1
Safety-Kleen 146,344 153,519  147,731 (7,175 ) (4.7) 5,788 3.9
Corporate Items 166,964 166,595  146,542 369  0.2 20,053 13.7
Total 484,054 503,747  456,648 (19,693 ) (3.9) 47,099 10.3
Adjusted EBITDA         
Environmental Services 446,284 380,856  321,310 65,428  17.2 59,546 18.5
Safety-Kleen 282,378 282,029  249,81 1 349  0.1 32,218 12.9
Corporate Items (188,345 ) (171,880 ) (145,464 ) (16,465 ) (9.6) (26,416 ) (18.2)
Total $540,317 $ 491,005  $ 425,657 $ 49,312  10.0% $65,348 15.4%
___________________________________
N/M = not meaningful
(1)Direct revenue is revenue allocated to the segment performing the provided service.
(2)Cost of revenue is shown exclusive of items presented separately on the consolidated statements of operations, which
consist of (i) accretion of environmental liabilities and (ii) depreciation and amortization.
Direct Revenues
There are many factors which have impacted and continue to impact our revenues. These factors include, but are not limited
to: overall industrial activity and growth in North America, existence or non-existence of large scale environmental waste and
remediation projects, competitive industry pricing, impacts of acquisitions and divestitures, the level of emergency response
projects, base and blended oil pricing, market changes relative to the collection of used oil, the number of parts washers placed at
customer sites and foreign currency translation. In addition, customer efforts to minimalize hazardous waste and changes in
regulation can also impact our revenues.
Environmental Services
 For the years ended December  31,  2019 over  2018  2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except percentages) 2019  2018  2017  $
Change%
Change  $
Change  %
Change
Direct revenues $2,237,068 $2,141,194 $1,857,474 $95,874 4.5% $283,720 15.3%
Environmental Services direct revenues for the year ended December 31, 2019 increased $95.9 million from the comparable
period in 2018. Greater levels of activity at our sales and service branches and improved average pricing for
30
Table Of Contents
disposal of waste streams at our incinerators drove this increase in 2019. Service related revenues increased, in part, due to $15.1
million of emergency response work associated with Field and Emergency Response revenue streams during 2019, compared to
$9.8 million during 2018. Despite a higher number of down days at our Deer Park facility in Q1 2019 as a result of a fire at a
neighboring facility, utilization at our incinerator facilities in 2019 remained relatively consistent with the prior year at
approximately 85%. A mix of higher priced waste streams resulted in an increase in direct revenues from our incinerator facilities
year over year. Average price per ton increased approximately 11% from the prior year for a $35.1 million increase in direct
revenues in 2019. These increases were partially offset by a decrease in Industrial Services revenue as we continue to focus on
selecting higher margin turnaround projects. Also impacting the year over year change in direct revenues within this segment was
the negative impact of foreign currency translation on our Canadian operations of $9.3 million.
Environmental Services direct revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $283.7 million from the comparable
period in 2017. Included in the current year revenues was $154.0 million of direct revenues from the Veolia Business, which we
acquired on February 23, 2018. Excluding the impacts from the Veolia Business, Environmental Services direct revenues increased
$129.5 million primarily due to greater levels of activity at our sales and service branches and increased levels of disposal related
revenues from improved pricing conditions and mix associated with waste streams at our incinerators in 2018. For the year ended
December 31, 2018, landfill volumes increased slightly as compared to 2017. The utilization rate at our incinerators was 86.7% on
a practical capacity of 561,721 tons for the year ended December 31, 2018, compared with 87.6% on a practical capacity of
561,721 tons in 2017. The decrease in utilization rates in 2018 was impacted by a slightly higher number of down days at our
facilities during 2018; however, impacts on the profitability of the business from an increase in down days was more than offset by
improved pricing conditions and an increase in volumes of higher margin waste streams received in 2018. The impact of foreign
currency translation on our Canadian operations within the Environmental Services segment was minimal in the year ended
December 31, 2018 as compared to 2017.
Safety-Kleen
 For the years ended December  31, 2019 over  2018  2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except percentages) 2019 2018  2017$
Change  %
Change  $
Change  %
Change
Direct revenues $1,178,129$1,161,282 $1,087,886$16,847 1.5% $73,396 6.7%
Safety-Kleen direct revenues for the year ended December 31, 2019 increased $16.8 million from the comparable period
in 2018 primarily due to growth in the business’ core service offerings and increased blended oil volumes. Revenues generated
through our core service offerings, such as handling of containerized waste and vacuum services, accounted for $22.3 million of
incremental revenues driven both by volume and pricing increases. Higher volumes of blended oil sales and increased pricing of
our used motor oil collections contributed $15.6 million and $5.2 million, respectively, to the growth in direct revenues from the
comparable period in 2018. Revenue from contract blending and packaging also increased $9.3 million due to increased volume.
These increases were partially offset by a $17.5 million decrease in base oil sales due to reductions in pricing experienced in 2019
in response to lower demand across the base oil market and lower base oil volumes, most significantly seen in the first quarter of
2019. Sales of recycled fuel oil and refinery bi-products decreased by $12.3 million from prior year due to a reduction in volume.
In 2019, parts washer services were relatively consistent with the prior year. Also included in the change within this segment was
the negative impact of foreign currency translation on our Canadian operations of $3.4 million.
Safety-Kleen direct revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $73.4 million from the comparable period in
2017 primarily due to more favorable pricing on oil products and growth in the business’ core service offerings. Revenues
generated through our core service offerings such as handling of containerized waste and vac services, parts washer services as well
as sales of automotive and industrial cleaning products accounted for $21.3 million of incremental revenues. Increased base and
blended volumes and oil pricing accounted for $34.7 million of incremental direct revenues from the comparable period in 2017.
Sales of contract packaging and blending services, refinery bi-products and recycled fuel oil also increased by $38.9 million from
the comparable period in 2017. These increases were partially offset by a decrease in used motor oil collection revenues of $19.5
million as market pricing for these services was negatively impacted as crude oil prices generally rose throughout the earlier parts
of 2018. The impact of foreign currency translation on our Canadian operations within the Safety-Kleen segment was minimal in
the year ended December 31, 2018 as compared to 2017.
Cost of Revenues
We believe that our ability to manage operating costs is important to our ability to remain price competitive. We continue to
upgrade the quality and efficiency of our services through the development of new technology and continued modifications at our
facilities, invest in new business opportunities and aggressively implement strategic sourcing and logistics solutions as well as
other cost reduction initiatives while also continuing to optimize our management and operating structure in an effort to
31
Table Of Contents
maintain and increase operating margins. These strategic cost saving actions help to reduce the impacts of naturally rising costs
such as labor and other core operating costs across our businesses.
Environmental Services
 For the years ended December  31, 2019 over  2018  2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except
percentages) 2019 2018 2017$
Change  %
Change  $
Change%
Change
Cost of revenues $1,620,038 $1,576,705 $1,373,789 $43,333 2.7 % $202,916 14.8 %
As a % of Direct revenues 72.4% 73.6% 74.0%  (1.2)%  (0.4)%
Environmental Services cost of revenues increased $43.3 million for the year ended December 31, 2019, however these costs
decreased as a percentage of direct revenue due to a mix of higher priced waste streams in our incineration network, which
increased profitability, and the results of ongoing cost reduction projects, including site consolidations. The overall cost increase
was due to compensation and benefits related costs, equipment and supply costs and transportation, outside disposal and fuel costs
which increased $20.4 million, $11.4 million and $3.9 million, respectively. The incremental operating costs were commensurate
with greater activity levels in 2019.
Environmental Services cost of revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $202.9 million from the
comparable period in 2017. The acquired Veolia Business had cost of revenues of $131.2 million in the year ended December 31,
2018. Excluding these costs, Environmental Services cost of revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $71.7
million, however these costs as a percentage of direct revenues decreased slightly over the comparable period of 2017, due to a
more favorable mix of waste streams in our incineration network which increased profitability. The overall cost increase was due to
labor and benefit related costs, transportation, disposal and fuel costs, and equipment, supply and various other expenses of $45.4
million, $16.2 million and $10.0 million, respectively. The incremental operating costs were commensurate with greater activity
levels in 2018 and overall inflationary pressure across several cost categories including certain commodity supplies such as fuel and
other supplies.
Safety-Kleen
 For the years ended December  31,  2019 over  2018 2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except
percentages) 2019 2018 2017  $
Change  %
Change$
Change  %
Change
Cost of revenues $749,407 $725,734 $690,344 $23,673 3.3%$35,390 5.1 %
As a % of Direct
revenues 63.6% 62.5% 63.5%  1.1%  (1.0)%
Safety-Kleen cost of revenues for the year ended December 31, 2019 increased $23.7 million from the comparable period in
2018. As a percentage of direct revenues, these costs increased as well mainly due to lower average pricing on the oil products sold
leading to reduced leverage of our fixed cost base. Increased logistics costs, largely due to weather at the beginning of the year, also
negatively impacted costs as a percentage of direct revenues. The overall cost increase was due to higher compensation and benefits
related costs of $8.5 million, raw material costs associated with blended oil products of $5.5 million and transportation, disposal
and fuel costs of $2.7 million. These increases were in line with the overall growth of our core service offerings and blended oil
sales.
Safety-Kleen cost of revenues for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $35.4 million from the comparable period in
2017, however these costs decreased as a percentage of revenue due to our effective management of the spread between used oil
input costs and base oil pricing, as well as the implementation of new pricing strategies, which generated greater levels of direct
revenue. The overall cost increase was primarily due to increased costs of raw materials associated with oil products of $15.8
million, increased transportation, disposal and fuel costs of $12.3 million and labor related costs of $6.3 million. These increases
were in line with the overall growth of the business and increased costs of commodities.
Selling, General and Administrative Expenses
We strive to manage our selling, general and administrative ("SG&A") expenses commensurate with the overall performance
of our segments and corresponding revenue levels. We believe that our ability to properly align these costs with business
performance is reflective of our strong management of the businesses and further promotes our ability to remain competitive in the
marketplace.
32
Table Of Contents
Environmental Services
 For the years ended December  31,  2019 over  2018 2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except percentages) 2019 2018  2017  $
Change%
Change$
Change  %
Change
SG&A expenses $170,746 $183,633 $162,375 $(12,887) (7.0)%$21,258 13.1 %
As a % of Direct revenues 7.6% 8.6% 8.7% (1.0)%  (0.1)%
Environmental Services SG&A expenses for the year ended December 31, 2019 decreased $12.9 million from the comparable
period in 2018 and SG&A as a percentage of direct revenue decreased as well. The primary driver of these decreases relates to
certain trade receivables which were reserved for in 2018 and subsequently recovered in 2019, generating a favorable difference of
nearly $13.0 million. The favorable resolution of a litigation matter further reduced SG&A expenses by $5.5 million in 2019. These
decreases were partially offset by a $5.2 million increase in compensation and benefits related costs which was consistent with the
growth of the business in 2019. Excluding the recovery of trade receivables and litigation impacts, 2019 SG&A expenses as a
percentage of direct revenues still improved over the prior year.
Environmental Services SG&A expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $21.3 million from the comparable
period in 2017, however as a percentage of direct revenues, these costs remained consistent between the two periods. The increase
in SG&A expenses was primarily due to increases in salary, benefits and variable compensation related costs of $14.7 million and
bad debt expense of $7.0 million, partially offset by cost reductions across various expense categories. The increases in salary,
benefits and variable compensation are in line with the growth of the business in 2018 as compared to 2017.
Safety-Kleen
 For the years ended December  31, 2019 over  2018  2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except percentages) 2019  2018 2017$
Change  %
Change  $
Change%
Change
SG&A expenses $146,344 $153,519 $147,731 $(7,175) (4.7)% $5,788 3.9 %
As a % of Direct revenues 12.4% 13.2% 13.6%  (0.8)% (0.4)%
Safety-Kleen SG&A expenses for the year ended December 31, 2019 decreased $7.2 million from the comparable period in
2018 and SG&A as a percentage of direct revenues decreased as well. The primary driver of these decreases is a $4.4 million
decrease in compensation and benefits related costs resulting from lower headcount and cost saving initiatives implemented by the
business throughout 2019. A reduction in legal related costs of $1.6 million also contributed to the overall decrease in SG&A
expenses.
Safety-Kleen SG&A expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $5.8 million from the comparable period in
2017, however these costs decreased as a percentage of direct revenues, as the additional direct revenues outpaced incremental
SG&A expenses. The overall increase in SG&A expenses was primarily due to increased salaries, benefits and variable
compensation of $5.7 million as we continue to grow the business.
Corporate Items
 For the years ended December  31, 2019 over  2018  2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except percentages) 2019 2018 2017$
Change%
Change  $
Change%
Change
SG&A expenses $166,964$166,595$146,542$ 369 0.2% $20,053 13.7%
Corporate Items SG&A expenses for the year ended December 31, 2019 were consistent with the comparable period in 2018.
Continued investment in our employees increased our compensation and benefits related costs by $6.6 million and stock-based
compensation increased by $1.0 million due to the achievement of certain performance metrics associated with performance based
awards. These costs were offset by a $6.9 million reduction in legal and consulting fees due to cost saving initiatives.
Corporate Items SG&A expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $20.1 million from the comparable period
in 2017 primarily due to increased salaries and benefits resulting from continued commitments to investing in our employees and
variable compensation totaling $14.8 million, as well as increased stock-based compensation of $4.3 million primarily attributable
to the achievement of performance metrics associated with performance based awards in 2018. Incremental costs associated with
the acquired Veolia Business also contributed to the increased costs.
33
Table Of Contents
Adjusted EBITDA
Management considers Adjusted EBITDA to be a measurement of performance which provides useful information to both
management and investors. Adjusted EBITDA should not be considered an alternative to net income or other measurements under
generally accepted accounting principles ("GAAP"). Adjusted EBITDA is not calculated identically by all companies and, therefore
our measurements of Adjusted EBITDA, while defined consistently and in accordance with our existing credit agreement, may not
be comparable to similarly titled measures reported by other companies.
We use Adjusted EBITDA to enhance our understanding of our operating performance, which represents our views
concerning our performance in the ordinary, ongoing and customary course of our operations. We historically have found it helpful,
and believe that investors have found it helpful, to consider an operating measure that excludes certain expenses relating to
transactions not reflective of our core operations.
The information about our operating performance provided by this financial measure is used by our management for a variety
of purposes. We regularly communicate Adjusted EBITDA results to our lenders since our loan covenants are based upon levels of
Adjusted EBITDA achieved and to our board of directors and we discuss with the board our interpretation of such results. We also
compare our Adjusted EBITDA performance against internal targets as a key factor in determining cash and equity bonus
compensation for executives and other employees, largely because we believe that this measure is indicative of how the
fundamental business is performing and is being managed.
We also provide information relating to our Adjusted EBITDA so that analysts, investors and other interested persons have the
same data that we use to assess our core operating performance. We believe that Adjusted EBITDA should be viewed only as a
supplement to the GAAP financial information. We also believe, however, that providing this information in addition to, and
together with, GAAP financial information provides a better understanding of our core operating performance and how
management evaluates and measures our performance.
The following is a reconciliation of net income to Adjusted EBITDA for the following periods (in thousands, except
percentages):
 For the years ended December  31,
 2019 2018  2017
Net income $ 97,740 $ 65,636  $ 100,739
Accretion of environmental liabilities 10,136 9,806  9,460
Depreciation and amortization 300,725 298,625  288,422
Other (income) expense, net (2,897) 4,510  6,119
Loss on early extinguishment of debt 6,131 2,488  7,891
Gain on sale of businesses (687) —  (30,732)
Interest expense, net 78,670 81,094  85,808
Provision (benefit) for income taxes 50,499 28,846  (42,050)
Adjusted EBITDA $ 540,317 $ 491,005  $ 425,657
As a % of Direct revenues 15.8% 14.9%  14.5%
Depreciation and Amortization
 For the years ended December  31, 2019 over  2018 2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except percentages) 2019  2018 2017 $ Change  % Change $ Change % Change
Depreciation of fixed assets and
amortization of landfills and
finance leases $265,531 $264,254$251,403$1,277 0.5%$12,851 5.1 %
Permits and other intangibles
amortization 35,194 34,371 37,019 823 2.4% (2,648) (7.2)%
Total depreciation and
amortization $300,725 $298,625$288,422$2,100 0.7%$10,203 3.5 %
Depreciation and amortization for the year ended December 31, 2019 remained relatively consistent with the same period in
the prior year. Depreciation and amortization for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased $10.2 million from the comparable
period in 2017, primarily due to incremental depreciation from acquisitions and a slight increase in volumes at our landfills that
drove higher landfill amortization.
34
Table Of Contents
Other Income (Expense), net
 For the years ended December  31,  2019 over  2018 2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except percentages) 2019  2018 2017  $ Change  % Change $ Change  % Change
Other income (expense), net$ 2,897 $ (4,510)$ (6,119) $ 7,407 (164.2)%$ 1,609 (26.3)%
For the year ended December 31, 2019, other income (expense), net increased $7.4 million from the comparable period in
2018 primarily due to insurance proceeds received in 2019 and smaller comparative losses recognized on sales or disposals of fixed
assets. Other income (expense), net increased $1.6 million from 2017 to 2018 primarily due to smaller losses recognized on sales or
disposals of fixed assets in 2018.
Loss on Early Extinguishment of Debt
For the years ended December  31, 2019 over  2018  2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except percentages) 2019 2018 2017 $ Change  % Change  $ Change % Change
Loss on early
extinguishment of debt $ (6,131)$ (2,488)$ (7,891)$ (3,643) 146% $ 5,403 (68.5)%
During the year ended December 31, 2019, we recorded a $6.1 million loss on early extinguishment of debt in connection
with the extinguishment of $845.0 million of unsecured senior notes due 2021 which were repaid during the current year. During
the year ended December 31, 2018, we recorded a $2.5 million loss on early extinguishment of debt in connection with the
extinguishment of the remaining $400.0 million previously outstanding senior unsecured notes. During the year ended December
31, 2017, we recorded a $7.9 million loss on early extinguishment of debt in connection with the extinguishment of $400.0 million
of the previously outstanding senior unsecured notes. The losses recognized in each of these years consisted of amounts paid in
excess of par in order to extinguish the debt prior to maturity and non-cash expenses related to the write-off of unamortized
financing costs. For additional information regarding our financing arrangements, see Note 12, "Financing Arrangements," under
Item 8, "Financial Statements and Supplementary Data," of this report.
Gain on Sale of Businesses
 For the years ended December  31, 2019 over  2018  2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except percentages) 2019  2018  2017 $ Change  % Change  $ Change % Change
Gain on sale of businesses $ 687 $ — $ 30,732$ 687 N/M  $(30,732) N/M
During the year ended December 31, 2019, we recorded a $0.7 million gain on the sale of a non-core business within our
Environmental Services segment. During the year ended December 31, 2017, we recorded a $30.7 million gain on the sale of our
Transformer Services business which had been part of our Environmental Services segment. For additional information regarding
these gains on sale of businesses, see Note 5, "Disposition of Businesses," under Item 8, "Financial Statements and Supplementary
Data," of this report.
Provision (Benefit) for Income Taxes
 For the years ended December  31, 2019 over  2018 2018 over  2017
(in thousands, except percentages) 2019  2018 2017 $ Change  % Change $ Change  % Change
Provision (benefit) for income
taxes $50,499 $28,846$(42,050)$21,653 75.1%$70,896 (168.6)%
For the year ended December 31, 2019, provision for income taxes increased $21.7 million from the comparable period in
2018 due to higher earnings in the United States and the impact from a nonrecurring $9.8 million benefit recognized in 2018 related
to the filing of then current and amended prior year tax returns in that year. The effective tax rate for 2019 was 34.1% as compared
to 30.5% in the prior year.
The income tax benefit in 2017 was primarily driven by impacts from the enactment of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the "Tax
Act") signed into law in December 2017. Impacts of the Tax Act resulted in a net benefit of $93.0 million being recorded in 2017.
Excluding the impacts of the Tax Act, a provision of $51.0 million would have been recognized.
35
Table Of Contents
Liquidity and Capital Resources    
 For the years ended December  31,
(in thousands) 2019  2018  2017
Net cash from operating activities $ 413,192 $ 373,210 $ 285,698
Net cash used in investing activities (217,856) (349,659) (203,267)
Net cash used in financing activities (53,425) (110,997) (72,760)
Net cash from operating activities
Net cash from operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $413.2 million, an increase of $40.0 million
compared to the year ended December 31, 2018. The increase was most directly attributable to greater levels of operating income
and lower working capital, partially offset by an increase in environmental spending. The reduction in working capital was
primarily attributable to the timing of interest payments associated with the debt refinancing completed in the third quarter of 2019.
Refinancing this debt changed the timing of our related interest payments from June and December to January and July.
Net cash from operating activities for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $373.2 million, an increase of $87.5 million
compared to the year ended December 31, 2017. The increase was most directly attributable to greater levels of operating income,
lower interest payments and a reduction in environmental expenditures, which was offset by higher working capital levels due to
overall growth in our business.
Net cash used in investing activities
Net cash used in investing activities for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $217.9 million, a decrease of $131.8 million
compared to the year ended December 31, 2018. This decrease was due to less cash used to fund acquisitions in 2019 and an
increase in net proceeds from sales of marketable securities, partially offset by $26.8 million of increased capital expenditure
levels, net of proceeds, primarily due to 2019 investments in facility upgrades and landfill spending.
Net cash used in investing activities for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $349.7 million, an increase of $146.4 million
compared to the year ended December 31, 2017. The change was primarily driven by the 2018 use of cash to fund acquisitions,
increased capital expenditure levels net of proceeds primarily related to sales of manufacturing assets in Western Canada, a
reduction in net purchases of marketable securities and the lack in 2018 of proceeds from sale of a business, which occurred in
2017 with the Transformer Services divestiture.
Net cash used in financing activities
Net cash used in financing activities for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $53.4 million, a decrease of $57.6 million
compared to the year ended December 31, 2018. The decrease was primarily driven by a $50.0 million reduction in net principal
payments on debt obligations in 2019 and a $23.7 million decrease in repurchases of common stock, partially offset by increased
outflows for deferred financing costs associated with debt refinancing activities in 2019 of $6.1 million, tax payments related to
withholdings on vested restricted stock of $4.2 million and changes in uncashed checks of $3.8 million.
Net cash used in financing activities for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $111.0 million, an increase of $38.2 million
compared to the year ended December 31, 2017. The primary reason for the increase in 2018 was the increase in funds used for the
net pay down of debt obligations totaling $55.8 million which occurred during the year. Offsetting this increase was decreased
outflows related to stock repurchases of $3.9 million, premiums paid on the extinguishment of debt of $4.8 million, and changes in
uncashed checks of $5.8 million.
Adjusted Free Cash Flow
Management considers adjusted free cash flow to be a measure of liquidity which provides useful information to both
management, creditors and investors about our financial strength and our ability to generate cash. Additionally, adjusted free cash
flow is a metric on which a portion of management incentive compensation is based. We define adjusted free cash flow as net cash
from operating activities excluding cash impacts of items derived from non-operating activities, such as taxes paid in connection
with divestitures, less additions to property, plant and equipment plus proceeds from sales or disposals of fixed assets. Adjusted free
cash flow should not be considered an alternative to net cash from operating activities or other measurements under GAAP.
Adjusted free cash flow is not calculated identically by all companies, and therefore our measurements of adjusted free cash flow
may not be comparable to similarly titled measures reported by other companies.
36
Table Of Contents
The following is a reconciliation from net cash from operating activities to adjusted free cash flow for the following periods
(in thousands):
 For the years ended December  31,
 2019 2018 2017
Net cash from operating activities $ 413,192$ 373,210$ 285,698
Additions to property, plant and equipment (216,324) (193,344) (167,007)
Proceeds from sale and disposal of fixed assets 11,655 15,445 7,124
Tax liability on sale of business — — 14,423
Adjusted free cash flow $ 208,523$ 195,311$ 140,238
Summary of Capital Resources
At December 31, 2019, cash and cash equivalents and marketable securities totaled $414.4 million, compared to $279.4
million at December 31, 2018. At December 31, 2019, cash and cash equivalents held by foreign subsidiaries totaled $74.5 million
and were readily convertible into other currencies including U.S. Dollars. At December 31, 2019, the cash and cash equivalents and
marketable securities balance for our U.S. operations was $339.9 million, and our U.S. operations had net operating cash flows of
$392.7 million for the year ended December 31, 2019. Additionally, we have a $400.0 million revolving credit facility, of which
approximately $229.2 million was available to borrow at December 31, 2019. Based on the above and our current plans, we believe
that our operations have adequate financial resources to satisfy their current liquidity needs.
We assess our liquidity in terms of our ability to generate cash to fund our operating, investing, and financing activities. Our
primary ongoing cash requirements will be to fund operations, capital expenditures, interest payments and investments in line with
our business strategy. We believe our future operating cash flows will be sufficient to meet our future operating and internal
investing cash needs as well as any cash needs relating to our stock repurchase program. Furthermore, our existing cash balance
and the availability of additional borrowings under our revolving credit facility provide additional potential sources of liquidity
should they be required.
Financing Arrangements
The financing arrangements and principal terms of our $545.0 million principal amount of 4.875% senior unsecured notes
due 2027 and $300.0 million principal amount of 5.125% senior unsecured notes due 2029, and $734.7 million senior secured notes
due 2024 which were outstanding at December 31, 2019, and our $400.0 million revolving credit facility, are discussed further in
Note 12, “Financing Arrangements,” to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report.
As of December 31, 2019, we were in compliance with the covenants of all of our debt agreements, and we believe we will
continue to meet such covenants.
Environmental Liabilities
 As of December  31,  2019 over  2018
(in thousands) 2019 2018  $ Change % Change
Closure and post-closure liabilities $ 75,651$ 69,931 $ 5,720 8.2 %
Remedial liabilities 114,173 121,017 (6,844) (5.7)%
Total environmental liabilities $189,824$190,948 $ (1,124) (0.6)%
Total environmental liabilities as of December 31, 2019 were $189.8 million, a decrease of $1.1 million compared to
December 31, 2018. This decrease was primarily due to expenditures of $18.7 million, partially offset by accretion of $10.1
million, changes in environmental liability estimates recorded to the consolidated balance sheet of $3.9 million and new asset
retirement obligations and liabilities assumed in acquisitions of $2.9 million.
We anticipate our environmental liabilities, substantially all of which we assumed in connection with our acquisitions, will be
payable over many years and that cash flow from operations will generally be sufficient to fund the payment of such liabilities
when required. However, events not anticipated (such as future changes in environmental laws and regulations) could require that
such payments be made earlier or in greater amounts than currently anticipated, which could adversely affect our results of
operations, cash flow and financial condition. Conversely, the development of new treatment technologies or other circumstances
may arise in the future which may reduce amounts ultimately paid.
37
Table Of Contents
During 2019, 2018 and 2017, we recognized a net benefit of $0.3 million, net charge of $2.1 million and net benefit of $0.2
million, respectively, for changes in estimates of recorded environmental liabilities. Generally, we recognize benefits primarily due
to the successful introduction of new technology for remedial activities, favorable results from environmental studies of the on-
going remediation, including favorable regulatory approvals and lower project costs realized by utilizing internal labor and
equipment. In 2018, the net increase in our environmental liabilities from changes in estimates recorded to the consolidated
statement of operations was $2.1 million and primarily related to an increase in projected cleanup costs at third party Superfund
sites where we are a potentially responsible party.
Contractual Obligations
The following table has been included to assist in understanding our debt and similar obligations as of December 31, 2019
and our ability to meet such contractual obligations (in thousands):
   Payments due in
 Total  Less than
1 year 1-3 years  4-5 years  After  5 years
Closure, post-closure and remedial liabilities(1)$ 458,409 $ 24,300$ 51,804 $ 28,304 $ 354,001
Current and long-term obligations, at par 1,579,697 7,535 15,071 712,091 845,000
Interest on current and long-term obligations (2)477,233 71,769 142,615 127,127 135,722
Finance leases 65,222 2,733 5,618 5,720 51,151
Operating leases 187,525 50,814 69,757 38,510 28,444
Total contractual obligations $2,768,086 $ 157,151$ 284,865 $ 911,752 $1,414,318
___________________________________________
(1) The undiscounted value of closure, post-closure and remedial liabilities of $458.4 million is equivalent to the present value of
$189.8 million based on discounting of $178.5 million and the undiscounted remainder of $90.1 million to be accrued for
closure and post-closure liabilities over the remaining site lives.
(2)Interest on our variable-rate $734.7 million senior secured term loans was calculated based on the effective interest rate of that
debt as of December 31, 2019. Our interest rate swap agreements effectively fix the interest rate on $350.0 million of that
variable rate debt at an annual rate of approximately 4.67%, while the remaining balance pays interest based upon LIBOR and
an applicable margin. The assumed rate reflected in the table above for this variable rate debt after considering the swap
agreements is 4.06%.
Off-Balance Sheet Arrangements
We obtain standby letters of credit as security for financial assurances we have been required to provide to regulatory bodies
for our hazardous waste facilities and which would be called only in the event that we fail to satisfy closure, post-closure and other
obligations under the permits issued by those regulatory bodies for such licensed facilities. As of December 31, 2019, there were
$146.9 million outstanding letters of credit. See Note 12, "Financing Arrangements," to our consolidated financial statements
included in Item 8 of this report for further discussion of our standby letters of credit and other financing arrangements.
Except for our obligations under letters of credit described above and performance obligations incurred in the ordinary course
of business, we are not party to any off-balance sheet arrangements involving guarantee, contingency or similar obligations to
entities whose financial statements are not consolidated with our results, and that have or are reasonably likely to have a current or
future effect on our financial condition, changes in financial condition, revenues or expenses, results of operations, liquidity, capital
expenditures or capital resources that would be material to investors in our securities.
Capital Expenditures
In 2019, our capital expenditures, net of disposals, were $204.7 million. We anticipate that 2020 capital spending, net of
disposals, will be in the range of $215.0 million to $240.0 million, inclusive of $20.0 million to $25.0 million for the purchase of
our corporate headquarters in January 2020 and some expected capital improvements to that facility during 2020. However,
unanticipated changes in environmental regulations could require us to make significant capital expenditures for our facilities and
adversely affect our results of operations and cash flow.
38
Table Of Contents
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
The preparation of our financial statements requires us to make estimates and judgments that affect the reported amounts of
our assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses and related disclosures of contingent liabilities. Our significant accounting policies are
discussed in Note 2, "Significant Accounting Policies," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report.
We believe that, of our significant accounting policies, the following contain estimates that involve a higher degree of complexity
in their application: accounting for landfills, non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities, remedial liabilities, goodwill, permits
and other intangible assets and legal matters. Our management reviews critical accounting estimates with the Audit Committee of
our Board of Directors on an ongoing basis and as needed prior to the release of our annual financial statements.
Landfill Accounting.    We amortize landfill improvements and certain landfill-related permits over their estimated useful
lives. The units-of-consumption method is used to amortize land, landfill cell construction, asset retirement costs and remaining
landfill cells and sites. We also utilize the units-of-consumption method to record closure and post-closure obligations for landfill
cells and sites. Under the units-of-consumption method, we include future estimated construction and asset retirement costs, as well
as costs incurred to date, in the amortization base of the landfill assets. Additionally, where appropriate, as discussed below, we
include probable expansion airspace yet to be permitted in the calculation of the total remaining useful life of the landfill. If we
determine that expansion capacity should no longer be considered in calculating the recoverability of a landfill asset, we may be
required to recognize an asset impairment or incur significantly higher amortization expense. If at any time we decide to abandon
the expansion effort, the capitalized costs related to the expansion effort are expensed immediately.
Landfill Assets.    Landfill assets include the costs of landfill site acquisition, permits and cell construction incurred to date.
These amounts are amortized under the units-of-consumption method such that the asset is completely amortized when the landfill
ceases accepting waste.
Landfill Capacity.    Landfill capacity, which is the basis for the amortization of landfill assets and for the accrual of final
closure and post-closure obligations, represents total permitted airspace plus unpermitted airspace that management believes is
probable of ultimately being permitted based on established criteria. Our management applies the following criteria for evaluating
the probability of obtaining a permit for future expansion airspace at existing sites, which provides management a basis to evaluate
the likelihood of success of unpermitted expansions:
•Personnel are actively working to obtain the permit or permit modifications (land use, state and federal) necessary for
expansion of an existing landfill, and progress is being made on the project.
•Management expects to submit the application within the next year and to receive all necessary approvals to accept waste
within the next five years.
•At the time the expansion is included in management's estimate of the landfill's useful economic life, it is probable that the
required approvals will be received within the normal application and processing time periods for approvals in the
jurisdiction in which the landfill is located.
•We have a legal right to use or obtain the right to use the land associated with the expansion plan through title or lease.
•There are no significant known political, technical, legal or business restrictions or other issues that could impair the
success of such expansion.
•Management is committed to pursuing the expansion which is supported by a complete financial feasibility analysis which
demonstrates that the expansion will have a positive financial and operational impact.
•Additional airspace and related additional costs, including permitting, final closure and post-closure costs have been
estimated based on the conceptual design of the proposed expansion.
As of December 31, 2019, there were no unpermitted expansions included in management's landfill calculation. If actual
expansion airspace is significantly different from management's estimate of expansion airspace, the amortization rates used for the
units-of-consumption method would change, therefore impacting our profitability. If we determine that there is less actual
expansion airspace at a landfill, this would increase amortization expense recorded and decrease profitability, while if we determine
a landfill has more actual expansion airspace, amortization expense would decrease and profitability would increase.
Landfill Final Closure and Post-Closure Liabilities.    The balance of landfill final closure and post-closure liabilities at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 was $39.4 million and $37.8 million, respectively. We have material financial commitments for the
costs associated with requirements of the EPA and the comparable regulatory agency in Canada for landfill final closure and post-
closure activities. In the United States, the landfill final closure and post-closure requirements are established under the standards of
the EPA, and are implemented and applied on a state-by-state basis. We develop estimates for the cost of these
39
Table Of Contents
activities based on our evaluation of site-specific facts and circumstances, such as the existence of structures and other landfill
improvements that would need to be dismantled, the amount of groundwater monitoring and leachate management expected to be
performed and the length of the post-closure period as determined by the applicable regulatory agency. Included in our cost
estimates are our interpretation of current regulatory requirements and proposed regulatory changes. Such estimates may change in
the future due to various circumstances including, but not limited to, permit modifications, changes in legislation or regulations,
technological changes and results of environmental studies. We perform zero-based reviews of these estimated liabilities based
upon a planned schedule, typically every five years or sooner if the occurrence of a significant event is likely to change the timing
or amount of the currently estimated expenditures. We consider a significant event to be a new regulation or an amendment to an
existing regulation, a new permit or modification to an existing permit or a change in the market price of a significant cost item.
Our cost estimates are calculated using internal sources as well as input from third-party experts. These costs are measured at
estimated fair value using present value techniques, and therefore changes in the estimated timing of closure and post-closure
activities would affect the liability, the value of the related asset and our results of operations.
Final closure costs are the costs incurred after the site ceases to accept waste, but before the landfill is certified as closed by
the applicable state or provincial regulatory agency. These costs generally include the costs required to cap the final cell of the
landfill (if not included in cell closure), dismantle certain structures for landfills and other landfill improvements and regulation-
mandated groundwater monitoring and leachate management. Post-closure costs involve the maintenance and monitoring of a
landfill site that has been certified closed by the applicable regulatory agency. These costs generally include groundwater
monitoring and leachate management. Regulatory post-closure periods are generally 30 years after landfill closure. Final closure
and post-closure obligations are accrued on a units-of-consumption basis, such that the present value of the final closure and post-
closure obligations are fully accrued at the date the landfill discontinues accepting waste.
Non-Landfill Closure and Post-Closure Liabilities.    The balance of our non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 was $36.3 million and $32.1 million, respectively. We base estimates for non-landfill closure and
post-closure liabilities on our interpretations of existing permit and regulatory requirements for closure and post-closure
maintenance and monitoring. Our cost estimates are calculated using internal sources as well as input from third-party experts. We
estimate when future operations will cease and inflate the current cost of closing the non-landfill facility using the appropriate
inflation rate and then discounting the future value to arrive at an estimated present value of closure and post-closure costs. The
estimates for non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities are inherently uncertain due to the possibility that permit and
regulatory requirements will change in the future, impacting the estimation of total costs and the timing of the expenditures. We
review non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities for changes to key assumptions that would impact the amount of the
recorded liabilities. Changes that would prompt us to revise a liability estimate include changes in legal requirements that impact
our expected closure plan or scope of work, in the market price of a significant cost item, in estimates as to when future operations
may cease or in the expected timing of the cost expenditures. Changes in estimates for non-landfill closure and post-closure events
immediately impact the required liability and the value of the corresponding asset. If a change is made to a fully-amortized asset,
the adjustment is charged immediately to expense. When a change in estimate relates to an asset that has not been fully amortized,
the adjustment to the asset is recognized in income prospectively as a component of amortization. Historically, material changes to
non-landfill closure and post-closure estimates have been infrequent. See Note 10, "Closure and Post-Closure Liabilities," to our
consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report for the changes to these Landfill and Non-Landfill Closure and
Post-Closure liabilities during the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017.
Remedial Liabilities.    The balance of our remedial liabilities at December 31, 2019 and 2018 was $114.2 million and $121.0
million, respectively. See Note 11, "Remedial Liabilities," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report
for the changes to the remedial liabilities during the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018. Remedial liabilities are obligations
to investigate, alleviate and/or eliminate the effects of a release (or threat of a release) of hazardous substances into the environment
and may also include corrective action under RCRA. Our remediation obligations can be further characterized as legal, superfund,
long-term maintenance and one-time projects. Legal liabilities are typically comprised of litigation matters that involve potential
liability for certain aspects of environmental cleanup and can include third-party claims for property damage or bodily injury
allegedly arising from or caused by exposure to hazardous substances originating from our activities or operations or, in certain
cases, from the actions or inactions of other persons or companies. Superfund liabilities are typically claims alleging that we are a
potentially responsible party ("PRP") and/or are potentially liable for environmental response, removal, remediation and cleanup
costs at/or from either a facility we own or a site owned by a third-party. As described in Note 18, "Commitments and
Contingencies," to our consolidated financial statements included in Item 8 of this report, Superfund liabilities also include certain
liabilities payable to government entities for which we are potentially liable to reimburse the sellers in connection with our 2002
acquisition of substantially all of the assets of the Chemical Services Division (the "CSD assets") of Safety-Kleen Corp. Long-term
maintenance liabilities include the costs of groundwater monitoring, treatment system operations, permit fees and facility
maintenance for inactive operations. One-time projects liabilities include the costs necessary to comply with regulatory
requirements for the removal or treatment of contaminated materials.
40
Table Of Contents
Amounts recorded related to the costs required to remediate a location are determined by internal engineers and operational
personnel and incorporate input from external third parties. The estimates consider such factors as the nature and extent of
environmental contamination (if any); the terms of applicable permits and agreements with regulatory authorities as to cleanup
procedures and whether modifications to such permits and agreements will likely need to be negotiated; the cost of performing
anticipated cleanup activities based upon current technology; and in the case of Superfund and other sites where other parties will
also be responsible for a portion of the cleanup costs, the likely allocation of such costs and the ability of such other parties to pay
their share. Each quarter, our management discusses if any events have occurred or milestones have been met that would warrant
the creation of a new remedial liability or the revision of an existing remedial liability. Such events or milestones include
identification and verification as a PRP, receipt of a unilateral administrative order under Superfund or requirement for RCRA
interim corrective measures, completion of the feasibility study under Superfund or the corrective measures study under RCRA,
new or modifications to existing permits, changes in property use or a change in the market price of a significant cost item.
Remedial liabilities are inherently difficult to estimate and there is a risk that the actual quantities of contaminants could differ from
the results of the site investigation, which could materially impact the amount of our liability. It is also possible that chosen
methods of remedial solutions will not be successful and funds will be required for alternative solutions.
Remedial liabilities are discounted when the timing of the payments is estimable and the amounts are determinable, with the
exception of remedial liabilities assumed as part of an acquisition that are measured at fair value at the acquisition date.
We establish reserves for estimated environmental liabilities based on acceptable technologies when we determine the liability
is appropriate. Introductions of new technologies are subject to successful demonstration of the effectiveness of the alternative
technology and regulatory approval. We routinely review and evaluate the sites for which we have established estimated
environmental liabilities reserves to determine if there should be changes in the established reserves. The changes in estimates are
reflected as adjustments in the ordinary course of business in the period when we determine that an adjustment is appropriate as
new information becomes available. Upon demonstration of the effectiveness of the alternative technology and applicable
regulatory approval, we update our estimated cost of remediating the affected sites.
Goodwill and Other Long-Lived Assets.    Goodwill is reviewed for impairment annually as of December 31 or when events
or changes in the business environment indicate the carrying value of a reporting unit may exceed its fair value. This review is
performed by comparing the fair value of each reporting unit to its carrying value, including goodwill. If the fair value is less than
the carrying amount, a loss is recorded for the excess of the carrying value over the fair value up to the carrying amount of
goodwill.
We determine our reporting units by identifying the components of each operating segment, and then in some circumstances
aggregate components having similar economic characteristics based on quantitative and/or qualitative factors. As of December 31,
2019, we have four reporting units, consisting of Environmental Sales and Service, Environmental Facilities, Safety-Kleen Oil and
Safety-Kleen Environmental Services.
We conducted our annual impairment test of goodwill for all of our reporting units to which goodwill was allocated as of
December 31, 2019 and determined that no adjustment to the carrying value of goodwill for any reporting unit was then necessary.
In all cases the estimated fair value of each reporting unit significantly exceeded its carrying value. We measure fair value for all of
our reporting units using an income approach (a discounted cash flow analysis) which incorporates several estimates and
assumptions with varying degrees of uncertainty. The discounted cash flow analyses include estimated cash flows for a discrete
period and for a terminal period thereafter. We corroborate our estimates of fair values by also considering other factors such as the
fair value of comparable companies to businesses contained in our reporting units, as well as performing a reconciliation of the
total estimated fair value of all reporting units to our market capitalization.
Indefinite-lived intangible assets are not amortized but are reviewed for impairment annually as of December 31, or when
events or changes in the business environment indicate that the carrying value may be impaired. If the fair value of the asset is less
than the carrying amount, we perform a quantitative test to determine the fair value. The impairment loss, if any, is measured as the
excess of the carrying value of the asset over its fair value. The estimated fair values of the indefinite-lived intangibles exceeded
their carrying values at December 31, 2019. However, we will continue to monitor the performance of our indefinite-lived
intangible assets, and future events might result in an impairment of indefinite-lived intangible assets.
Our long-lived assets are carried on our financial statements based on their cost less accumulated depreciation or
amortization. Long-lived assets with finite lives are reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate
that their carrying value may not be entirely recoverable. When such factors and circumstances exist, our management compares
the projected undiscounted future cash flows associated with the related asset or group of assets to the respective carrying amounts.
The impairment loss, if any, would be measured as the excess of the carrying amount over the fair value of the asset and is recorded
in the period in which the determination is made. Any resulting impairment losses recorded by us would have an adverse impact on
our results of operations.
41
Table Of Contents
In consideration of historical goodwill impairments for our Oil and Gas Field Services and Lodging Services operations and
continued lower than historical results in the oil and gas related industries, specifically in Western Canada, we continue to monitor
the carrying value of those businesses’ long-lived assets and assess the risk of asset impairment. We concluded that no events or
circumstances have arisen during 2019 which would indicate that the carrying values of those asset groups are not recoverable.
We will continue to evaluate all of our goodwill and other long-lived assets impacted by economic downturns most
predominantly in the oil and gas related markets in which we operate. If further economic difficulties resulting from depressed oil
and gas related pricing and lower overall activity levels, particularly in our Canadian operations, continue for a significant
foreseeable period of time and thus future operating results are significantly less than current expectations, additional impairment
charges may be recognized. The market conditions which could lead to such future impairments are currently most prevalent in our
Oil and Gas Field Services and Lodging Services operations within the Environmental Sales & Services reporting unit.
Legal Matters.    As described in Note 18, "Commitments and Contingencies," to our consolidated financial statements
included in Item 8 of this report, we are subject to legal proceedings which relate to our past acquisitions or which have arisen in
the ordinary course of business. Accruals are established for legal matters when, in our opinion, it is probable that a liability exists
and the liability can be reasonably estimated. As of December 31, 2019, we had reserves of $26.0 million consisting of (i) $18.4
million related to pending legal or administrative proceedings, including Superfund liabilities, which were included in remedial
liabilities on the consolidated balance sheets and (ii) $7.6 million primarily related to legal claims as well as federal, state and
provincial enforcement actions, which were included in accrued expenses on the consolidated balance sheets. In management's
opinion, it is not reasonably possible that the potential liability in excess of what is recorded, if any, that may result from these
actions, either individually or collectively, will have a material effect on our financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
42
Table Of Contents
ITEM 7A.    QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
In the normal course of business, we are exposed to market risks, including changes in interest rates and certain foreign
currency rates, primarily relating to the Canadian dollar. Our philosophy in managing interest rate risk is to maintain a debt
portfolio inclusive of both variable and fixed-rate debt so as to limit our interest expense and exposure to interest rate volatility. In
2018, we entered into interest rate swap agreements with the intention of hedging interest rate exposure on a portion of our
outstanding LIBOR-based variable rate senior secured term loans. Under the terms of the swaps, we receive interest based on the 1-
month LIBOR index and pay interest at a weighted average rate of approximately 2.92% on an initial notional amount of $350.0
million. When combined with the 1.75% interest rate margin for Eurocurrency borrowings, the effective annual interest rate on
such $350.0 million aggregate principal amount of term loans is therefore approximately 4.67%.
We designated our interest rate swap agreements as effective cash flow hedges at inception, and therefore the change in fair
value is recorded in stockholders' equity as a component of accumulated other comprehensive loss and included in interest expense
at the same time as interest expense is affected by the hedged transactions. Differences paid or received over the life of the
agreements are recorded as additions to or reductions of interest expense on the underlying debt.
The following table provides information regarding our fixed and variable rate borrowings at December 31, 2019 (in
thousands):
Scheduled Maturity Dates 2020 2021  2022  2023 2024  Ther eafter  Total
Senior secured term loans due 2024 $7,535$7,535 $7,535 $7,535$704,557 $ — $ 734,697
Unsecured senior notes due 2027 — — — — — 545,000 545,000
Unsecured senior notes due 2029 — — — — — 300,000 300,000
Long term obligations, at par $7,535$7,535 $7,535 $7,535$704,557 $845,000 $1,579,697
The interest rate on the $545.0 million senior unsecured notes due July 15, 2027 is fixed at 4.875%. Interest payments on this
debt are due semiannually on January 15 and July 15 in the amount of $13.2 million upon each date commencing January 15, 2020.
The interest rate on the $300.0 million senior unsecured notes due July 15, 2029 is fixed at 5.125%. Interest payments on these
$300.0 million notes are also due semiannually on January 15 and July 15 in the amount of $7.6 million upon each date
commencing on January 15, 2020.
We continue to have interest rate risk relative to the portion of our term loans which exceeds the $350.0 million of principal
which is subject to our interest rate swap agreement. As of December 31, 2019, $384.7 million of those term loans was subject to
variable interest rate risk. The effective interest rate on the variable portion of the term loans as of December 31, 2019 was 3.55%.
Should the average interest rate on the variable rate portion of our long-term obligations change by 100 basis points, we estimate
that our annual interest expense would change by up to approximately $3.8 million.
In addition to the fixed and variable rate borrowings described in the above table, we have a revolving credit agreement with
maximum borrowings of up to $400.0 million (with a $325.0 million sub-limit for letters of credit), under which no borrowings
were outstanding at December 31, 2019.
We view our investment in our foreign subsidiaries as long-term; thus, we have not entered into any hedging transactions
between any two foreign currencies or between any of the foreign currencies and the U.S. Dollar. Given our significant investment
in Canada and the fluctuations that have and can occur between the U.S. Dollar and Canadian Dollar exchange rates, significant
movements in cumulative translation adjustment amounts recorded as a component of other comprehensive income (loss) can occur
in any given period.
During 2019, our Canadian subsidiaries transacted a portion of their business in U.S. Dollars and at any period end had cash
on deposit in U.S. Dollars and outstanding U.S. Dollar accounts receivable related to those transactions. Those cash and receivable
amounts are vulnerable to foreign currency transaction gains or losses. Exchange rate movements also affect the translation of
Canadian generated profits and losses into U.S. Dollars. Had the Canadian Dollar been 10.0% stronger or weaker against the U.S.
Dollar, we would have reported increased or decreased net income of $5.3 million and $4.8 million for the years ended
December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
43
Table Of Contents
ITEM 8.    FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of Clean Harbors, Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Clean Harbors, Inc. and subsidiaries (the "Company") as of
December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, cash flows and
stockholders’ equity, for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, and the related notes and the schedule
listed in the Index at Item 15 (collectively referred to as the "financial statements"). In our opinion, the financial statements present
fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, and the results of its
operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, in conformity with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on criteria established in
Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission and our report dated February 26, 2020, expressed an unqualified opinion on the Company's internal control over
financial reporting.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company's financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required
to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error
or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements,
whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test
basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the
accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the
financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current-period audit of the financial statements that was
communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are
material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The
communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the financial statements, taken as a whole, and we
are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the
accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Remedial Liabilities - Refer to Note 2, Significant Accounting Policies, and Note 11, Remedial Liabilities, to the financial
statements
Critical Audit Matter Description
Remedial liabilities include the costs of removal or containment of contaminated material, the treatment of potentially
contaminated groundwater and maintenance and monitoring costs necessary to comply with regulatory requirements. Most of the
Company's remedial liabilities relate to the active and inactive hazardous waste treatment and disposal facilities which the
Company acquired and Superfund sites owned by third parties for which the Company, or the prior owners of certain of the
Company's facilities, may have certain indemnification obligations. The Company's estimate of remedial liabilities involved an
analysis of such factors as: (i) the nature and extent of environmental contamination (if any); (ii) the terms of applicable permits
and agreements with regulatory authorities as to cleanup procedures and whether modifications to such permits and agreements will
likely need to be negotiated; (iii) the cost of performing anticipated cleanup activities based upon current technology; and (iv) in the
case of Superfund and other sites where other parties will also be responsible for a portion of the cleanup costs, the likely allocation
of such costs and the ability of such other parties to satisfy the costs which have been apportioned to these other parties.
44
Table Of Contents
Remedial liabilities are inherently difficult to estimate and involve a significant amount of judgment. Estimating remedial liabilities
requires that the existing environmental contamination be understood. There are risks that the actual quantities of contaminants
differ from the results of the site investigation, and that contaminants exist that have not been identified by the site investigation. In
addition, the amount of remedial liabilities recorded is dependent on the remedial method selected. There is a risk that funds will be
expended on a remedial solution that is not successful, which could result in the Company incurring incremental costs of an
alternative solution.
The Company routinely reviews and evaluates the sites for which remedial liabilities have been recognized to determine if there
should be changes in the cost estimates. As a result, the valuation of liabilities is subject to material changes as additional
information becomes available, particularly as it relates to changes in technologies and changes in laws and regulations that govern
the remediation efforts.
Total remedial liabilities recorded as of December 31, 2019 were $114.2 million.
Given the subjectivity and judgment involved in measuring remedial liabilities due to the (i) uncertainty as to the types and
quantities of contaminants to be remediated, (ii) the stage of remediation and extended period over which the remediation efforts
are expected to occur, (iii) complexities and uncertainties of the selection of the method of remediation and inherent variability in
the efficacy of the selected remediation efforts, and (iv) understanding the effects on the estimates due to changes in technology and
changes in laws and regulations, auditing remedial liabilities involved especially subjective judgment and an increased extent of
effort, including the need to involve our specialists who have expertise in environmental remediation.
How the Critical Audit Matter Was Addressed in the Audit
Our audit procedures related to the remedial liabilities included the following, among others:
•We tested the effectiveness of controls related to the recognition and measurement of remedial liabilities, including those
controls over changes in estimates.
•We evaluated management’s ability to accurately forecast future cash flows by comparing actual results to management’s
historical forecasts through retrospective reviews.
•We evaluated the methods and assumptions used by management to estimate the remedial liabilities by confirming specific
facts and circumstances related to a selection of sites with project managers and other Company personnel responsible for
monitoring these sites, including internal and external counsel.
•With the assistance of auditor specialists who have expertise in environmental matters and specialized skills and training,
we evaluated the reasonableness of the Company’s estimates by:
◦Searching for information in the public domain for completeness of sites identified for remediation.
◦Assessing the completeness of the Company’s costs estimate for a selection of sites, specifically, comparing the
costs estimates to relevant regulatory guidelines and specifications.
◦Testing the accuracy of the amounts recorded for a selection of sites, specifically, verifying the mathematical
accuracy of the calculation, agreeing cost components to supporting documents, and/or developing an
independent range of cost estimates.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Boston, Massachusetts
February 26, 2020
We have served as the Company's auditor since 2005.
45
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(dollars in thousands)
 As of December 31,
 2019  2018
ASSETS   
Curr ent assets:    
Cash and cash equivalents $ 371,991  $ 226,507
Short-term marketable securities 42,421  52,856
Accounts receivable, net of allowances aggregating $38,71 1 and $44,315, respectively 644,738  606,952
Unbilled accounts receivable 56,326  54,794
Deferred costs 21,746  18,770
Inventories and supplies 214,744  199,479
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 48,942  42,800
Total current assets 1,400,908  1,202,158
Property , plant and equipment, net 1,588,151  1,561,978
Other  assets:    
Operating lease right-of-use assets 162,206  —
Goodwill 525,013  514,189
Permits and other intangibles, net 419,066  441,875
Other 13,560  18,121
Total other assets 1,119,845  974,185
Total assets $4,108,904  $3,738,321
   
LIABILITIES AND ST OCKHOLDERS' EQUITY   
Curr ent liabilities:    
Current portion of long-term obligations $ 7,535  $ 7,535
Accounts payable 298,375  276,461
Deferred revenue 73,370  61,843
Accrued expenses 276,540  233,405
Current portion of closure, post-closure and remedial liabilities 23,301  23,034
Current portion of operating lease liabilities 40,979  —
Total current liabilities 720,100  602,278
Other  liabilities:    
Closure and post-closure liabilities, less current portion of $7,283 and $9,592, respectively 68,368  60,339
Remedial liabilities, less current portion of $16,018 and $13,442, respectively 98,155  107,575
Long-term obligations, less current portion 1,554,1 16 1,565,021
Operating lease liabilities, less current portion 121,020  —
Deferred taxes, unrecognized tax benefits and other long-term liabilities 277,332  233,352
Total other liabilities 2,118,991  1,966,287
Commitments and contingent liabilities (See Note 18)  
Stockholders' equity:    
Common stock, $0.01 par value:    
Authorized 80,000,000 shares; issued and outstanding 55,797,734 and 55,847,261 shares, respectively 558  558
Additional paid-in capital 644,412  655,415
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (210,051 ) (223,371 )
Accumulated earnings 834,894  737,154
Total stockholders' equity 1,269,813  1,169,756
Total liabilities and stockholders' equity $4,108,904  $3,738,321
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
46
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(in thousands except per share amounts)
 For the years ended December 31,
 2019  2018  2017
Revenues:     
Service revenues $2,842,881 $2,709,239 $2,398,650
Product revenues 569,309 591,064 546,328
Total revenues 3,412,190 3,300,303 2,944,978
Cost of revenues: (exclusive of items shown separately below)     
Service revenues 1,945,021 1,861,975 1,641,798
Product revenues 442,798 443,576 420,875
Total cost of revenues 2,387,819 2,305,551 2,062,673
Selling, general and administrative expenses 484,054 503,747 456,648
Accretion of environmental liabilities 10,136 9,806 9,460
Depreciation and amortization 300,725 298,625 288,422
Income from operations 229,456 182,574 127,775
Other income (expense), net 2,897 (4,510) (6,119)
Loss on early extinguishment of debt (6,131) (2,488) (7,891)
Gain on sale of businesses 687 — 30,732
Interest expense, net of interest income of $4,227, $2,958 and $1,897, respectively (78,670) (81,094) (85,808)
Income before provision (benefit) for income taxes 148,239 94,482 58,689
Provision (benefit) for income taxes 50,499 28,846 (42,050)
Net income $ 97,740 $ 65,636 $ 100,739
Earnings per share:      
Basic $ 1.75 $ 1.17 $ 1.77
Diluted $ 1.74 $ 1.16 $ 1.76
Shares used to compute earnings per share — Basic 55,845 56,148 57,072
Shares used to compute earnings per share — Diluted 56,129 56,340 57,200
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
47
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(in thousands)
 For the years ended December 31,
 2019 2018 2017
Net income $ 97,740$ 65,636$ 100,739
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax:    
Unrealized (losses) gains on available-for-sale securities (120) 77 32
Reclassification adjustment for losses on available-for-sale securities included
in net income 332 — 143
Unrealized loss on interest rate hedge (14,401) (9,579) —
Reclassification adjustment for losses on interest rate hedge included in net
income 2,335 806 —
Foreign currency translation adjustments 25,130 (42,350) 41,636
Unfunded pension liability 44 82 108
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax 13,320 (50,964) 41,919
Comprehensive income $ 111,060$ 14,672$ 142,658
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
48
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(in thousands)
 For the years ended December  31,
 2019 2018  2017
Cash flows from operating activities:     
Net income $ 97,740 $ 65,636  $ 100,739
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash from operating activities:     
Depreciation and amortization 300,725 298,625  288,422
Allowance for doubtful accounts 2,408 15,817  7,901
Amortization of deferred financing costs and debt discount 3,809 3,846  3,482
Accretion of environmental liabilities 10,136 9,806  9,460
Changes in environmental liability estimates (332) 2,147  (195)
Deferred income taxes 8,005 19,089  (83,335 )
Other (income) expense, net (2,897 ) 4,510  6,119
Stock-based compensation 17,816 16,792  13,146
Gain on sale of businesses (687) — (30,732 )
Loss on early extinguishment of debt 6,131 2,488  7,891
Environmental expenditures (18,701 ) (10,115) (12,965 )
   Changes in assets and liabilities, net of acquisitions:     
      Accounts receivable and unbilled accounts receivable (33,271 ) (79,563 ) (33,764 )
      Inventories and supplies (15,869 ) (26,958 ) (5,002 )
      Other current assets (14,421 ) (7,946 ) 16,720
      Accounts payable 7,153 46,915  (10,684 )
      Other current and long-term liabilities 45,447 12,121  8,495
Net cash from operating activities 413,192 373,210  285,698
Cash flows used in investing activities:     
Additions to property , plant and equipment (216,324 ) (193,344 ) (167,007 )
Proceeds from sale and disposal of fixed assets 11,655 15,445  7,124
Acquisitions, net of cash acquired (29,363 ) (151,023 ) (49,227 )
Additions to intangible assets including costs to obtain or renew permits (3,904 ) (4,688 ) (1,617 )
Purchases of available-for -sale securities (35,836 ) (44,772 ) (38,342 )
Proceeds from sale of available-for -sale securities 51,202 28,723  376
Proceeds from sale of businesses, net of transactional costs 4,714 — 45,426
Net cash used in investing activities (217,856 ) (349,659 ) (203,267 )
Cash flows used in financing activities:     
Change in uncashed checks (3,705 ) 132  (5,940 )
Proceeds from exercise of stock options — — 46
Tax payments related to withholdings on vested restricted stock (7,429 ) (3,266 ) (3,149 )
Repurchases of common stock (21,390 ) (45,080 ) (48,971 )
Deferred financing costs paid (10,079 ) (4,027 ) (5,718 )
Payments on finance leases (586) — —
Premiums paid on early extinguishment of debt (2,701 ) (1,238 ) (6,028 )
Principal payments on debt (852,535 ) (405,768 ) (402,000 )
Proceeds from issuance of debt, net of discount 845,000 348,250  399,000
Borrowing from revolving credit facility — 50,000  —
Payment on revolving credit facility — (50,000 ) —
Net cash used in financing activities (53,425 ) (110,997 ) (72,760 )
Effect of exchange rate change on cash 3,573 (5,446 ) 2,731
Increase (decrease) in cash and cash equivalents 145,484 (92,892 ) 12,402
Cash and cash equivalents, beginning of year 226,507 319,399  306,997
Cash and cash equivalents, end of year $ 371,991 $ 226,507  $ 319,399
Supplemental information:     
Cash payments for interest and income taxes:     
Interest paid $ 60,852 $ 89,171  $ 93,174
Income taxes paid 27,035 20,036  18,682
Non-cash investing activities:     
Property , plant and equipment accrued 30,964 15,657  16,109
Transfer of inventory to property , plant and equipment — — 12,641
Payable for estimated purchase price adjustment — 4,032  —
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
49
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
(in thousands)
 Common StockShares Held
Under
Employee
Participation
PlanAdditional
Paid-in
Capital Accumulated
Other
Comprehensive
Loss  
Total
Stockholders'
Equity  Number of
Shares$0.01 Par
Value  Accumulated
Earnings 
Balance at January 1, 2017 57,298 $ 573 $ (469)$725,670 $ (214,326)$ 572,793 $1,084,241
Net income — — — — — 100,739 100,739
Cumulative effect of change in accounting for
stock based compensation — — — 681 — (450) 231
Other comprehensive income — — — — 41,919 — 41,919
Stock-based compensation — — — 13,146 — — 13,146
Issuance of common stock for restricted share
vesting, net of employee tax withholding 133 1 — (3,150) — — (3,149)
Exercise of stock options 2 — — 46 — — 46
Repurchases of common stock (907) (9) — (48,962) — — (48,971)
Shares held under employee participation plan (25) — 469 (469) — — —
Balance at December 31, 2017 56,501 565 — 686,962 (172,407) 673,082 1,188,202
Net income — — — — — 65,636 65,636
Cumulative effect of change in accounting
principle — — — — — (1,564) (1,564)
Other comprehensive loss — — — — (50,964) — (50,964)
Stock-based compensation — — — 16,792 — — 16,792
Issuance of common stock for restricted share
vesting, net of employee tax withholding 160 1 — (3,267) — — (3,266)
Repurchases of common stock (814) (8) — (45,072) — — (45,080)
Balance at December 31, 2018 55,847 558 — 655,415 (223,371) 737,154 1,169,756
Net income — — — — — 97,740 97,740
Other comprehensive income — — — — 13,320 — 13,320
Stock-based compensation — — — 17,816 — — 17,816
Issuance of common stock for restricted share
vesting, net of employee tax withholding 249 3 — (7,432) — — (7,429)
Repurchases of common stock (298) (3) — (21,387) — — (21,390)
Balance at December 31, 2019 55,798 $ 558 $ — $644,412 $ (210,051)$ 834,894 $1,269,813
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these consolidated financial statements.
50
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
(1) OPERATIONS
Clean Harbors, Inc., through its subsidiaries (collectively, the "Company"), is a leading provider of environmental, energy
and industrial services throughout North America. The Company is also the largest re-refiner and recycler of used oil and the
largest provider of parts cleaning and related environmental services to commercial, industrial and automotive customers in North
America.
(2) SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
The accompanying consolidated financial statements of the Company reflect the application of certain significant accounting
policies as described below:
Principles of Consolidation
The accompanying consolidated statements include the accounts of Clean Harbors, Inc. and its majority-owned subsidiaries.
All intercompany accounts and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation.
Use of Estimates
The preparation of consolidated financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the
United States of America requires management to make estimates and assumptions, which are evaluated on an ongoing basis, that
affect the amounts reported in the Company's consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes. Management bases its
estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions it believes to be reasonable at the time under the
circumstances, the results of which form the basis for making judgments about the carrying values of assets and liabilities and
disclosure, if any, of contingent assets and liabilities and reported amounts of revenues and expenses. Actual results could differ
from those estimates and judgments.
Cash, Cash Equivalents and Uncashed Checks
Cash consists primarily of cash on deposit and money market accounts. Marketable securities with maturities of three months
or less from the date of purchase are classified as cash equivalents. The Company's cash management program with its revolving
credit lender allows for the maintenance of a zero balance in the U.S. bank disbursement accounts that are used to issue vendor and
payroll checks. The program can result in checks outstanding in excess of bank balances in the disbursement accounts. When
checks are presented to the bank for payment, cash deposits in amounts sufficient to fund the checks are made, at the Company's
discretion, either from funds provided by other accounts or under the terms of the Company's revolving credit facility. Therefore,
until checks are presented for payment, there is no right of offset by the bank and the Company continues to have control over cash
relating to both released as well as unreleased checks. Checks that have been written to vendors or employees but have not yet been
presented for payment at the Company's bank are classified as uncashed checks as part of accounts payable and changes in the
balance are reported as a financing activity in the consolidated statements of cash flows.
Marketable Securities
The Company, through its wholly-owned captive insurance subsidiary, invests in marketable securities consisting of U.S.
Treasury securities, corporate notes and bonds and commercial paper. As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the Company had total
marketable securities and cash equivalents as follows (in thousands):
 December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
Commercial paper $ 2,395$ 8,126
     Total cash equivalents 2,395 8,126
U.S. Treasury securities 12,406 10,133
Corporate notes and bonds 26,678 38,036
Commercial paper 3,337 4,687
     Total short-term marketable securities 42,421 52,856
Total financial assets $ 44,816$ 60,982
51
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Realized gains and losses on sales of available-for-sale marketable securities in the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and
2017 were immaterial. The majority of the marketable securities have a remaining maturity of less than one year and fair value
approximates cost.
Allowances for Doubtful Accounts
On a regular basis, the Company evaluates its accounts receivable and establishes the allowance for doubtful accounts based
on an evaluation of certain criteria and evidence of collection certainty including historical collection trends, current economic
trends and changes in customer payment patterns. Past-due receivable balances are written off when the Company's internal
collection efforts have been deemed unsuccessful in collecting the outstanding balance due.
Credit Concentration
Concentration of credit risks in accounts receivable is limited due to the large number of customers comprising the
Company's customer base throughout North America. The Company maintains policies over credit extension that include credit
evaluations, credit limits and collection monitoring procedures on a customer-by-customer basis. However, the Company generally
does not require collateral before services are performed. No individual customer accounted for more than 10% of accounts
receivable or more than 10% of total direct revenues in the periods presented.
Inventories and Supplies
Inventories are stated at the lower of cost or market. The cost of oil and oil products is principally determined on a first-in,
first-out ("FIFO") basis. The cost of supplies and drums, solvent and solution and other inventories is determined on a FIFO or a
weighted average cost basis. The Company continually reviews its inventories for obsolete or unsalable items and adjusts its
carrying value to reflect estimated realizable values.
Property, Plant and Equipment, net (excluding landfill assets)
Property, plant and equipment, net is stated at cost less accumulated depreciation. Expenditures for major renewals and
improvements which extend the life or usefulness of the asset are capitalized. Items of an ordinary repair or maintenance nature are
charged directly to operating expense as incurred. Gains and losses on the sale of property, plant and equipment are included in
other income (expense), net. During the construction and development period of an asset, the costs incurred are classified as
construction-in-progress.
The Company depreciates and amortizes the capitalized cost of these assets, using the straight-line method as follows:
Asset Classification Estimated Useful Life
Buildings and building improvements  
Buildings 20-42 years
Leasehold and building improvements 2-45 years
Camp and lodging equipment 8-15 years
Vehicles 2-15 years
Equipment  
Capitalized software and computer equipment 3-5 years
Containers and railcars 8-16 years
All other equipment 4-30 years
Furniture and fixtures 5-8 years
The Company recognizes an impairment in the carrying value of long-lived assets when the expected future undiscounted
cash flows derived from the assets, or group of assets, are less than their carrying value. The Company did not record any
impairment charges related to long-lived assets in any of the periods presented.
Goodwill
Goodwill is comprised of the purchase price of business acquisitions in excess of the fair value of the net assets acquired.
Goodwill is reviewed for impairment annually as of December 31, or when events or circumstances indicate that the carrying value
of the reporting unit may exceed its fair value. If the carrying value of a reporting unit exceeds the fair value, an
52
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
impairment loss will be recognized in an amount equal to that excess, limited to the total amount of goodwill allocated to that
reporting unit. The Company did not recognize any impairment losses in any of the periods presented. See Note 8, "Goodwill and
Other Intangible Assets," for additional information related to the Company's goodwill impairment tests.
Permits and Other Intangibles
Costs related to acquiring licenses, permits and intangible assets, such as legal fees, site surveys, engineering costs and other
expenditures are capitalized. Other intangible assets consist primarily of customer and supplier relationships, trademarks and trade
names and non-compete agreements.
Permits relating to landfills are amortized on a units-of-consumption basis. All other permits are amortized over periods
ranging from 5 to 30 years on a straight-line basis. Finite-lived intangible assets are amortized on a straight-line basis over their
respective useful lives, which range from 5 to 20 years.
All finite-lived intangible assets are reviewed for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the
carrying value may not be recoverable. When such factors and circumstances exist, management compares the projected
undiscounted future cash flows associated with the related asset or group of assets to the carrying amount. The impairment loss, if
any, is measured as the excess of the carrying amount over the fair value of the asset or group of assets.
Indefinite-lived intangible assets are not amortized but are reviewed for impairment annually as of December 31, or when
events or changes in the business environment indicate that the carrying value may be impaired. If the fair value of the asset is less
than the carrying amount, the impairment loss is measured as the excess of the carrying value of the asset over its fair value.
Landfill Accounting
The Company amortizes landfill improvements and certain landfill-related permits over the estimated useful lives. The units-
of-consumption method is used to amortize land, landfill cell construction, asset retirement costs and remaining landfill cells and
sites. The Company also utilizes the units-of-consumption method to record closure and post-closure obligations for landfill cells
and sites. Under the units-of-consumption method, the Company includes future estimated construction and asset retirement costs,
as well as costs incurred to date, in the amortization base of the landfill assets. Additionally, where appropriate, as described below,
the Company includes probable expansion airspace that has yet to be permitted in the calculation of the total remaining useful life
of the landfill. If it is determined that expansion capacity should no longer be considered in calculating the recoverability of a
landfill asset, the Company may be required to recognize an asset impairment or incur significantly higher amortization expense. If
at any time the Company makes the decision to abandon the expansion effort, the capitalized costs related to the expansion effort
are expensed immediately.
Landfill assets—Landfill assets include the costs of landfill site acquisition, permits and cell construction incurred to date.
These amounts are recorded at cost, which includes capitalized interest as applicable. Landfill assets, net of amortization, are
combined with management's estimate of the costs required to complete construction of the landfill to determine the amount to be
amortized over the remaining estimated useful economic life of a site. Amortization of landfill assets is recorded on a units-of-
consumption basis, such that the landfill assets should be completely amortized at the date the landfill ceases accepting waste.
Amortization totaled $12.3 million, $10.3 million and $9.5 million for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017,
respectively. Changes in estimated costs to complete construction are applied prospectively to the amortization rate.
Landfill capacity—Landfill capacity, which is the basis for the amortization of landfill assets and for the accrual of final
closure and post-closure obligations, represents total permitted airspace plus unpermitted airspace that management believes is
probable of ultimately being permitted based on established criteria. The Company applies the following criteria for evaluating the
probability of obtaining a permit for future expansion airspace at existing sites, which provides management a basis to evaluate the
likelihood of success of unpermitted expansions:
•Personnel are actively working to obtain the permit or permit modifications (land use, state and federal) necessary for
expansion of an existing landfill, and progress is being made on the project.
•Management expects to submit the application within the next year and to receive all necessary approvals to accept waste
within the next five years.
•At the time the expansion is included in management's estimate of the landfill's useful economic life, it is probable that the
required approvals will be received within the normal application and processing time periods for approvals in the
jurisdiction in which the landfill is located.
53
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
•We have a legal right to use or obtain the right to use the land associated with the expansion plan through title or lease.
•There are no significant known political, technical, legal or business restrictions or other issues that could impair the
success of such expansion.
•Management is committed to pursuing the expansion which is supported by a complete financial feasibility analysis which
demonstrates that the expansion will have a positive financial and operational impact.
•Additional airspace and related additional costs, including permitting, final closure and post-closure costs have been
estimated based on the conceptual design of the proposed expansion.
As of December 31, 2019, there were no unpermitted expansions included in the Company's landfill accounting model. If
actual expansion airspace is significantly different from management's estimate of expansion airspace, the amortization rates used
for the units-of-consumption method would change, therefore impacting our profitability. If we determine that there is less actual
expansion airspace at a landfill, this would increase amortization expense recorded and decrease profitability, while if we determine
a landfill has more actual expansion airspace, amortization expense would decrease and profitability would increase.
As of December 31, 2019, the Company had 11 active landfill sites (including the Company's two non-commercial landfills),
which have estimated remaining lives (based on anticipated waste volumes and remaining highly probable airspace) as follows:
   Remaining
Lives
(Years)  Remaining Highly Probable Airspace
(cubic yards) (in thousands)
Facility Name Location  Permitted Unpermitted Total
Altair Texas  2  179 — 179
Buttonwillow California  23  5,982 — 5,982
Deer Park Texas  3  103 — 103
Deer Trail Colorado  28  1,697 — 1,697
Grassy Mountain Utah  43  4,909 — 4,909
Kimball Nebraska  7  165 — 165
Lambton Ontario, Canada  60  4,710 — 4,710
Lone Mountain Oklahoma  23  3,905 — 3,905
Ryley Alberta  5  653 — 653
Sawyer North Dakota  69  3,459 — 3,459
Westmorland California  64  2,732 — 2,732
     28,494 — 28,494
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the Company had no cubic yards of permitted, but not highly probable, airspace.
The following table presents the remaining highly probable airspace from January 1, 2017 through December 31, 2019 (in
thousands of cubic yards):
 2019  2018 2017
Remaining capacity at January 1, 29,760 31,113 32,228
Changes in highly probable airspace, net — (223) —
Consumed (1,266) (1,130) (1,115)
Remaining capacity at December 31, 28,494 29,760 31,113
Amortization of cell construction costs and accrual of cell closure obligations—Landfills are typically comprised of a
number of cells, which are constructed within a defined acreage (or footprint). The cells are typically discrete units, which require
both separate construction and separate capping and closure procedures. Cell construction costs are the costs required to excavate
and construct the landfill cell. These costs are typically amortized on a units-of-consumption basis, such that they are completely
amortized when the specific cell ceases accepting waste. In some instances, the Company has landfills that are engineered and
constructed as "progressive trenches." In progressive trench landfills, a number of contiguous cells form a progressive trench. In
those instances, the Company amortizes cell construction costs over the airspace within the entire trench, such that the cell
construction costs will be fully amortized at the end of the trench useful life.
54
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The design and construction of a landfill does not create a landfill asset retirement obligation. Rather, the asset retirement
obligation for cell closure (the cost associated with capping each cell) is incurred in relatively small increments as waste is placed
in the landfill. Therefore, the cost required to construct the cell cap is capitalized as an asset retirement cost and a liability of an
equal amount is established, based on the discounted cash flow associated with each capping event, as airspace is consumed.
Spending for cell capping is reflected as environmental expenditures within operating activities in the consolidated statements of
cash flows.
Landfill final closure and post-closure liabilities—The balance of landfill final closure and post-closure liabilities at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 was $39.4 million and $37.8 million, respectively. The Company has material financial commitments
for the costs associated with requirements of the Environmental Protection Agency ("EPA") and the comparable regulatory agency
in Canada for landfill final closure and post-closure activities. In the United States, the landfill final closure and post-closure
requirements are established under the standards of the EPA, and are implemented and applied on a state-by-state basis. The
Company develops estimates for the cost of these activities based on an evaluation of site-specific facts and circumstances,
including the Company's interpretation of current regulatory requirements and proposed regulatory changes. Such estimates may
change in the future due to various circumstances including, but not limited to, permit modifications, changes in legislation or
regulations, technological changes and results of environmental studies.
Final closure costs are the costs incurred after the site ceases to accept waste, but before the landfill is certified as closed by
the applicable state regulatory agency. These costs generally include the costs required to cap the final cell of the landfill (if not
included in cell closure), the costs required to dismantle certain structures for landfills and other landfill improvements, and
regulation-mandated groundwater monitoring and leachate management. Post-closure costs involve the maintenance and
monitoring of a landfill site that has been certified closed by the applicable regulatory agency. These costs generally include
groundwater monitoring and leachate management. Regulatory post-closure periods are generally 30 years after landfill closure.
Final closure and post-closure obligations are accrued on a units-of-consumption basis, such that the present value of the final
closure and post-closure obligations are fully accrued at the date the landfill discontinues accepting waste.
Cell closure, final closure and post-closure costs (also referred to as "asset retirement obligations") are calculated by
estimating the total obligation in current dollars, adjusted for inflation (1.02% during both 2019 and 2018) and discounted at the
Company's credit-adjusted risk-free interest rate (6.02% and 5.66% during 2019 and 2018, respectively).
Non-Landfill Closure and Post-Closure Liabilities
The balance of non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities at December 31, 2019 and 2018 was $36.3 million and $32.1
million, respectively. Non-landfill closure and post-closure obligations arise when the Company commences non-landfill facility
operations and include costs required to dismantle and decontaminate certain structures and other costs incurred during the closure
process. Post-closure costs, if required, include associated maintenance and monitoring costs as required by the closure permit.
Post-closure periods are performance-based and are not generally specified in terms of years in the closure permit, but generally
range from 10 to 30 years or more.
The Company records its non-landfill closure and post-closure liability by: (i) estimating the current cost of closing a non-
landfill facility and the post-closure care of that facility, if required, based upon the closure plan that the Company is required to
follow under its operating permit, or in the event the facility operates with a permit that does not contain a closure plan, based upon
legally enforceable closure commitments made by the Company to various government agencies; (ii) estimates as to when future
operations may cease; (iii) inflating the current cost estimates of closing the non-landfill facility using the inflation rate to the time
of closing; and (iv) discounting the future value back to the present using the credit-adjusted risk-free interest rate.
The estimates for non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities are inherently uncertain due to the possibility that permit and
regulatory requirements will change in the future, impacting the estimation of total costs and the timing of the expenditures.
Management reviews non-landfill closure and post-closure liabilities for changes to key assumptions that would impact the amount
of the recorded liabilities. Changes that would prompt management to revise a liability estimate include changes in legal
requirements that impact the Company's expected closure plan or scope of work, in the market price of a significant cost item, in
the estimate as to when future operations at a location might cease or in the expected timing of the costs. Changes in estimates for
non-landfill closure and post-closure events immediately impact the liability and the value of the corresponding asset. If a change is
made to a fully-amortized asset, the adjustment is charged immediately to expense. When a change in estimate relates to an asset
that has not been fully amortized, the adjustment to the asset recognized in income prospectively as a component of amortization.
Historically, changes to non-landfill closure and post-closure estimates have not been material.
55
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Remedial Liabilities
The balance of remedial liabilities at December 31, 2019 and 2018 was $114.2 million and $121.0 million, respectively.
Remedial liabilities, including Superfund liabilities, include the costs of removal or containment of contaminated material,
treatment of potentially contaminated groundwater and maintenance and monitoring costs necessary to comply with regulatory
requirements. Most of the Company's remedial liabilities relate to the active and inactive hazardous waste treatment and disposal
facilities which the Company acquired in the last 17 years and Superfund sites owned by third parties for which the Company, or
the prior owners of certain of the Company's facilities for which the Company may have certain indemnification obligations, have
been identified as potentially responsible parties ("PRPs") or potential PRPs. The Company's estimate of remedial liabilities
involves an analysis of such factors as: (i) the nature and extent of environmental contamination (if any); (ii) the terms of applicable
permits and agreements with regulatory authorities as to cleanup procedures and whether modifications to such permits and
agreements will likely need to be negotiated; (iii) the cost of performing anticipated cleanup activities based upon current
technology; and (iv) in the case of Superfund and other sites where other parties will also be responsible for a portion of the
cleanup costs, the likely allocation of such costs and the ability of such other parties to pay their share. The measurement of
remedial liabilities is reviewed at least quarterly and changes in estimates are recognized in the consolidated statements of
operations when identified.
The Company periodically evaluates potential remedial liabilities at sites that it owns or operates or to which the Company or
the sellers of the Chemical Services Division of Safety-Kleen ("CSD") assets (or the respective predecessors of the Company or
such sellers) transported or disposed of waste, including 130 Superfund sites as of December 31, 2019. The Company periodically
reviews and evaluates sites requiring remediation, including Superfund sites, giving consideration to the nature (i.e., owner,
operator, arranger, transporter or generator) and the extent (i.e., amount and nature of waste hauled to the location, number of years
of site operations or other relevant factors) of the Company's (or such sellers') alleged connection with the site, the extent (if any) to
which the Company believes it may have an obligation to indemnify cleanup costs in connection with the site, the regulatory
context surrounding the site, the accuracy and strength of evidence connecting the Company (or such sellers) to the location, the
number, connection and financial ability of other named and unnamed PRPs and the nature and estimated cost of the likely remedy.
Where the Company concludes that it is probable that a liability has been incurred and an amount can be estimated, a provision is
made, based upon management's judgment and prior experience of such estimated liability.
Remedial liabilities are inherently difficult to estimate. Estimating remedial liabilities requires that the existing environmental
contamination be understood. There are risks that the actual quantities of contaminants differ from the results of the site
investigation, and that contaminants exist that have not been identified by the site investigation. In addition, the amount of remedial
liabilities recorded is dependent on the remedial method selected. There is a risk that funds will be expended on a remedial solution
that is not successful, which could result in the Company incurring the additional incremental costs of an alternative solution. Such
estimates, which are subject to change, are subsequently revised if and when additional or new information becomes available.
Remedial liabilities are discounted when the timing of the payments is determinable and the amounts are estimable. In the
case of remedial liabilities assumed in connection with acquisitions, acquired liabilities are recorded at fair value as of the dates of
the acquisitions calculated by inflating costs in current dollars using an estimate of future inflation rates as of the respective
acquisition dates until the expected time of payment, and then discounting the amount of the payments to their present value using a
risk-free discount rate as of the acquisition dates. Discount rates used in the present value determination of the Company's remedial
liabilities range from 1.37% to 4.90%.
Self-Insurance Liabilities
The Company self-insures a significant portion of expected losses under its workers' compensation, employee medical,
comprehensive general liability and vehicle liability. Liabilities associated with these losses are recorded based on the Company's
estimates of the ultimate cost to settle incurred claims, both reported and not yet reported. These recorded liabilities are estimated
based on independent actuarial estimates and judgments which consider the frequency and settlement amount of historical claims
data.
Revenue Recognition
The Company generates service and product revenues through the following operating segments: Environmental Services and
Safety-Kleen. The Company recognizes revenue when control of the promised goods or services is transferred to the Company's
customers, in an amount that reflects the consideration the Company expects to be entitled to in exchange for those goods or
services.
56
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The majority of the Company’s revenues are for services, which are recognized based on time and materials incurred at
contractually agreed-upon rates. Product revenues are recognized when the products are delivered and control transfers to the
customer. The Company’s payment terms vary by the type and location of its customers and the products or services offered. The
periods between invoicing and when payments are due are not significant. For all periods presented, any amounts billed to
customers related to shipping and handling are classified as revenue and the Company's shipping and handling costs are included in
costs of revenues. In the course of operations, the Company collects sales tax and other excise taxes from its customers and
recognizes a current liability which is then relieved when the taxes are remitted to the appropriate government authorities. The
Company excludes sales and other excise taxes that it collects from customers from its revenues.
The Company's Environmental Services operating segment generally has the following four sources of revenue:
Technical Services—Technical Services revenues are generated from fees charged for waste material management and
disposal services including onsite environmental management services, collection and transportation, packaging, recycling,
treatment and disposal of waste. Revenue is primarily generated by short-term projects, most of which are governed by master
service agreements that are long-term in nature. These master service agreements are typically entered into with the Company's
larger customers and outline the pricing and legal frameworks for such arrangements. Services are provided based on purchase
orders or agreements with the customer and include prices based upon units of volume of waste, and transportation and other fees.
Collection and transportation revenues are recognized over time, as the customer receives and consumes the benefits of the services
as they are being performed and the Company has a right to payment for performance completed to date. The Company uses the
input method to recognize revenue over time, based on time and materials incurred. Revenues for treatment and disposal of waste
are recognized upon completion of treatment, final disposition in a landfill or incineration, or when the waste is shipped to a third
party for processing and disposal. The Company periodically enters into bundled arrangements for the collection and transportation
and disposal of waste. For such arrangements, transportation and disposal are considered distinct performance obligations and the
Company allocates revenue to each based on the relative standalone selling price (i.e. the estimated price that a customer would pay
for the services on a standalone basis). Revenues from waste that is not yet completely processed and disposed and the related costs
are deferred. The deferred revenues and costs are recognized when the related services are completed. The period between
collection and transportation and the final processing and disposal ranges depending on location of the customer, but generally is
measured in days.
Field and Emergency Response Services—Field Services revenues are generated from cleanup services at customer sites,
including municipalities and utilities, or other locations on a scheduled or emergency response basis. Services include confined
space entry for tank cleaning, site decontamination, large remediation projects, demolition, spill cleanup on land and water, railcar
cleaning, product recovery and transfer and vacuum services. Additional services include filtration and water treatment services.
Response services for environmental emergencies include any scale from man-made disasters such as oil spills, to natural disasters
such as hurricanes. These services are provided based on purchase orders or agreements with customers and include prices
generally based upon daily, hourly or job rates for equipment, materials and personnel. The Company recognizes revenue for these
services over time, as the customer receives and consumes the benefits of the service as they are being performed and the Company
has a right to payment for performance completed to date. The Company uses the input method to recognize revenue over time,
based on time and materials incurred. The duration of such services can be over a number of hours, several days or even months for
larger scale projects.
Industrial Services—Industrial Services revenues are generated from industrial and specialty services provided to refineries,
mines, upgraders, chemical plants, pulp and paper mills, manufacturing facilities, power generation facilities and other industrial
customers throughout North America. Services include in-plant cleaning and maintenance services, plant outage and turnaround
services, decoking and pigging, chemical cleaning, high and ultra-high pressure water cleaning, pipeline inspection and coating
services, large tank and surface impoundment cleaning, oilfield transport, daylighting, production services and directional boring
services supporting drilling, completion and production programs. Services are provided based on purchase orders or agreements
with the customer and include prices based upon daily, hourly or job rates for equipment, materials and personnel. The Company
recognizes revenue for these services over time, as the customer receives and consumes the benefits of the services as they are
being performed and the Company has a right to payment for performance completed to date. The Company uses the input method
to recognize revenue over time, based on time and materials incurred.
Oil, Gas and Lodging Services and Other—Oil, Gas and Lodging Services and Other is primarily comprised of revenues
generated from providing Oil and Gas Field Services that support upstream activities such as exploration and drilling for oil and gas
companies and Lodging Services to customers in Western Canada and Texas. The Company recognizes Oil and Gas Field Services
revenue over time, as the customer receives and consumes the benefits of the services as they are being performed and the
Company has a right to payment for performance completed to date. The Company uses the input method to recognize
57
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
revenue over time, based on time and materials incurred. Revenue for lodging accommodation services is recognized over time
based on passage of time.
The Company's Safety-Kleen operating segment generally has the following two sources of revenue:
Safety-Kleen Environmental Services—Safety-Kleen Environmental Services revenues are generated from providing parts
washer services, containerized waste handling and disposal services, oil collection services, vacuum services, direct sales of
blended oil products, and other complementary services and product sales. Containerized waste services consist of profiling,
collecting, transporting and recycling or disposing of a wide variety of waste. Other products and services include sale of
complementary supply products including automotive fluids and shop supplies and other environmental services. Parts washer
services include customer use of our parts washer equipment, cleaning and maintenance of the parts washer equipment and removal
and replacement of used cleaning fluids. Parts washer services are considered a single performance obligation due to the highly
integrated and interdependent nature of the arrangement. Revenue from parts washer services is recognized over the service interval
as the customer receives the benefit of the services. Collection and transportation revenues are recognized over time, as the
customer receives and consumes the benefits of the services as they are being performed and the Company has a right to payment
for performance completed to date. The Company uses the input method to recognize revenue over time, based on time and
materials incurred. Product revenue is recognized upon the transfer of control whereby control transfers when the products are
delivered to the customer.
Safety-Kleen Oil—Revenues from Safety-Kleen Oil, previously referred to as Kleen Performance Products, are generated
from sales of high-quality base and blended lubricating oils to third-party distributors, government agencies, fleets, railroads and
industrial customers. The business also sells recycled fuel oil to asphalt plants, industrial plants and pulp and paper companies. The
used oil is also processed into vacuum gas oil which can be further re-refined into lubricant base oils or sold directly into the
marine diesel oil fuel market. Revenue for oil products is recognized at a point in time, upon the transfer of control. Control
transfers when the products are delivered to the customer.
The Company adopted Accounting Standards Codification 606, Revenue from contracts with customers, on January 1, 2018
without adjusting prior period amounts. The only significant impact from the adoption of this standard related to incremental
disclosures now required. Upon adoption, a cumulative effect adjustment was not recorded.
Foreign Currency
The Company has international operations, substantially all of which are located in Canada. The functional currencies of
those operations are the local currency and therefore assets and liabilities of those foreign operations are translated to U.S. Dollars
at the exchange rate in effect at the balance sheet date and revenue and expenses at the average exchange rate for the period. Gains
and losses from the translation of the consolidated financial statements of foreign subsidiaries into U.S. Dollars are included in
stockholders' equity as a component of accumulated other comprehensive loss. Gains and losses from transactions not denominated
in the functional currency of an entity are recognized in the consolidated statements of operations. Recorded balances that are
denominated in a currency other than the functional currency are remeasured to the functional currency using the exchange rate at
the balance sheet date and gains or losses are recorded in the consolidated statements of operations.
Advertising Expense
Advertising costs are expensed as incurred. Advertising expense was $9.8 million in 2019, $10.5 million in 2018 and $11.8
million in 2017.
Stock-Based Compensation
Stock-based compensation cost is measured at the grant date based on the fair value of the award and is recognized as expense
over the requisite service period, which generally represents the vesting period. In addition, the Company issues awards with
performance targets established at the grant date. The expense for these awards is recognized over the requisite service period when
management believes it is probable those performance targets will be achieved. The fair value of the Company's grants are based on
the closing price of the Company's common stock on the respective dates of grant. Forfeitures are recognized as they occur.
Income Taxes
Current income tax expense approximates cash to be paid or refunded for taxes for the applicable period. Deferred tax
expense or benefit is the result of changes between deferred tax assets and liabilities. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are
58
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
determined based upon the temporary differences between the financial statement basis and tax basis of assets and liabilities as well
as from net operating loss and tax credit carryforwards as measured by the enacted tax rates which will be in effect when these
differences reverse. The effect of a change in tax rates on deferred tax assets and liabilities is generally recognized in income in the
period that includes the enactment date. The Company evaluates the recoverability of future tax deductions and credits and a
valuation allowance is established by tax jurisdiction when, based on an evaluation of both positive and negative objective
verifiable evidence, it is more likely than not that some portion or all of deferred tax assets will not be realized.
The Company recognizes and measures a tax benefit from uncertain tax positions when it is more likely than not that the tax
position will be sustained upon examination by the taxing authorities, based on the technical merits of the position. The Company
recognizes a liability for unrecognized tax benefits resulting from uncertain tax positions taken or expected to be taken in a tax
return. The Company adjusts these liabilities when its judgment changes as a result of the evaluation of new information not
previously available. Due to the complexity of some of these uncertainties, the ultimate resolution may result in a payment that is
materially different from the current estimate or future recognition of an unrecognized benefit. These differences will be reflected
as increases or decreases to income tax expense in the period in which they are determined.
The Company recognizes interest and penalties related to unrecognized tax benefits within the provision (benefit) for income
taxes line in the consolidated statements of operations. Accrued interest and penalties are included within the deferred taxes,
unrecognized tax benefits and other long-term liabilities line in the consolidated balance sheet.
Earnings per Share ("EPS")
Basic EPS is calculated by dividing net income by the weighted average number of common shares outstanding during the
period. Diluted EPS gives effect to all potentially dilutive common shares that were outstanding during the period.
Leases
The Company’s leases predominately relate to real estate and equipment such as vehicles and industrial equipment utilized in
operations as well as rail cars utilized in connection with the Company’s transportation needs. Contracts are reviewed at inception
to determine if the arrangement is a lease and, if so, whether it is an operating or finance lease. For all of its leases, the Company
has elected not to separate lease and nonlease components, such as common area maintenance.
The Company generally enters into real estate leases with five to ten-year terms and non-real estate leases with two to seven-
year terms. In the normal course of business, the Company also enters into short-term leases having terms of less than one-year.
These leases are generally equipment leases entered into for short periods of time (e.g. daily, weekly or monthly) to satisfy
immediate and/or short-term operational needs of the business which can arise based upon the nature of particular services
performed or seasonality factors. The Company has elected not to recognize right of use ("ROU") assets and lease liabilities for
these short-term leases. Expense for all such short-term leases is disclosed as short-term lease cost as shown in Note 19, "Leases."
Operating and finance leases with terms exceeding one year are recognized as ROU assets and lease liabilities and measured
based on the present value of the future lease payments over the lease term at commencement date. When applicable, the ROU
asset includes any lease payments made at or before the commencement date and initial direct costs incurred and is reduced by
lease incentives received under the lease agreement.
Certain of the Company's real estate leases contain escalating future lease payments. Escalating lease payments that are based
upon explicit amounts contained in the lease or an index (e.g., consumer price index) are included in its determination of future
lease payments to determine the ROU asset and lease liability recognized at the commencement date. Any differences in the future
lease payments from initial recognition are not anticipated to be material and will be recorded as variable lease cost in the period
incurred.  The variable lease cost will also include the Company’s portion of property tax, utilities and common area maintenance.
A significant portion of the Company’s real estate lease agreements include renewal periods at the Company’s option. The
Company includes these renewal periods in the lease term only when renewal is reasonably certain based upon facts and
circumstances specific to the lease and known by the Company. The Company uses its incremental borrowing rate on collateralized
debt based on the information available at the lease commencement date in determining the present value of future lease payments
as the implicit rate is typically not readily determinable.
59
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Recent Accounting Pronouncements
Standards implemented
In February 2016, the Financial Accounting Standards Board issued Accounting Standards Update 2016-02, Leases (Topic
842). The amendment increases transparency and comparability among organizations by recognizing lease assets and lease
liabilities on the balance sheet and disclosing key information about leasing arrangements. The Company adopted Topic 842 on
January 1, 2019 using the modified retrospective method of adoption. Prior period amounts have not been adjusted and continue to
be reported in accordance with the Company's historical accounting methodology pursuant to ASC 840, Leases. As permitted under
the transition guidance, the Company elected to apply the package of three practical expedients for all existing leases which, among
other things, allowed the Company to maintain the lease classification for all existing leases at the adoption date. The adoption of
Topic 842 resulted in the recognition of ROU assets of $185.5 million and total current and noncurrent lease liabilities of $188.5
million at adoption. Additionally, Topic 842 required new and expanded disclosures to enable users of financial statements to assess
the amount, timing and uncertainty of cash flows arising from leases. The standard did not have a material impact on the
consolidated statements of operations or cash flows.
(3) REVENUES
Disaggregation of Revenue
We disaggregate the Company’s third party revenues by geographic location and source of revenue as we believe these
categories depict how revenue and cash flows are affected by economic factors (in thousands):
  For the year ended December 31, 2019
  Environmental
Services Safety-Kleen  Corporate Total
Primary Geographical Markets     
United States  $ 1,721,322$ 1,220,096 $ (586)$ 2,940,832
Canada  371,041 98,595 1,722 471,358
Total third party revenues  $ 2,092,363$ 1,318,691 $ 1,136$ 3,412,190
     
Sources of Revenue (1)    
Technical Services  $ 1,120,043$ — $ — $ 1,120,043
Field and Emergency Response Services  340,906 — — 340,906
Industrial Services  514,390 — — 514,390
Oil, Gas and Lodging Services and Other  117,024 — 1,136 118,160
Safety-Kleen Environmental Services  — 851,520 — 851,520
Safety-Kleen Oil (2) — 467,171 — 467,171
Total third party revenues  $ 2,092,363$ 1,318,691 $ 1,136$ 3,412,190
60
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
  For the year ended December 31, 2018
  Environmental
Services  Safety-Kleen Corporate Total
Primary Geographical Markets     
United States  $ 1,598,402 $ 1,196,661$ 1,082$ 2,796,145
Canada  405,441 98,694 23 504,158
Total third party revenues  $ 2,003,843 $ 1,295,355$ 1,105$ 3,300,303
     
Sources of Revenue (1)    
Technical Services  $ 1,037,388 $ — $ — $ 1,037,388
Field and Emergency Response Services  304,727 — — 304,727
Industrial Services  541,895 — — 541,895
Oil, Gas and Lodging Services and Other  119,833 — 1,105 120,938
Safety-Kleen Environmental Services  — 795,077 — 795,077
Safety-Kleen Oil (2) — 500,278 — 500,278
Total third party revenues  $ 2,003,843 $ 1,295,355$ 1,105$ 3,300,303
_____________________
(1)All revenue except oil and oil product sales within Safety-Kleen Oil and product sales within Safety-Kleen Environmental
Services, which include various automotive related fluids, shop supplies and direct blended oil sales, are recognized over
time. Safety-Kleen Oil and Safety-Kleen Environmental Services product sales are recognized at a point in time.
(2)Safety-Kleen Oil was formerly known as Kleen Performance Products.
Contract Balances
(in thousands)  December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
Receivables  $ 644,738 $ 606,952
Contract assets (unbilled receivables)  56,326 54,794
Contract liabilities (deferred revenue)  73,370 61,843
The timing of revenue recognition, billings and cash collections results in billed accounts receivable, unbilled receivables
(contract assets) and customer advances and deposits or deferred revenue (contract liabilities) on the consolidated balance sheet.
Generally, billing occurs subsequent to revenue recognition, as a right to payment is not just subject to passage of time, resulting in
contract assets. Contract assets are generally classified as current. The Company sometimes receives advances or deposits from its
customers before revenue is recognized, resulting in contract liabilities. These assets and liabilities are reported on the consolidated
balance sheet on a contract-by-contract basis at the end of each reporting period. The contract liability balances at the beginning of
each period presented were generally fully recognized in the subsequent three-month period.
Variable Consideration
The nature of the Company's contracts give rise to certain types of variable consideration, including in limited cases volume
discounts. Accordingly, management establishes a revenue allowance to cover the estimated amounts of revenue that may need to
be credited to customers' accounts in future periods. The Company estimates the amount of variable consideration to include in the
estimated transaction price based on historical experience, anticipated performance and its best judgment at the time and to the
extent it is probable that a significant reversal of cumulative revenue recognized will not occur when the uncertainty associated
with the variable consideration is resolved.
Contract Costs
Contract costs include direct and incremental costs to obtain or fulfill a contract. The Company’s contract costs that are
subject to capitalization are comprised of costs associated with parts washer services and costs associated with the treatment and
disposal of waste. Parts washer costs include costs of solvent, commissions paid relating to revenue generated from parts washer
services, and transportation costs associated with transferring the product picked up from the services as it is returned to the
Company’s facilities or a third party site. Costs related to the treatment of waste include costs for waste receiving, drum movement
and storage, waste consolidation and transportation between facilities. Deferred costs associated with parts washer
61
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
services are amortized ratably over the average service interval, which ranges between four and 16 weeks. Deferred costs related to
treatment and disposal of waste are recognized when the corresponding waste is disposed of and are included in deferred costs
within total current assets in the Company’s consolidated balance sheets. The deferred contract cost balances at the beginning of
each period presented were fully recognized in cost of revenue in the subsequent three-month period.
(4) BUSINESS COMBINATIONS
2019 Acquisitions
On May 31, 2019, the Company acquired a privately-owned business for $14.8 million in cash consideration. The acquired
company expands the environmental services and hazardous materials management services of the Company and is included in the
Environmental Services segment. In connection with this acquisition, a preliminary goodwill amount of $7.4 million was
recognized.
On March 1, 2019, the Company acquired certain assets of a privately-owned business for $10.4 million. The acquired
business complements the Safety-Kleen segment's core service offerings, such as used motor oil collection, parts washers, oil filter
recycling and vacuum services. In connection with this acquisition, a preliminary goodwill amount of $5.2 million was recognized.
The results of operations of these acquired businesses were not material in 2019. Pro forma revenue and earnings amounts on
a combined basis as if these acquisitions had been completed on January 1, 2018 are immaterial to the consolidated financial
statements of the Company since that date.
2018 Acquisitions
On August 31, 2018, the Company acquired a privately-owned company which expands the environmental services and waste
oil capabilities of the Company for a $26.7 million purchase price, net of cash. The acquired company is included in the Safety-
Kleen and Environmental Services segments. In connection with this acquisition, a goodwill amount of $12.3 million was
recognized. The results of operations of this acquired business were not material in 2018.
On February 23, 2018, the Company completed the acquisition of the U.S. Industrial Cleaning Business of Veolia
Environmental Services North America LLC (the "Veolia Business"). The acquisition provides significant scale and industrial
services capabilities while increasing the size of the Company's existing U.S. Industrial Services business. The Company acquired
the Veolia Business for a purchase price of $124.5 million. The Veolia Business has been integrated into the Environmental
Services segment. The amount of revenue from the Veolia Business included in the Company's results of operations for the year
ended December 31, 2018 was $154.0 million. The amount of pre-tax loss from the Veolia Business included in the Company's
results of operations for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $0.9 million, which included $14.6 million in depreciation expense
as well as $0.6 million of amortization expense related to intangible assets. During the year ended December 31, 2018, the
Company incurred acquisition-related costs of approximately $1.4 million in connection with the transaction which are included in
selling, general and administrative expenses in the consolidated statements of operations.
The Company finalized purchase accounting for the Veolia Business in the first quarter of 2019. The components and
allocation of the purchase price for the Veolia Business consist of the following amounts (in thousands):
 Final Allocation
Accounts receivable, including unbilled receivable $ 39,558
Inventories and supplies 1,126
Prepaid expenses and other current assets 828
Property, plant and equipment 72,243
Permits and other intangibles 5,140
Current liabilities (18,372)
Closure and post-closure liabilities (354)
Total identifiable net assets 100,169
Goodwill 24,331
Total purchase price $ 124,500
62
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The weighted average amortization period for the intangibles acquired is 8.2 years. The excess of the total purchase price,
which includes the aggregate cash consideration paid in excess of the fair value of the tangible net assets and intangible assets
acquired, was recorded as goodwill. The goodwill recognized is attributable to the expected operating synergies and growth
potential that the Company expects to realize from this acquisition. Goodwill generated from the acquisition is deductible for tax
purposes.
Pro forma revenue and earnings amounts on a combined basis as if this acquisition had been completed on January 1, 2017
are immaterial to the consolidated financial statements of the Company since that date.
2017 Acquisitions
On July 14, 2017, the Company acquired Lonestar West Inc. ("Lonestar"), a public company headquartered in Alberta,
Canada, for CAD $41.8 million, ($33.1 million USD at acquisition date), net of cash acquired, which included an equity payout of
CAD $0.72 per share to Lonestar shareholders and the assumption of approximately CAD $21.3 million ($16.8 million USD at
acquisition date) in outstanding debt, which Clean Harbors subsequently repaid. The acquisition supports the Company's growth in
the daylighting and hydro excavation services markets. In addition to increasing the size of the Company's hydro vacuum fleet,
Lonestar's network of locations provides the Company with direct access to key geographic markets in both the United States and
Canada. The acquired company is included in the Environmental Services segment. In connection with this acquisition a goodwill
amount of $2.8 million was recognized.
On January 31, 2017, the Company acquired a privately held company for a purchase price of approximately $11.9 million in
cash, net of cash acquired. The acquired business produces and distributes oil products and therefore complements the Company's
closed loop model as it relates to the sale of its oil products. The acquired company is included in the Safety-Kleen segment. In
connection with this acquisition a goodwill amount of $5.0 million was recognized.
The combined amount of direct revenues from the acquisitions included in the Company's results of operations for the year
ended December 31, 2017 was approximately $14.5 million.
(5) DISPOSITION OF BUSINESS
On June 30, 2017, the Company completed the sale of its Transformer Services business, a non-core business within the
Environmental Services operating segment. The Transformer Services business was sold for $45.5 million ($43.4 million net of
$2.1 million in transactional related costs). As a result of the sale, the Company recognized a pre-tax gain of $30.7 million in gain
on sale of businesses in the Company’s consolidated statement of operations for the year ended December 31, 2017.
(6) INVENTORIES AND SUPPLIES
Inventories and supplies consisted of the following (in thousands):
 December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
Oil and oil related products $ 75,408 $ 70,823
Supplies and drums 115,128 104,609
Solvent and solutions 9,973 10,657
Other 14,235 13,390
Total inventories and supplies $ 214,744 $ 199,479
Supplies and drums consist primarily of drums and containers used in providing the Company's products and services as well
as critical spare parts to support the Company's incinerator and re-refinery operations. Other inventories consisted primarily of parts
washer components, cleaning fluids, absorbents and automotive fluids, such as windshield washer fluid and antifreeze.
63
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(7) PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
Property, plant and equipment consisted of the following (in thousands):
 December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
Land $ 131,023$ 123,734
Asset retirement costs (non-landfill) 15,924 15,148
Landfill assets 182,276 154,918
Buildings and improvements (1)499,159 440,188
Camp and lodging equipment 158,277 152,998
Vehicles (1)785,056 721,735
Equipment 1,779,366 1,697,490
Furniture and fixtures 6,054 5,453
Construction in progress 36,679 20,931
 3,593,814 3,332,595
Less - accumulated depreciation and amortization 2,005,663 1,770,617
Total property, plant and equipment, net $ 1,588,151$ 1,561,978
___________________________________
(1)December 31, 2019 balances inclusive of ROU assets classified as finance leases.
Depreciation expense, inclusive of landfill and finance lease amortization was $265.5 million, $264.3 million and $251.4
million for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
(8) GOODWILL AND OTHER INTANGIBLE ASSETS
The changes in goodwill for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 were as follows (in thousands):
 Environmental
Services Safety-Kleen Totals
Balance at January 1, 2018 $ 172,386$306,137$478,523
Increase from current period acquisitions 37,007 3,697 40,704
Measurement period adjustments from prior period acquisitions (78) — (78)
Decrease from disposition of business — — —
Foreign currency translation (2,296) (2,664) (4,960)
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 207,019$307,170$514,189
Increase from current period acquisitions 7,378 5,225 12,603
Measurement period adjustments from prior period acquisitions (2,675) (1,355) (4,030)
Foreign currency translation 809 1,442 2,251
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 212,531$312,482$525,013
The Company conducted its annual impairment test of goodwill as of December 31, 2019 and determined that no adjustment
to the carrying value of goodwill for any reporting unit was then necessary because the fair values of the reporting units exceeded
their respective carrying values. The fair value of all reporting units was determined using an income approach based upon
estimates of future discounted cash flows. The resulting estimates of fair value were validated through the consideration of other
factors such as the fair value of comparable companies to the reporting units and a reconciliation of the sum of all estimated fair
values of the reporting units to the Company’s overall market capitalization. In all cases, the estimated fair values of the reporting
units significantly exceeded the respective carrying values.
Significant judgments and unobservable inputs categorized as Level 3 in the fair value hierarchy are inherent in the
impairment tests performed and include assumptions about the amount and timing of expected future cash flows, growth rates, and
the determination of appropriate discount rates. Level 3 inputs are unobservable inputs for the asset or liability in which there is
little, if any, market activity for the asset or liability at the measurement date. The Company believes that the
64
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
assumptions used in its impairment tests are reasonable, but variations in any of the assumptions may result in different
measurements of fair values.
The impacts of any adverse business and market conditions which impact the overall performance of the Company's reporting
units will continue to be monitored. If the Company's reporting units do not achieve the financial performance that the Company
expects, it is possible that goodwill impairment charges may result. There can therefore be no assurance that future events will not
result in an impairment of goodwill.
As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the Company's finite-lived and indefinite-lived intangible assets consisted of the
following (in thousands):
 December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
 CostAccumulated
Amortization Net  CostAccumulated
Amortization Net
Permits $184,235$ 87,228$ 97,007 $177,583$ 79,358$ 98,225
Customer and supplier relationships 401,696 207,884 193,812 393,487 179,824 213,663
Other intangible assets 38,331 33,018 5,313 37,262 29,743 7,519
Total amortizable permits and other
intangible assets 624,262 328,130 296,132 608,332 288,925 319,407
Trademarks and trade names 122,934 — 122,934 122,468 — 122,468
Total permits and other intangible assets $747,196$328,130$419,066 $730,800$288,925$441,875
The Company regularly monitors and assesses whether events or changes in circumstances relative to the Company's business
might indicate that future cash flows attributable to the Company's asset groups may not be sufficient to recover the current value
of those assets. During the year ended and as of December 31, 2019, there were no events or changes in circumstances which
would indicate that the carrying values of the Company's asset groups would not be recoverable and thus no impairment charge was
recorded related to the Company's long-lived assets. If expectations of future cash flows were to decrease in the future as a result of
worse than expected or prolonged periods of depressed activity, future impairments may become evident.
Amortization expense of permits and other intangible assets for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 were
$35.2 million, $34.4 million and $37.0 million, respectively.
The expected amortization of the net carrying amount of finite-lived intangible assets at December 31, 2019 is as follows (in
thousands):
Years ending December 31,Expected
Amortization
2020 $ 33,083
2021 29,788
2022 29,534
2023 25,306
2024 23,921
Thereafter 154,500
 $ 296,132
65
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(9) ACCRUED EXPENSES
Accrued expenses consisted of the following (in thousands):
 December 31, 2019  December 31, 2018
Accrued insurance $ 74,376 $ 70,217
Accrued interest 21,222 3,930
Accrued compensation and benefits 72,473 77,881
Accrued income, real estate, sales and other taxes 35,749 25,670
Accrued other 72,720 55,707
 $ 276,540 $ 233,405
As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, accrued insurance included employee medical insurance costs of $14.3 million and $14.7
million, respectively, and accruals for losses under our workers' compensation, comprehensive general liability and vehicle liability
self-insurance programs of $59.4 million and $53.9 million, respectively.
The increase in accrued interest from the comparable period in 2018 is due to the timing of required interest payments which
changed due to the redemption of the 2021 unsecured senior notes and the issuance of the 2027 and 2029 unsecured senior notes.
For additional information relating to accrued interest, see Note 12, "Financing Arrangements."
The increase in accrued income, real estate, sales and other taxes from the comparable period in 2018 is due to an increase in
accrued federal tax of $10.5 million driven by higher taxable income and the timing of tax payments.
As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, accrued other includes a derivative liability of $20.8 million and $8.8 million,
respectively, related to the Company's cash flow hedges. The increase in the fair value of the derivative liability is mainly due to
changes in variable interest rates. For additional information relating to the derivative liability, see Note 12, "Financing
Arrangements."
(10) CLOSURE AND POST-CLOSURE LIABILITIES
The changes to closure and post-closure liabilities (also referred to as "asset retirement obligations") from January 1, 2018
through December 31, 2019 were as follows (in thousands):
 Landfill
Retirement
LiabilityNon-Landfill
Retirement
Liability  Total
Balance at January 1, 2018 $ 32,382$ 28,655 $ 61,037
Liabilities assumed in acquisitions — 685 685
New asset retirement obligations 2,518 — 2,518
Accretion 2,537 2,567 5,104
Changes in estimates recorded to consolidated statement of operations (37) 1,497 1,460
Changes in estimates recorded to consolidated balance sheet 1,867 64 1,931
Expenditures (1,224) (1,057) (2,281)
Currency translation and other (234) (289) (523)
Balance at December 31, 2018 37,809 32,122 69,931
Liabilities assumed in acquisitions — 220 220
New asset retirement obligations 2,705 — 2,705
Accretion 2,772 2,829 5,601
Changes in estimates recorded to consolidated statement of operations 248 2,437 2,685
Changes in estimates recorded to consolidated balance sheet 3,303 562 3,865
Expenditures (7,718) (2,121) (9,839)
Currency translation and other 282 201 483
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 39,401$ 36,250 $ 75,651
66
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
All of the landfill facilities reflected in the above table were active as of December 31, 2019 and 2018. The 2019 and 2018
environmental changes in estimates recorded to the consolidated statements of operations include $2.3 million and $1.2 million,
respectively, related to increased facility closure costs at one of our locations.
Anticipated payments (based on current estimated costs and anticipated timing of necessary regulatory approvals to
commence work on closure and post-closure activities) for each of the next five years and thereafter are as follows (in thousands):
Year ending December 31,  
2020 $ 7,571
2021 10,307
2022 14,407
2023 11,329
2024 3,344
Thereafter 277,001
Undiscounted closure and post-closure liabilities 323,959
Less: Discount at credit-adjusted risk-free rate (158,186)
Less: Undiscounted estimated closure and post-closure liabilities relating to airspace not yet consumed (90,122)
Present value of closure and post-closure liabilities $ 75,651
(11) REMEDIAL LIABILITIES
The changes to remedial liabilities from January 1, 2018 through December 31, 2019 were as follows (in thousands):
 Remedial
Liabilities for
Landfill SitesRemedial
Liabilities for
Inactive Sites Remedial
Liabilities
(Including
Superfund)
for
Non-Landfill
Operations Total
Balance at January 1, 2018 $ 1,800$ 65,342 $ 57,326$124,468
Accretion 86 2,745 1,871 4,702
Changes in estimates recorded to consolidated statement of operations (1) 130 558 687
Expenditures (47) (3,759) (4,028) (7,834)
Currency translation and other — 857 (1,863) (1,006)
Balance at December 31, 2018 1,838 65,315 53,864 121,017
Accretion 88 2,639 1,808 4,535
Changes in estimates recorded to consolidated statement of operations (17) (913) (2,087) (3,017)
Expenditures (59) (5,079) (3,724) (8,862)
Currency translation and other 1 29 470 500
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 1,851$ 61,991 $ 50,331$114,173
In 2019, the net reduction in the company’s remedial liabilities from changes in estimates recorded to the consolidated
statement of operations was $3.0 million and primarily related to reductions in estimates for remedial activities at five locations.
There were no significant (benefits) charges in 2018 resulting from changes in estimates for remedial liabilities.
67
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Anticipated payments at December 31, 2019 (based on current estimated costs and anticipated timing of necessary regulatory
approvals to commence work on remedial activities) for each of the next five years and thereafter were as follows (in thousands):
Year ending December 31,  
2020 $ 16,729
2021 17,883
2022 9,207
2023 7,930
2024 5,701
Thereafter 77,000
Undiscounted remedial liabilities 134,450
Less: Discount (20,277)
Total remedial liabilities $ 114,173
The following tables show, respectively, (i) the amounts of such estimated liabilities associated with the types of facilities and
sites involved and (ii) the amounts of such estimated liabilities associated with each facility or site which represents at least 5% of
the total and with all other facilities and sites as a group and as of December 31, 2019.
Estimates based on type of facility or site (in thousands, except percentages):
Type of Facility or  SiteRemedial
Liability  % of TotalReasonably
Possible
Additional
Liabilities (1)
Facilities now used in active conduct of the Company's business (39 facilities) $ 44,381 38.9%$ 10,691
Inactive facilities not now used in active conduct of the Company's business but
most of which were acquired because the assumption of remedial liabilities for
such facilities was part of the purchase price for the CSD assets (37 facilities) 61,991 54.3 10,658
Superfund sites owned by third parties (17 sites) 7,801 6.8 780
Total $ 114,173 100.0%$ 22,129
___________________________________
(1)Amounts represent the high end of the range of management's best estimate of the reasonably possible additional
liabilities.
68
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Estimates based on amount of potential liability (in thousands, except percentages):
Location Type of Facility or  Site  Remedial
Liability(1) % of TotalReasonably
Possible
Additional
Liabilities(2)
Baton Rouge, LA Closed incinerator and landfill  $ 22,690 19.9%$ 3,975
Bridgeport, NJ Closed incinerator  18,191 15.9 2,578
Mercier, Quebec Idled incinerator and legal proceedings  10,761 9.4 1,098
Linden, NJ Operating solvent recycling center  7,312 6.4 762
VariousAll other incinerators, landfills, wastewater treatment
facilities and service centers (72 facilities)  47,418 41.6 12,936
VariousSuperfund sites (each representing less than 5% of total
liabilities) owned by third parties (17 sites)  7,801 6.8 780
Total   $ 114,173 100.0%$ 22,129
_________________________________
(1)$18.4 million of the $114.2 million remedial liabilities include estimates related to the legal and administrative
proceedings discussed in Note 18, "Commitments and Contingencies," as well as other such estimated remedial liabilities.
(2)Amounts represent the high end of the range of management's best estimate of the reasonably possible additional
liabilities.
Revisions to remediation reserve requirements may result in upward or downward adjustments to income from operations in
any given period. The Company believes that its extensive experience in the environmental services business, as well as its
involvement with a large number of sites, provides a reasonable basis for estimating its aggregate liability. It is possible, however,
that future changes in available technology, regulatory or enforcement developments, the results of environmental studies or other
factors could necessitate the recording of additional liabilities or the revision of currently recorded liabilities that could be material.
Since the Company's satisfaction of the liabilities will occur over many years, the Company cannot reasonably predict the nature or
extent of possible future events or the impact that those events, if any, might have on the current estimates of remedial liabilities.
(12) FINANCING ARRANGEMENTS
The following table is a summary of the Company's financing arrangements (in thousands):
Current Obligations: December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
Senior secured Term Loan Agreement ("Term Loan Agreement") $ 7,535$ 7,535
  
Long-Term Obligations:  
Senior secured Term Loan Agreement due June 30, 2024 $ 727,162$ 734,697
Unsecured senior notes, at 4.875%, due July 15, 2027 ("2027 Notes") 545,000 —
Unsecured senior notes, at 5.125%, due July 15, 2029 ("2029 Notes") 300,000 —
Unsecured senior notes, at 5.125%, due June 1, 2021 ("2021 Notes") — 845,000
Long-term obligations, at par 1,572,162 1,579,697
Unamortized debt issuance costs and premium, net (18,046) (14,676)
Long-term obligations, at carrying value $ 1,554,116$ 1,565,021
Financing Activities
Unsecured Senior Notes. On July 2, 2019, the Company completed a private placement of $545.0 million aggregate principal
amount of 2027 Notes and $300.0 million aggregate principal amount of 2029 Notes (collectively, the "New Notes"). The 2027
Notes will mature on July 15, 2027, and the 2029 Notes will mature on July 15, 2029. Interest payments on each series of the New
Notes will be paid semiannually on January 15 and July 15, commencing on January 15, 2020.
69
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The Company may redeem all or any portion of the 2027 Notes prior to July 15, 2022 or the 2029 Notes prior to July 15,
2024 at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount redeemed plus a make whole premium as of the date of
redemption including accrued and unpaid interest, if any, up to the date of redemption. Additionally, prior to July 15, 2022 for the
2027 Notes and July 15, 2024 for the 2029 Notes, the Company may use cash proceeds of one or more equity offerings to redeem
up to 35% in aggregate principal of the 2027 Notes or the 2029 Notes at a redemption price equal to 104.875% or 105.125%,
respectively, plus accrued and unpaid interest thereon, if any, up to the date of redemption.
After the dates in the preceding paragraph, the Company may redeem all or any portion of the New Notes which remain
outstanding at any time upon proper notice at the following redemption prices if redeemed during the twelve-month period
commencing on July 15 of the years set forth below plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, up to the date of redemption:
2027 Notes
Year  Percentage
2022  102.438%
2023  101.219%
2024 and thereafter  100.000%
2029 Notes
Year  Percentage
2024  102.563%
2025  101.281%
2026 and thereafter  100.000%
Concurrently with the closing of the New Notes on July 2, 2019, the Company repurchased, using a portion of the net
proceeds from the sale of the New Notes, an aggregate principal amount of $701.0 million of the 2021 Notes. The total amount
paid in repurchasing the 2021 Notes was $706.2 million including $3.1 million of accrued interest. On July 17, 2019, the Company
redeemed the remaining $144.0 million outstanding 2021 Notes, including $0.9 million of accrued interest, using the remaining net
proceeds from the sale of the New Notes and available cash. In connection with this early repurchase and redemption of the 2021
Notes, the Company recorded a loss on early extinguishment of debt of $6.1 million during the year ended December 31, 2019.
With the repurchase and redemption of the 2021 Notes, none of the Company’s outstanding debt is registered under the Securities
Act of 1933, as amended.
The New Notes and the related indenture contain various customary non-financial covenants and are guaranteed by
substantially all of the Company’s current and future domestic subsidiaries. The New Notes are effectively subordinated to the
Company's Term Loan Agreement, revolving credit facility and finance lease obligations to the extent of the value of the assets
securing such secured indebtedness. The New Notes are effectively subordinated to all indebtedness and other liabilities of the
Company's subsidiaries that are not guarantors of the New Notes.
Senior Secured Term Loans. On April 17, 2018, the Company, and substantially all of the Company's domestic subsidiaries as
guarantors, entered into the first amendment (the “First Amendment”) of the Term Loan Agreement. The First Amendment reduced
the applicable interest rate margin for the Company’s term loans (the "Term Loans") outstanding under the Term Loan Agreement
by 25 basis points for both Eurocurrency borrowings and base rate borrowings. After giving effect to the repricing, the applicable
interest rate margins for the Term Loans are 1.75% for Eurocurrency borrowings and 0.75% for base rate borrowings.
On July 19, 2018, the Company, and substantially all of the Company’s domestic subsidiaries as guarantors, entered into an
Incremental Facility Amendment (the “Incremental Facility Amendment”) to the Company’s Term Loan Agreement. The
Incremental Facility Amendment increased the principal amount of the Term Loans outstanding under the Term Loan Agreement by
$350.0 million. The Term Loans under the Term Loan Agreement will mature on June 30, 2024 and may be prepaid at any time
without premium or penalty other than customary breakage costs with respect to Eurodollar based loans. The Company’s
obligations under the Term Loan Agreement are guaranteed by all of the Company’s domestic restricted subsidiaries and secured by
liens on substantially all of the assets of the Company and the guarantors. The effective annual interest rate of the Term Loans on
December 31, 2019 was 3.55%.
Concurrently with the closing on July 19, 2018 of the Incremental Facility Amendment, the Company repurchased $322.0
million aggregate principal of previously outstanding unsecured senior notes. The total amount paid to repurchases these notes
70
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
was $330.9 million inclusive of $7.9 million of accrued interest and $1.0 million of debt redemption fees. On August 1, 2018, the
Company redeemed the remaining $78.0 million of principal of the previously outstanding notes. In connection with this
redemption, the Company recorded a loss on early extinguishment of debt of $2.5 million during the year ended December 31,
2018.
As of December 31, 2019 and December 31, 2018, the estimated fair value of the Company’s outstanding long-term
obligations, including the current portion, was $1.6 billion. The Company’s estimates of the fair value of its long-term obligations,
including the current portion, are based on quoted market prices or other available market data which are considered Level 2
measures according to the fair value hierarchy. Level 2 utilizes quoted market prices in markets that are not active, broker or dealer
quotation, or alternative pricing sources with reasonable levels of price transparency for similar assets and liabilities.
Revolving Credit Facility. On November 1, 2016, the Company and one of the Company's subsidiaries (the "Canadian
Borrower") entered into an amended and restated credit agreement for the Company's revolving credit facility with Bank of
America, N.A. (“BofA”), as agent for the lenders under the facility (the "Agent"). Under the amended and restated facility, the
Company has the right to obtain revolving loans and letters of credit for a combined maximum of up to $300.0 million (with a sub-
limit of $250.0 million for letters of credit) and the Canadian Borrower has the right to obtain revolving loans and letters of credit
for a combined maximum of up to $100.0 million (with a $75.0 million sub-limit for letters of credit). Availability under the U.S.
line is subject to a borrowing base basically comprised of 85% of the eligible accounts receivable of the Company and its U.S.
subsidiaries plus 100% of cash deposited in a controlled account with the Agent, and availability under the Canadian line is subject
to a borrowing base basically comprised of 85% of the eligible accounts receivable of the Company’s Canadian subsidiaries plus
100% of cash deposited in a controlled account with the Agent’s Canadian affiliate. Subject to certain conditions, the facility will
expire on November 1, 2021. 
Borrowings under the revolving credit facility bear interest at a rate of, at the Company’s option, either (i) LIBOR plus an
applicable margin ranging from 1.25% to 1.50% per annum based primarily on the level of the Company’s average liquidity for the
most recent 30 day period or (ii) BofA’s base rate plus an applicable margin ranging from 0.25% to 0.50% per annum based
primarily on such average liquidity. There is also an unused line fee, calculated on the then unused portion of the lenders’ $400.0
million maximum commitments, ranging from 0.25% to 0.30% per annum of the unused commitment. For outstanding letters of
credit, the Company will pay to the lenders a fee equal to the then applicable LIBOR margin described above, and to the issuing
banks a standard fronting fee and customary fees and charges in connection with all amendments, extensions, draws and other
actions with respect to letters of credit.
The Company’s obligations under the revolving credit facility (including revolving loans and reimbursement obligations for
outstanding letters of credit) are guaranteed by substantially all of the Company’s U.S. subsidiaries and secured by a first lien on
the Company’s and its U.S. subsidiaries’ accounts receivable. The Canadian Borrower’s obligations under the facility are
guaranteed by substantially all of the Company’s Canadian subsidiaries and secured by a first lien on the accounts receivable of the
Canadian subsidiaries. 
The Company utilizes letters of credit primarily as security for financial assurance which it has been required to provide to
regulatory bodies for its hazardous waste facilities and which would be called only in the event that the Company fails to satisfy
closure, post-closure and other obligations under the permits issued by those regulatory bodies for such licensed facilities. On
August 1, 2018, the Company borrowed $50.0 million under the revolving credit facility in connection with the redemption of
$78.0 million of previously outstanding unsecured senior notes. The Company repaid the $50.0 million borrowing during the fourth
quarter of 2018. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the revolving credit facility had no outstanding loan balances, availability of
$229.2 million and $235.4 million, respectively, and outstanding letters of credit of $146.9 million and $130.1 million, respectively.
Cash Flow Hedges
The Company’s strategy to hedge against fluctuations in variable interest rates involves entering into interest rate derivative
agreements.
Although the interest rate on the Term Loans is variable, the Company has effectively fixed the interest rate on $350.0 million
principal outstanding by entering into interest rate swap agreements in 2018 with a notional amount of $350.0 million. Under the
terms of the interest rate swap agreements, the Company receives interest based on the 1-month LIBOR index and pays interest at a
weighted average rate of approximately 2.92%, resulting in an effective annual interest rate of approximately 4.67%. 
71
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The Company recognizes derivative instruments as either assets or liabilities on the consolidated balance sheet at fair value.
No ineffectiveness has been identified on these swaps and, therefore, the change in fair value is recorded in stockholders’ equity as
a component of accumulated other comprehensive loss. Amounts are reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into
interest expense on the consolidated statement of operations in the same period or periods during which the hedged transaction
affects earnings.
As of December 31, 2019 and December 31, 2018, the Company recorded a derivative liability with a fair value of $20.8
million and $8.8 million, respectively, within accrued expenses in connection with these cash flow hedges.
The fair value of the interest rate swaps is calculated using discounted cash flow valuation methodologies based upon the one-
month LIBOR yield curves that are observable at commonly quoted intervals for the full term of the interest rate swaps and as such
is considered a Level 2 measure according to the fair value hierarchy.
(13) INCOME TAXES
The domestic and foreign components of income before provision (benefit) for income taxes were as follows (in thousands):
 For the years ended December 31,
 2019  2018 2017
Domestic $ 156,571 $ 115,070$ 101,714
Foreign (8,332) (20,588) (43,025)
Total $ 148,239 $ 94,482$ 58,689
The provision (benefit) for income taxes consisted of the following (in thousands):
 For the years ended December 31,
 2019  2018  2017
Current:      
Federal $ 20,482 $ (7,677) $ 25,613
State 14,564 12,653 11,083
Foreign 7,448 4,781 4,589
 42,494 9,757 41,285
Deferred      
Federal 7,933 19,899 (85,488)
State 550 (1,205) 1,085
Foreign (478) 395 1,068
 8,005 19,089 (83,335)
Provision (benefit) for income taxes $ 50,499 $ 28,846 $ (42,050)
72
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The Company's effective tax rate for fiscal years 2019, 2018 and 2017 was 34.1%, 30.5% and (71.6)%, respectively. The
effective income tax rate varied from the amount computed using the statutory federal income tax rate as follows (in thousands):
 For the years ended December 31,
 2019  2018 2017
Tax expense at US statutory rate $ 31,130 $ 19,841$ 20,541
State income taxes, net of federal benefit 10,597 8,711 4,547
Foreign rate differential 276 (1,124) 3,733
Valuation allowance 4,459 10,466 16,552
Uncertain tax position interest and penalties 474 (1,806) 3,730
Tax credits (50) (9,799) —
Non-deductible compensation 1,922 1,813 256
Other 1,691 1,032 1,600
Adjustment for Tax Cuts and Jobs Act — (288) (93,009)
Provision (benefit) for income taxes $ 50,499 $ 28,846$ (42,050)
Due to the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the “Tax Act”) signed into law on December 22, 2017, the statutory rate in effect was 21%
in 2019 and 2018, compared to 35% in 2017.
For the year ended December 31, 2017, the Company calculated its best estimate of the impact of the Tax Act in its year-end
income tax provision in accordance with its understanding of the Tax Act and guidance available as of the date of the 2017 Form
10-K filing and as a result recorded a net benefit of $93.0 million as a component of the 2017 income tax expense. This provisional
net income tax benefit was comprised of a $100.5 million tax benefit for the remeasurement of deferred tax assets and liabilities to
the 21% rate at which they are expected to reverse, offset by a one-time tax expense on deemed repatriation of $7.5 million. This
one-time charge was after the utilization of $7.5 million of foreign tax credits which had full valuation allowances applied to them
previously.
During 2018, the Company completed its analysis of impacts of the Tax Act and specific to the one-time deemed repatriation,
adjusted the previous amount recorded of $7.5 million to $6.6 million resulting in a $0.9 million benefit to tax expense recorded in
2018. The Company also recorded the final remeasurement of its deferred tax assets and liabilities and adjusted the deferred tax
benefit from $100.5 million to $99.9 million or approximately $0.6 million of deferred expense recorded in 2018. The total net
impact of changes in tax law resulted in a net benefit of approximately $0.3 million in 2018.
During 2018, the Company also completed an analysis of certain federal manufacturing and research and development credit
benefits for tax years 2014 through 2017. Upon the filing of its 2017 tax return in October 2018, the Company recognized $3.3
million of tax benefits and recognized an additional $7.1 million upon the amendments of its 2014 through 2016 tax returns for a
net benefit recorded as a component of the 2018 tax provision of $9.8 million (shown as Tax credits in the table above).
During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company recorded $5.0 million of tax benefits related to tax deductible
foreign currency losses to accumulated other comprehensive loss and as such these benefits are not included within the provision
(benefit) for income taxes.
73
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The components of the total net deferred tax assets and liabilities as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 were as follows (in
thousands):
 2019 2018
Deferred tax assets:   
Provision for doubtful accounts $ 8,949$ 10,715
Closure, post-closure and remedial liabilities 26,960 28,380
Operating lease liabilities 40,879 —
Accrued expenses 17,602 15,686
Accrued compensation 7,155 7,774
Net operating loss carryforwards(1)50,824 43,284
Tax credit carryforwards(2)16,909 16,909
Uncertain tax positions accrued interest and federal benefit 4,176 519
Stock-based compensation 2,435 3,440
Other 10,418 7,067
Total deferred tax assets 186,307 133,774
Deferred tax liabilities:   
Property, plant and equipment (184,594) (164,246)
Operating lease right-of-use assets (40,985) —
Permits and other intangible assets (98,654) (103,539)
Prepaid expenses (9,694) (9,187)
Total deferred tax liabilities (333,927) (276,972)
Total net deferred tax liability before valuation allowance (147,620) (143,198)
Less valuation allowance (83,643) (79,295)
Net deferred tax liabilities $ (231,263)$ (222,493)
___________________________________
(1)As of December 31, 2019, the net operating loss carryforwards included (i) state net operating loss carryovers of $201.8
million which will begin to expire in 2020, (ii) federal net operating loss carryforwards of $25.5 million which will begin
to expire in 2025 and (iii) foreign net operating loss carryforwards of $145.0 million which will begin to expire in 2020.
(2)As of December 31, 2019, the foreign tax credit carryforwards of $16.6 million will expire between 2020 and 2024.
The Company has not accrued for any remaining undistributed foreign earnings. These amounts continue to be indefinitely
reinvested in foreign operations.
A valuation allowance is required to be established when, based on an evaluation of available evidence, it is more likely than
not that some portion or all of the deferred tax assets will not be realized. Accordingly, as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the
Company had a valuation allowance of $83.6 million and $79.3 million, respectively. The total allowance as of December 31, 2019
consisted of $16.5 million of foreign tax credits, $0.8 million of acquired federal net operating losses, $10.7 million of state net
operating loss carryforwards, $34.1 million of foreign net operating loss carryforwards, $14.9 million of deferred tax assets of a
Canadian subsidiary and $6.6 million of realized and unrealized capital losses. The allowance as of December 31, 2018 consisted of
$16.5 million of foreign tax credits, $0.8 million of acquired federal net operating losses, $9.6 million of state net operating loss
carryforwards and $22.7 million of foreign net operating loss carryforwards, $26.6 million of deferred tax assets of a Canadian
subsidiary and $3.1 million of unrealized capital losses.
74
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The changes to unrecognized tax benefits (excluding related penalties and interest) from January 1, 2017 through
December 31, 2019, were as follows (in thousands):
 2019  2018  2017
Unrecognized tax benefits as of January 1 $ 3,159 $ 5,121 $ 1,738
Additions to current year tax positions — — 1,457
(Reductions) additions to prior year tax positions 3,354 (625) 2,031
Expirations (209) (1,115) (231)
Foreign currency translation 110 (222) 126
Unrecognized tax benefits as of December 31 $ 6,414 $ 3,159 $ 5,121
At December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, the Company had recorded $6.4 million, $3.2 million and $5.1 million, respectively,
of unrecognized tax benefits that if recognized would affect the annual effective tax rate. The Company recorded $3.1 million of
unrecognized tax benefits for Canadian Revenue Agency transfer pricing adjustments for which relief from double taxation has
been requested. Therefore, an offsetting benefit of $3.1 million was also recorded resulting in no effect on the annual effective tax
rate.
At December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 the Company has accrued interest of $1.7 million, $0.8 million and $0.9 million,
respectively, relative to unrecognized tax benefits. Interest expense that is recorded as a tax expense against the liability for
unrecognized tax benefits for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 included interest and penalties of $0.9 million,
$(0.1) million and $0.5 million, respectively.
The Company files U.S. federal income tax returns as well as income tax returns in various states and foreign jurisdictions.
The Company’s tax years 2014-2016 are currently under review by the Internal Revenue Service (the “IRS”). The Company does
not believe the examination will result in material adjustments to previously filed returns. Additionally, any net operating losses that
were generated in prior years and utilized in these years may also be subject to examination by the IRS. The Company may also be
subject to examinations by state and local revenue authorities for calendar years 2014 through 2018. The Company has ongoing
U.S. state and local jurisdictional audits, as well as Canadian federal and provincial audits, all of which the Company believes will
not result in material liabilities.
Due to expiring statute of limitation periods and the resolution of tax audits, the Company believes that total unrecognized tax
benefits will decrease by approximately $0.2 million within the next 12 months.
(14) EARNINGS PER SHARE
The following are computations of basic and diluted earnings per share (in thousands, except for per share amounts):
 For the years ended December 31,
 2019  2018 2017
Numerator for basic and diluted earnings per share:     
Net income $ 97,740 $ 65,636$ 100,739
Denominator:     
  Weighted basic shares outstanding 55,845 56,148 57,072
  Dilutive effect of equity-based compensation awards 284 192 128
  Weighted dilutive shares outstanding 56,129 56,340 57,200
   
Basic earnings per share $ 1.75 $ 1.17$ 1.77
Diluted earnings per share $ 1.74 $ 1.16$ 1.76
For the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, all then outstanding performance awards and restricted stock awards
were included in the calculation of diluted earnings per share except for 122,785, 79,390 and 152,831 respectively, of performance
stock awards for which the performance criteria were not attained at the time and 16,304, 121,803 and 49,373 respectively, of
restricted stock awards and performance stock awards which were excluded as their inclusion would have an antidilutive effect.
75
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
(15) STOCKHOLDERS' EQUITY
The Company's board of directors has authorized the repurchase of up to $600.0 million of the Company's common stock.
The Company has funded and intends to continue to fund the repurchases through available cash resources. The repurchase
program authorizes the Company to purchase the Company's common stock on the open market or in privately negotiated
transactions periodically in a manner that complies with applicable U.S. securities laws. The number of shares purchased and the
timing of the purchases have depended and will depend on a number of factors including share price, cash required for future
business plans, trading volume and other conditions.  The Company has no obligation to repurchase stock under this program and
may suspend or terminate the repurchase program at any time. During the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, the
Company repurchased and retired a total of approximately 0.3 million, 0.8 million and 0.9 million shares, respectively, of the
Company's common stock for total costs of approximately $21.4 million, $45.1 million and $49.0 million, respectively. Through
December 31, 2019, the Company has repurchased and retired a total of approximately 5.9 million shares of its common stock for
approximately $315.3 million under this program. As of December 31, 2019, an additional $284.7 million remained available for
repurchase of shares under this program.
(16) ACCUMULATED OTHER COMPREHENSIVE LOSS
The changes in accumulated other comprehensive loss by component and related tax (loss) benefit for the years ended
December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 were as follows (in thousands):
 Foreign
Currency
Translation
AdjustmentsUnrealized
(Losses) Gains
on Available-
for-Sale
SecuritiesUnrealized
Loss on
Interest Rate
Hedge  Unfunded
Pension
Liability Total
Balance at January 1, 2017 $(212,211)$ (321)$ — $ (1,794)$(214,326)
Other comprehensive income before reclassifications 41,636 184 — 146 41,966
Amounts reclassified out of accumulated other
comprehensive loss — 222 — — 222
Tax loss — (231) — (38) (269)
Other comprehensive income 41,636 175 — 108 41,919
Balance at December 31, 2017 (170,575) (146) — (1,686) (172,407)
Other comprehensive (loss) income before
reclassifications (47,374) 182 (9,579) 124 (56,647)
Amounts reclassified out of accumulated other
comprehensive loss — — 806 — 806
Tax benefit (loss) 5,024 (105) — (42) 4,877
Other comprehensive (loss) income (42,350) 77 (8,773) 82 (50,964)
Balance at December 31, 2018 (212,925) (69) (8,773) (1,604) (223,371)
Other comprehensive income (loss) before
reclassifications 25,130 (70) (14,401) 60 10,719
Amounts reclassified out of accumulated other
comprehensive loss — 332 2,335 — 2,667
Tax loss — (50) — (16) (66)
Other comprehensive income (loss) 25,130 212 (12,066) 44 13,320
Balance at December 31, 2019 $(187,795)$ 143$(20,839) $ (1,560)$(210,051)
During the year ended December 31, 2018, the Company converted an intercompany loan with a foreign subsidiary to equity,
which resulted in losses for tax purposes. The loan had been historically treated as a component of the Company’s investment in
that subsidiary, and as a result, foreign currency gains and losses on the loan had been accumulated as a component of other
comprehensive (loss) income. The subsidiary continues to operate as part of the Company. The tax benefit of $5.0 million, which
was triggered by the conversion, was therefore allocated to other comprehensive (loss) income rather than net income.
76
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The amounts reclassified out of accumulated other comprehensive loss into the consolidated statement of operations, with
presentation location, during the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 were as follows (in thousands):
 For the years ended December 31,  
Other Comprehensive Income Components 2019 2018 2017 Location
Unrealized (losses) gains on available-for-
sale securities $ (332)$ —$ (222)Other income (expense), net
Unrealized loss on interest rate hedge (2,335) (806) — Interest expense, net of interest income
(17) STOCK-BASED COMPENSATION
Stock-Based Compensation
In 2010, the Company adopted an equity incentive plan (the "2010 Plan"), which provides for awards of up to 6,000,000
shares of common stock (subject to certain anti-dilution adjustments) in the form of (i) stock options, (ii) stock appreciation rights,
(iii) restricted stock, (iv) restricted stock units, and (v) certain other stock-based awards. The Company ceased issuing stock options
in 2008, and all awards issued to date under the 2010 Plan have been in the form of restricted stock awards and performance stock
awards as described below.
As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the Company had restricted stock awards and performance stock awards outstanding
under the 2010 Plan. The restricted stock awards generally vest over three to five years subject to continued employment. The
performance stock awards vest depending on the satisfaction of certain performance criteria and continued service conditions as
described below.
Total stock-based compensation cost charged to selling, general and administrative expenses for the years ended
December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 was $17.8 million, $16.8 million and $13.1 million, respectively. The total income tax benefit
recognized in the consolidated statements of operations from stock-based compensation was $3.1 million, $3.2 million and $3.7
million for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Restricted Stock Awards
The following table summarizes information about restricted stock awards for the year ended December 31, 2019:
Restricted StockNumber of
Shares  Weighted Average
Grant-Date
Fair Value
Unvested at January 1, 2019 657,240 $ 54.65
Granted 174,114 68.82
Vested (249,319) 53.99
Forfeited (59,438) 55.65
Unvested at December 31, 2019 522,597 $ 59.57
As of December 31, 2019, there was $20.6 million of total unrecognized compensation cost arising from restricted stock
awards. This cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted average period of 2.6 years. The total fair value of restricted stock
vested during 2019, 2018 and 2017 was $16.8 million, $10.8 million and $7.3 million, respectively.
Performance Stock Awards
The following table summarizes information about performance stock awards for the year ended December 31, 2019:
Performance StockNumber of
Shares  Weighted Average
Grant-Date
Fair Value
Unvested at January 1, 2019 213,490 $ 55.71
Granted 125,034 70.77
Vested (105,583) 55.68
Forfeited (28,388) 56.82
Unvested at December 31, 2019 204,553 $ 64.78
77
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
As of December 31, 2019, there was $2.8 million of total unrecognized compensation cost arising from performance stock
awards whereby the performance conditions had been met or were deemed probable of vesting. The total fair value of performance
awards vested during 2019, 2018 and 2017 was $8.1 million, $1.2 million and $3.0 million, respectively.
(18) COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Legal and Administrative Proceedings
The Company and its subsidiaries are subject to legal proceedings and claims arising in the ordinary course of business.
Actions filed against the Company arise from commercial and employment-related claims including alleged class actions related to
sales practices and wage and hour claims. The plaintiffs in these actions may be seeking damages or injunctive relief or both. These
actions are in various jurisdictions and stages of proceedings, and some are covered in part by insurance. In addition, the
Company’s waste management services operations are regulated by federal, state, provincial and local laws enacted to regulate
discharge of materials into the environment, remediation of contaminated soil and groundwater or otherwise protect the
environment. This ongoing regulation results in the Company frequently becoming a party to legal or administrative proceedings
involving all levels of government authorities and other interested parties. The issues involved in such proceedings generally relate
to alleged violations of existing permits and licenses or alleged responsibility under federal or state Superfund laws to remediate
contamination at properties owned either by the Company or by other parties (“third-party sites”) to which either the Company or
the prior owners of certain of the Company’s facilities shipped waste.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the Company had recorded reserves of $26.0 million and $25.4 million, respectively, for
actual or probable liabilities related to the legal and administrative proceedings in which the Company was then involved, the
principal of which are described below. In management's opinion, it is not reasonably possible that the potential liability beyond
what has been recorded, if any, that may result from these actions, either individually or collectively, will have a material effect on
our financial position, results of operations or cash flows. The Company periodically adjusts the aggregate amount of these reserves
when actual or probable liabilities are paid or otherwise discharged, new claims arise, or additional relevant information about
existing or probable claims becomes available. As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the $26.0 million and $25.4 million,
respectively, of reserves consisted of (i) $18.4 million and $17.9 million, respectively, related to pending legal or administrative
proceedings, including Superfund liabilities, which were included in remedial liabilities on the consolidated balance sheets, and
(ii) $7.6 million and $7.5 million, respectively, primarily related to federal, state and provincial enforcement actions, which were
included in accrued expenses on the consolidated balance sheets.
As of December 31, 2019, the principal legal and administrative proceedings in which the Company was involved, or which
had been terminated during 2019, were as follows:
Ville Mercier. In September 2002, the Company acquired the stock of a subsidiary (the "Mercier Subsidiary") which owns a
hazardous waste incinerator in Ville Mercier, Quebec (the "Mercier Facility"). The property adjacent to the Mercier Facility, which
is also owned by the Mercier Subsidiary, is now contaminated as a result of actions dating back to 1968, when the Government of
Quebec issued to a company unrelated to the Mercier Subsidiary two permits to dump organic liquids into lagoons on the property.
In 1999, Ville Mercier and three neighboring municipalities filed separate legal proceedings against the Mercier Subsidiary and the
Government of Quebec. In 2012, the municipalities amended their existing statement of claim to seek $2.9 million (CAD $) in
general damages and $10.0 million (CAD $) in punitive damages, plus interest and costs, as well as injunctive relief. Both the
Government of Quebec and the Company have filed summary judgment motions against the municipalities. The parties are
attempting to negotiate a resolution and hearings on the motions have been delayed. In September 2007, the Quebec Minister of
Sustainable Development, Environment and Parks issued a notice pursuant to Section 115.1 of the Environment Quality Act,
superseding notices issued in 1992, which are the subject of the pending litigation. The more recent notice notifies the Mercier
Subsidiary that, if the Mercier Subsidiary does not take certain remedial measures at the site, the Minister intends to undertake
those measures at the site and claim direct and indirect costs related to such measures. The Company has accrued for costs expected
to be incurred relative to the resolution of this matter and believes this matter will not have future material effect on its financial
position or results of operations.
Safety-Kleen Legal Proceedings. On December 28, 2012, the Company acquired Safety-Kleen, Inc. ("Safety-Kleen") and
thereby became subject to the legal proceedings in which Safety-Kleen was a party on that date. In addition to certain Superfund
proceedings in which Safety-Kleen has been named as a potentially responsible party as described below under “Superfund
Proceedings,” the principal such legal proceedings involving Safety-Kleen which were outstanding as of December 31, 2019 were
as follows:
Product Liability Cases. Safety-Kleen has been named as a defendant in various lawsuits that are currently pending in various
courts and jurisdictions throughout the United States, including approximately 55 proceedings (excluding cases which
78
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
have been settled but not formally dismissed) as of December 31, 2019, wherein persons claim personal injury resulting from the
use of Safety-Kleen's parts cleaning equipment or cleaning products. These proceedings typically involve allegations that the
solvent used in Safety-Kleen's parts cleaning equipment contains contaminants and/or that Safety-Kleen's recycling process does
not effectively remove the contaminants that become entrained in the solvent during their use. In addition, certain claimants assert
that Safety-Kleen failed to warn adequately the product user of potential risks, including a historic failure to warn that solvent
contains trace amounts of toxic or hazardous substances such as benzene.
The Company maintains insurance that it believes will provide coverage for these product liability claims (over amounts
accrued for self-insured retentions and deductibles in certain limited cases), except for punitive damages to the extent not insurable
under state law or excluded from insurance coverage. The Company also believes that these claims lack merit and has historically
vigorously defended, and intends to continue to vigorously defend, itself and the safety of its products against all of these claims.
Such matters are subject to many uncertainties and outcomes are not predictable with assurance. Consequently, The Company is
unable to ascertain the ultimate aggregate amount of monetary liability or financial impact with respect to these matters as of
December 31, 2019. From January 1, 2019 to December 31, 2019, 27 product liability claims were settled or dismissed. Due to the
nature of these claims and the related insurance, the Company did not incur any expense as insurance provided coverage in full for
all such claims. Safety-Kleen may be named in similar, additional lawsuits in the future, including claims for which insurance
coverage may not be available.      
Superfund Proceedings
The Company has been notified that either the Company (which, since December 28, 2012, includes Safety-Kleen) or the
prior owners of certain of the Company's facilities for which the Company may have certain indemnification obligations have been
identified as PRPs or potential PRPs in connection with 130 sites which are subject to or are proposed to become subject to
proceedings under federal or state Superfund laws. Of the 130 sites, five (including the BR Facility described below) involve
facilities that are now owned or leased by the Company and 125 involve third-party sites to which either the Company or the prior
owners of certain of the Company’s facilities shipped waste. Of the 125 third-party sites, 31 are now settled, 16 are currently
requiring expenditures on remediation and 78 are not currently requiring expenditures on remediation.
In connection with each site, the Company has estimated the extent, if any, to which it may be subject, either directly or as a
result of any indemnification obligations, for cleanup and remediation costs, related legal and consulting costs associated with PRP
investigations, settlements, and related legal and administrative proceedings. The amount of such actual and potential liability is
inherently difficult to estimate because of, among other relevant factors, uncertainties as to the legal liability (if any) of the
Company or the prior owners of certain of the Company's facilities to contribute a portion of the cleanup costs, the assumptions that
must be made in calculating the estimated cost and timing of remediation, the identification of other PRPs and their respective
capability and obligation to contribute to remediation efforts, and the existence and legal standing of indemnification agreements (if
any) with prior owners, which may either benefit the Company or subject the Company to potential indemnification obligations.
The Company believes its potential liability could exceed $100,000 at 10 of the 125 third-party sites.
BR Facility.    The Company acquired in 2002 a former hazardous waste incinerator and landfill in Baton Rouge (the "BR
Facility"), for which operations had been previously discontinued by the prior owner. In September 2007, the EPA issued a special
notice letter to the Company related to the Devil's Swamp Lake Site ("Devil's Swamp") in East Baton Rouge Parish, Louisiana.
Devil's Swamp includes a lake located downstream of an outfall ditch where wastewater and storm water have been discharged, and
Devil's Swamp is proposed to be included on the National Priorities List due to the presence of Contaminants of Concern ("COC")
cited by the EPA. These COCs include substances of the kind found in wastewater and storm water discharged from the BR Facility
in past operations. The EPA originally requested COC generators to submit a good faith offer to conduct a remedial investigation
feasibility study directed towards the eventual remediation of the site. In 2018 the Company completed performing corrective
actions at the BR Facility under an order issued by the Louisiana Department of Environmental Quality, and has also completed
conducting the remedial investigation and feasibility study for Devil's Swamp under an order issued by the EPA. The Company
cannot presently estimate the potential additional liability for the Devil's Swamp cleanup until a final remedy is selected by the EPA
with issuance of a Record of Decision.
Third-Party Sites.    Of the 125 third-party sites at which the Company has been notified it is a PRP or potential PRP or may
have indemnification obligations, Clean Harbors has an indemnification agreement at 11 of these sites with ChemWaste, a former
subsidiary of Waste Management, Inc., and at six additional of these third-party sites, Safety-Kleen has a similar indemnification
agreement with McKesson Corporation. These agreements indemnify the Company (which now includes Safety-Kleen) with
respect to any liability at the 17 sites for waste disposed prior to the Company's (or Safety-Kleen's) acquisition of the former
subsidiaries of Waste Management and McKesson which had shipped waste to those sites.
79
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Accordingly, Waste Management or McKesson are paying all costs of defending those subsidiaries in those 17 cases, including
legal fees and settlement costs. However, there can be no guarantee that the Company's ultimate liabilities for those sites will not
exceed the amount recorded or that indemnities applicable to any of these sites will be available to pay all or a portion of related
costs. Except for the indemnification agreements which the Company holds from ChemWaste, McKesson and two other entities,
the Company does not have an indemnity agreement with respect to any of the 125 third-party sites discussed above.
Federal, State and Provincial Enforcement Actions
From time to time, the Company pays fines or penalties in regulatory proceedings relating primarily to waste treatment,
storage or disposal facilities. As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, there were 12 and 10 proceedings, respectively, for which the
Company reasonably believes that the sanctions could equal or exceed $100,000. The Company believes that the fines or other
penalties in these or any of the other regulatory proceedings will, individually or in the aggregate, not have a material effect on its
financial condition, results of operations or cash flows.
Self-Insurance Liabilities
Under the Company's insurance programs, coverage is obtained for catastrophic exposures, as well as those risks required to
be insured by law or contract. The Company's policy is to retain a significant portion of certain expected losses related to workers'
compensation, employee medical, comprehensive general liability and vehicle liability. A portion of these self-insured liabilities are
managed through its wholly-owned captive insurance subsidiary.
Provisions for losses expected under these programs are recorded based upon the Company's estimates of the aggregate
liability for claims. The current deductible per participant per year for the employee medical insurance policy is $0.8 million. The
current deductible per occurrence for workers' compensation is $1.0 million, general liability is $2.0 million and vehicle liability is
$2.0 million. The retention per claim for the environmental impairment policy is $1.0 million. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, the
Company had accrued $59.4 million and $53.9 million, respectively, for its self-insurance liabilities (exclusive of employee
medical insurance) using a risk-free discount rate of 1.52% and 2.96%, respectively.
Anticipated payments for contingencies related to workers' compensation, comprehensive general liability and vehicle
liability related claims at December 31, 2019 for each of the next five years and thereafter were as follows (in thousands):
Years ending December 31,  
2020 $ 20,838
2021 12,675
2022 8,951
2023 6,097
2024 4,743
Thereafter 7,659
Undiscounted self-insurance liabilities 60,963
Less: Discount 1,570
Total self-insurance liabilities (included in accrued expenses) $ 59,393
(19) LEASES
As of December 31, 2019, the Company’s lease portfolio was predominately operating leases for real estate, vehicles and rail
cars. The Company presents operating lease balances separately on the consolidated balance sheet. The Company's finance leases
relate to certain buildings and equipment. The following table presents our finance lease balances and their classification on the
consolidated balance sheet as of December 31, 2019 (in thousands):
Finance Lease Balances (Classification) December  31, 2019
ROU assets (Property, plant and equipment, net) $ 32,307
Current portion of lease liabilities (Accrued expenses) 801
Long-term portion of lease liabilities (Deferred taxes, unrecognized tax benefits and other long-term
liabilities) 34,517
80
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
The Company’s lease expense was as follows (in thousands):
 For the year  ended
December  31, 2019
Operating lease cost $ 55,402
Finance lease cost:
Amortization of ROU assets 1,142
Interest on lease liabilities 1,415
Total finance lease cost 2,557
Short-term lease cost 84,749
Variable lease cost 6,702
Total lease cost $ 149,410
Other information related to leases was as follows:
Weighted Average Remaining Lease Term (years) December  31, 2019
Operating leases 5.1
Finance leases 21.3
Weighted Average Discount Rate
Operating leases 5.29%
Finance leases 4.97%
Supplemental Cash Flow Related Disclosur es (in thousands)For the year  ended
December  31, 2019
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities  
Operating cash flows from operating leases $ 56,240
Operating cash flows from finance leases 1,415
Financing cash flows from finance leases 586
ROU assets obtained in exchange for operating lease liabilities 17,699
ROU assets obtained in exchange for finance lease liabilities 33,449
At December 31, 2019, the Company's future lease payments under non-cancelable leases that have lease terms in excess of
one year were as follows (in thousands):
Years ending December  31,Operating
Leases  Finance
Leases
2020 $ 50,814 $ 2,733
2021 38,705 2,782
2022 31,052 2,836
2023 22,723 2,895
2024 15,787 2,825
Thereafter 28,444 51,151
Total future lease payments 187,525 65,222
Amount representing interest (25,526) (29,904)
Total lease liabilities $ 161,999 $ 35,318
At December 31, 2019, none of the Company's executed leases that had not yet commenced will create significant rights or
obligations in the future and its sublease transactions are not material. Additionally, the Company does not have any related party
leases, and there were no restrictions or covenants imposed by its leases.
81
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Disclosures related to relevant periods prior to adoption of Topic 842
The following is a summary of future minimum payments under operating leases that have initial or remaining non-cancelable
lease terms in excess of one year at December 31, 2018 (in thousands):
YearTotal
Operating
Leases
2019 $ 56,480
2020 45,467
2021 33,564
2022 24,509
2023 15,253
Thereafter 35,778
Total minimum lease payments $ 211,051
During the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, rent expense, including short-term rentals, was approximately $141.1
million and $125.4 million, respectively.
(20) SEGMENT REPORTING
Segment reporting is prepared on the same basis that the Company's chief executive officer, who is the Company's chief
operating decision maker, manages the business, makes operating decisions and assesses performance. The Company is managed
and reports as two operating segments; (i) the Environmental Services segment which consists of the Company’s historical
Technical Services, Industrial Services, Field Services and Oil, Gas and Lodging businesses, and (ii) the Safety-Kleen segment.
Third-party revenue is revenue billed to outside customers by a particular segment. Direct revenues is revenue allocated to the
segment providing the product or service. Intersegment revenues represent the sharing of third-party revenues among the segments
based on products and services provided by each segment as if the products and services were sold directly to the third-party. The
intersegment revenues are shown net. The operations not managed through the Company’s operating segments described above are
recorded as “Corporate Items.” 
The following tables reconcile third-party revenues to direct revenues for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017
(in thousands):
 For the year ended December 31, 2019
 Environmental
Services  Safety-Kleen Corporate
Items  Totals
Third-party revenues $2,092,363 $1,318,691 $ 1,136 $3,412,190
Intersegment revenues, net 140,577 (140,577) — —
Corporate Items, net 4,128 15 (4,143) —
Direct revenues $2,237,068 $1,178,129 $ (3,007) $3,412,190
 For the year ended December 31, 2018
 Environmental
Services  Safety-KleenCorporate
Items  Totals
Third-party revenues $2,003,843 $1,295,355 $ 1,105 $3,300,303
Intersegment revenues, net 134,104 (134,104) — —
Corporate Items, net 3,247 31 (3,278) —
Direct revenues $2,141,194 $1,161,282 $ (2,173) $3,300,303
82
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
 For the year ended December 31, 2017
 Environmental
Services  Safety-KleenCorporate
Items  Totals
Third-party revenues $1,728,700 $1,213,703 $ 2,575 $2,944,978
Intersegment revenues, net 125,822 (125,822) — —
Corporate Items, net 2,952 5 (2,957) —
Direct revenues $1,857,474 $1,087,886 $ (382) $2,944,978
The primary financial measure by which the Company evaluates the performance of its segments is Adjusted EBITDA, which
consists of net income plus accretion of environmental liabilities, depreciation and amortization, net interest expense, loss on early
extinguishment of debt and provision (benefit) for income taxes and excludes other gains, losses and non-cash charges not deemed
representative of fundamental segment results and other (income) expense, net. Transactions between the segments are accounted
for at the Company’s best estimate based on similar transactions with outside customers.
The following table presents Adjusted EBITDA information used by management by reported segment (in thousands):
 For the years ended December 31,
 2019 2018 2017
Adjusted EBITDA:    
Environmental Services $ 446,284$ 380,856$ 321,310
Safety-Kleen 282,378 282,029 249,811
Corporate Items (188,345) (171,880) (145,464)
Total 540,317 491,005 425,657
Reconciliation to Consolidated Statements of Operations:    
Accretion of environmental liabilities 10,136 9,806 9,460
Depreciation and amortization 300,725 298,625 288,422
Income from operations 229,456 182,574 127,775
Other (income) expense, net (2,897) 4,510 6,119
Loss on early extinguishment of debt 6,131 2,488 7,891
Gain on sale of businesses (687) — (30,732)
Interest expense, net of interest income 78,670 81,094 85,808
Income from operations before provision (benefit) for income taxes $ 148,239$ 94,482$ 58,689
The following table presents assets by reported segment and in the aggregate (in thousands):
 December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
Property, plant and equipment, net   
Environmental Services $ 939,352$ 951,867
Safety-Kleen 555,310 553,220
Corporate Items 93,489 56,891
Total property, plant and equipment, net $ 1,588,151$ 1,561,978
 
Goodwill and Permits and other intangibles, net   
Environmental Services   
Goodwill $ 212,531$ 207,019
Permits and other intangibles, net 89,722 93,313
Total Environmental Services 302,253 300,332
 
Safety-Kleen
Goodwill $ 312,482$ 307,170
Permits and other intangibles, net 329,344 348,562
Total Safety-Kleen 641,826 655,732
 
Total $ 944,079$ 956,064
83
Table of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS (Continued)
Geographic Information
As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the Company had property, plant and equipment, net of depreciation and amortization
and permits and other intangible assets, net of amortization in the following geographic locations (in thousands):
 December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
 Total % of Total Total  % of Total
Property, plant and equipment, net      
United States $1,273,205 80.2%$1,233,949 79.0%
Canada and other foreign 314,946 19.8 328,029 21.0
Total property, plant and equipment, net $1,588,151 100.0%$1,561,978 100.0%
     
Permits and other intangibles, net      
United States $ 372,609 88.9%$ 393,045 88.9%
Canada and other foreign 46,457 11.1 48,830 11.1
Total permits and other intangibles, net $ 419,066 100.0%$ 441,875 100.0%
The following table presents the total assets by geographical area (in thousands):
 December 31, 2019 December 31, 2018
United States $ 3,413,254$ 3,090,311
Canada and other foreign 695,650 648,010
Total $ 4,108,904$ 3,738,321
(21) QUARTERLY DATA (UNAUDITED)
(in thousands, except per share amounts)First
Quarter  Second
QuarterThird
Quarter  Fourth
Quarter
2019       
Total revenues $ 780,839 $ 868,678$ 891,668 $ 871,005
Cost of revenues (1)564,364 594,933 612,754 615,768
Income from operations 23,734 73,048 80,367 52,307
Other income (expense), net 2,983 (564) (427) 905
Net income (2)976 36,244 36,369 24,151
Basic earnings per share (3)0.02 0.65 0.65 0.43
Diluted earnings per share (3)0.02 0.65 0.65 0.43
(in thousands, except per share amounts)First
QuarterSecond
QuarterThird
Quarter  Fourth
Quarter
2018      
Total revenues $ 749,778$ 849,140$ 843,181 $ 858,204
Cost of revenues (1)546,425 583,584 580,685 594,857
Income from operations 10,991 64,353 65,745 41,485
Other (expense) income, net (299) 846 (996) (4,061)
Net (loss) income (2)(12,631) 30,747 31,089 16,431
Basic (loss) earnings per share (3)(0.22) 0.55 0.55 0.29
Diluted (loss) earnings per share (3)(0.22) 0.54 0.55 0.29
____________________________________
(1)Accretion of environmental liabilities and depreciation and amortization are shown separately on the consolidated
statements of operations.
(2)Net income in the third quarters of 2019 and 2018 included a $6.1 million and $2.5 million loss on early extinguishment of
debt, respectively.
(3)Earnings (loss) per share are computed independently for each of the quarters presented. Accordingly, the quarterly basic
and diluted earnings (loss) per share may not equal the total computed for the year.
84
Table Of Contents
CLEAN HARBORS, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
SCHEDULE II
VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
For the Three Years Ended December 31, 2019
(in thousands)
Allowance for Doubtful AccountsBalance
Beginning of
PeriodAdditions Charged to
Operating Expense Deductions from
Reserves (1)Balance
End of Period
2017 $ 15,046$ 7,901 $ 6,774$ 16,173
2018 16,173 15,817 5,622 26,368
2019 26,368 2,408 6,283 22,493
___________________________________
(1)     Amounts deemed uncollectible, net of recoveries.
Revenue Allowance(2)Balance
Beginning of
Period  Additions Charged to
RevenueDeductions from
Reserves  Balance
End of Period
2017 $ 14,203 $ 24,862$ 27,439 $ 11,626
2018 11,626 41,338 35,017 17,947
2019 17,947 35,549 37,278 16,218
___________________________________
(2)Due to the nature of the Company's businesses and the invoices that result from the services provided, customers may
withhold payments and attempt to renegotiate amounts invoiced. In addition, for some of the services provided, the
Company's invoices are based on quotes that can either generate credits or debits when the actual revenue amount is
known. Based on industry knowledge and historical trends, the Company records a revenue allowance accordingly. This
practice causes the volume of activity flowing through the revenue allowance during the year to be higher than the balance
at the end of the year. Increases in overall sales volumes and the expansion of the customer base in recent years have also
increased the volume of additions and deductions to the allowance during the year. The revenue allowance is intended to
cover the net amount of revenue adjustments that may need to be credited to customers' accounts in future periods.
Management determines the appropriate total revenue allowance by evaluating the following factors on a customer-by-
customer basis as well as on a consolidated level: trends in adjustments to previously billed amounts, existing economic
conditions and other information as deemed applicable. Revenue allowance estimates can differ materially from the actual
adjustments, but historically the revenue allowance has been sufficient to cover the net amount of the reserve adjustments
issued in subsequent reporting periods.
Valuation Allowance on Deferred Tax AssetsBalance
Beginning of
Period  Additions
Charged to Income
Tax ExpenseOther Changes
to Reserves  Balance
End of Period
2017 $ 55,189 $ 9,052$ 4,114 $ 68,355
2018 68,355 10,466 474 79,295
2019 79,295 4,459 (111) 83,643
85
Table Of Contents
ITEM 9.    CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
None.
ITEM 9A.    CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Based on an evaluation under the supervision and with the participation of our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer, as of the end of the period covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer have concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures (as defined under Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e) under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”)) were effective as of December 31, 2019 to ensure that
information required to be disclosed by us in reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed,
summarized and reported within the time periods specified in Securities and Exchange Commission rules and forms and is
accumulated and communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as
appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure.
Management's Annual Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
The Company's management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial
reporting, as that term is defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). Under the supervision and with the participation of the
Company's management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, the Company conducted an evaluation
of its internal control over financial reporting based on the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by
the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission.
The Company's management evaluated the effectiveness of Clean Harbors internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2019. Based on their evaluation under the framework in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013), the
Company's management concluded that the Company maintained effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2019 based on the criteria in the Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013).
Deloitte & Touche LLP, the independent registered public accounting firm that audited the Company's consolidated financial
statements, has issued an attestation report on the effectiveness of the Company's internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2019, which is included below in this Item 9A of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
There were no changes in the Company's internal control over financial reporting identified in connection with the evaluation
required by paragraph (d) of Exchange Act Rules 13a-15 or 15d-15 that was conducted during the quarter ended December 31,
2019 that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, the Company’s internal control over financial
reporting.
Limitations on the Effectiveness of Controls
The Company's management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, does not expect that the
Company's disclosure controls and procedures or the Company's internal control over financial reporting will prevent all errors and
all fraud.
A company's internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the
reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles. A company's internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that
(i) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of
the assets of the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of
financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the
company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide
reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company's
assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Further, the design of disclosure controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting must reflect the fact that
there are resource constraints, and the benefits of controls must be considered relative to their costs. Because of the inherent
limitations of controls and procedures and internal control over financial reporting, no evaluation of controls can provide absolute
assurance that all control issues and instances of fraud, if any, within the Company have been detected.
86
Table Of Contents
REPORT OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM
To the stockholders and the Board of Directors of Clean Harbors, Inc.
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the internal control over financial reporting of Clean Harbors, Inc. and subsidiaries (the “Company”) as of
December 31, 2019, based on criteria established in Internal Control - Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (COSO). In our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects,
effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on criteria established in Internal Control -
Integrated Framework (2013) issued by COSO.
We have also audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the consolidated financial statements as of and for the year ended December 31, 2019, of the Company and our report
dated February 26, 2020 expressed an unqualified opinion on those financial statements.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment
of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in the accompanying Management’s Annual Report on
Internal Control over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over
financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material
respects. Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a
material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed
risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a
reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ Deloitte & Touche LLP
Boston, Massachusetts
February 26, 2020
87
Table Of Contents
ITEM 9B.    OTHER INFORMATION
Not applicable.
PART III
Except for the information set forth below under Item 12 with respect to securities authorized for issuance under the
registrant's equity compensation plans, the information called for by Item 10 (Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate
Governance), Item 11 (Executive Compensation), Item 12 (Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and
Related Stockholder Matters), Item 13 (Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence) and Item 14
(Principal Accountant Fees and Services) is incorporated herein by reference to the registrant's definitive proxy statement for its
2020 annual meeting of shareholders, which definitive proxy statement will be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission
by April 22, 2020.
For the purpose of calculating the aggregate market value of the voting stock of the registrant held by non-affiliates as shown
on the cover page of this report, it has been assumed that the directors and executive officers of the registrant, as will be set forth in
the Company's definitive proxy statement for its 2020 annual meeting of shareholders, are the only affiliates of the registrant.
However, this should not be deemed to constitute an admission that all of such persons are, in fact, affiliates or that there are not
other persons who may be deemed affiliates of the registrant.
ITEM 12.    SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
In addition to the information about the security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management and related
stockholder matters which is incorporated herein by reference to the Company's definitive proxy statement for the Company's 2020
annual meeting of shareholders, the following table includes information as of December 31, 2019 regarding shares of common
stock authorized for issuance under the Company's equity compensation plan. The Company's shareholders previously approved
the plan.
Plan CategoryNumber of securities to
be issued upon exercise
of outstanding options
and rights(a)  Weighted average
exercise
price of outstanding
options and rights(b) Number of securities
remaining available
for future issuance
under equity
compensation plan
(excluding securities
reflected in column
(a))(c)
Equity compensation plan approved by security holders(1)— $ — 3,853,811
___________________________________________
(1)Includes the Company's 2010 Stock Incentive Plan (the "2010 Plan") under which there were on December 31, 2019 no
outstanding options but 3,853,811 shares were available for grant of stock options, stock appreciation rights, restricted
stock, restricted stock units and certain other stock-based awards. See Note 17, "Stock-Based Compensation," to the
Company's consolidated financial statements included in Item 8, "Financial Statements and Supplementary Data," in this
report.
88
Table Of Contents
PART IV
ITEM 15.    EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)   Documents Filed as a Part of this Report
  Page
1. Financial Statements:  
 Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 44
 Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 46
 Consolidated Statements of Operations for the Three Years Ended December 31, 2019 47
 Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the Three Years Ended December 31, 2019 48
 Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the Three Years Ended December 31, 2019 49
 Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity for the Three Years Ended December 31, 2019 50
 Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 51
2.Financial Statement Schedule:  
 Schedule II Valuation and Qualifying Accounts for the Three Years Ended December 31, 2019 85
All other schedules are omitted because they are not applicable, not required, or because the required information is included
in the financial statements or notes thereto.
3.Exhibits:   
The list of exhibits filed as part of this annual report on Form 10-K is set forth on the Exhibit Index immediately following
the signature page to this report, and such Exhibit Index is incorporated herein by reference.
Exhibits to this annual report on Form 10-K have been included only with the copies of the Form 10-K filed with the
Securities and Exchange Commission. Upon request to the Company and payment of a reasonable fee, copies of the individual
exhibits will be furnished. The Company undertakes to furnish to the Commission upon request copies of instruments (in addition
to the exhibits listed below) relating to the Company's acquisitions and long-term debt.
ITEM 16.    FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None
89
Table Of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused
this Form 10-K to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized on February 26, 2020.
 CLEAN HARBORS, INC.
 By: /s/ ALAN S. MCKIM
   Alan S. McKim
Chief Executive Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this Form 10-K has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature  Title  Date
/s/ ALAN S. MCKIM  Chairman, President and Chief Executive Of ficer  February 26, 2020
Alan S. McKim   
/s/ MICHAEL  L. BA TTLES  Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Of ficer  February 26, 2020
Michael L. Battles   
/s/ ERIC J. DUGAS  Senior Vice President, Finance and Chief Accounting Of ficer  February 26, 2020
Eric J. Dugas   
*  Director  February 26, 2020
Gene Banucci   
*  Director  February 26, 2020
Edward G. Galante   
*  Director  February 26, 2020
Rod Marlin   
*  Director  February 26, 2020
John T. Preston   
*  Director  February 26, 2020
Andrea Robertson   
*  Director  February 26, 2020
Thomas J. Shields   
*  Director  February 26, 2020
Lauren C. States   
*  Director  February 26, 2020
John R. Welch   
*  Director  February 26, 2020
Robert Willett   
*By: /s/ ALAN S. MCKIM  
  Alan S. McKim
Attorney-in-Fact
90
Table Of Contents
EXHIBIT INDEX
Item No. Description  Location
2.1
 Acquisition Agreement by and between Safety-Kleen Services, Inc., as Seller, and Clean
Harbors, Inc., as Purchaser, dated as of February 22, 2002  (1)
2.2
 First Amendment to Acquisition Agreement by and between Safety-Kleen Services, Inc., as
Seller, and Clean Harbors, Inc., as Purchaser, dated as of March 8, 2002  (2)
2.3
 Second Amendment to Acquisition Agreement by and between Safety-Kleen Services, Inc. as
Seller, and Clean Harbors, Inc. as Purchaser, dated as of April 30, 2002  (3)
2.4
 Third Amendment to Acquisition Agreement by and between Safety-Kleen Services, Inc., as
Seller, and Clean Harbors, Inc., as Purchaser, dated as of September 6, 2002  (4)
2.5
 Fourth Amendment to Acquisition Agreement by and between Safety-Kleen Services, Inc., as
Seller and Clean Harbors, Inc., as Purchaser, dated as of July 14, 2003  (5)
2.6
 Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of October 26, 2012 among Safety-Kleen, Inc., Clean
Harbors, Inc., and CH Merger Sub, Inc.  (6)
3.1A Restated Articles of Organization of Clean Harbors, Inc.  (7)
3.1B
 Articles of Amendment [as filed on May 9, 2011] to Restated Articles of Organization of Clean
Harbors  (8)
3.4D Amended and Restated By-Laws of Clean Harbors, Inc.  (9)
3.4E Description of rights of holders of Clean Harbors, Inc. common stock  (10)
4.34
 Fifth Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of November 1, 2016 among Clean
Harbors, Inc., as the U.S. Borrower, Clean Harbors Industrial Services Canada, Inc., as the
Canadian Borrower, Bank of America, N.A., as Administrative Agent, and the Lenders party
thereto  (11)
4.34B
 Amended and Restated Security Agreement (Canadian Domiciled Loan Parties) dated as of
November 1, 2016 among Clean Harbors Industrial Services Canada, Inc., as the Canadian
Borrower and a Grantor, the subsidiaries of Clean Harbors, Inc. listed on Annex A thereto or that
thereafter become a party thereto as Grantors, and Bank of America, N.A., as Agent  (11)
4.34C
 Amended and Restated Guarantee (U.S. Domiciled Loan Parties-U.S. Facility Obligations)
dated as of November 1, 2016 executed by the U.S. Domiciled Subsidiaries of Clean Harbors,
Inc. named therein in favor of Bank of America, N.A., as Agent for itself and the other U.S.
Facility Secured Parties  (11)
4.34D
 Amended and Restated Guarantee (Canadian Domiciled Loan Parties-Canadian Facility
Obligations) dated as of November 1, 2016 executed by the Canadian Domiciled Subsidiaries of
Clean Harbors, Inc. named therein in favor of Bank of America, N.A., as Agent for itself and the
other Canadian Facility Secured Parties  (11)
4.34E
 Amended and Restated Guarantee (U.S. Domiciled Loan Parties-Canadian Facility Obligations)
dated as of November 1, 2016 executed by Clean Harbors, Inc. and the U.S. Domiciled
Subsidiaries of Clean Harbors, Inc. named therein in favor of Bank of America, N.A., as Agent
for itself and the other Canadian Facility Secured Parties  (11)
4.34F
 First Amendment to Credit Agreement, dated as of June 30, 2017, by and among Clean Harbors,
Inc., Clean Harbors Industrial Services Canada, Inc., the other Loan Parties party thereto, certain
of the Lenders party thereto, which constitute the “Required Lenders”, and Bank of America,
N.A., as Administrative Agent  (12)
4.34G
 Second Amended and Restated Security Agreement (U.S. Domiciled Loan Parties) dated as of
June 30, 2017, among Clean Harbors, Inc., as the U.S. Borrower and a Grantor, the subsidiaries
of Clean Harbors, Inc. listed on Annex A thereto or that thereafter become a party thereto as
Grantors, and Bank of America, N.A., as Agent  (12)
4.34H
 Second Amendment to Credit Agreement, dated as of July 19, 2018, by and among Clean
Harbors, Inc., Clean Harbors Industrial Services Canada, the Other Loan Parties party thereto,
certain of the Lenders party thereto which constitute the “Required Lenders,” and Bank of
America, N.A., as Agent.  (13)
4.34I
 Third Amendment to Credit Agreement, dated as of July 2, 2019, by and among Clean Harbors,
Inc., Clean Harbors Industrial Services Canada, Inc., the Other Loan Parties party thereto,
certain of the Lenders party thereto which constitute the “Required Lenders,” and Bank of
America, N.A., as Agent  (14)
4.34J
 Fourth Amendment to Credit Agreement, dated as of February 20, 2020, by and among Clean
Harbors, Inc., Clean Harbors Industrial Services Canada, Inc., the Other Loan Parties party
thereto, certain of the Lenders party thereto which constitute the "Required Lenders," and Bank
of America, N.A., as Agent  Filed herewith
91
Table Of Contents
Item No. Description  Location
4.43
 Credit Agreement dated as of June 30, 2017, among the Financial Institutions party thereto, as
Lenders, Goldman Sachs Lending Partners LLC, as Administrative Agent and Collateral Agent,
Clean Harbors, Inc., as Borrower, and the Loan Guarantors from time to time party thereto  (12)
4.43A
 Security Agreement dated as of June 30, 2017, among Clean Harbors, Inc. and its subsidiaries
listed on Annex A thereto or that become a party thereto as the Grantors, and Goldman Sachs
Lending Partners LLC, as the Agent  (12)
4.43B
 First Amendment to Credit Agreement dated as of June 30, 2017, among the Financial
Institutions party thereto, as Lenders, Goldman Sachs Lending Partners LLC, as Administrative
Agent and Collateral Agent, Clean Harbors, Inc., as Borrower, and the Loan Guarantors from
time to time party thereto.  (15)
4.43C
 Incremental Facility Amendment dated July 19, 2018, to Credit Agreement dated as of June 30,
2017, among the Financial Institutions party thereto, as Lenders, Goldman Sachs Lending
Partners LLC, as Administrative Agent and Collateral Agent, Clean Harbors, Inc., as Borrower,
and the Loan Guarantors from time to time party thereto  (13)
4.44
 Intercreditor Agreement dated as of June 30, 2017, among Clean Harbors, Inc., and the
subsidiaries of Clean Harbors, Inc. listed on the signature pages thereto (together with any
subsidiary that becomes a party thereto after the date thereof), Bank of America, N.A., as the
Initial ABL Agent, and Goldman Sachs Lending Partners LLC, as agent under the Term Loan
Agreement  (12)
4.45
 Indenture dated as of July 2, 2019, among Clean Harbors, Inc., as Issuer, the subsidiaries of
Clean Harbors, Inc. named therein as Guarantors, and U.S. Bank National Association, as
Trustee  (14)
10.43* Key Employee Retention Plan  (16)
10.43A*
 Form of Severance Agreement under Key Employee Retention Plan with Confidentiality and
Non-Competition Agreement  (17)
10.52C*
 Clean Harbors, Inc. Management Incentive Plan [as amended and restated effective January 1,
2017]  (18)
10.54* Clean Harbors, Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan [as amended on May 10, 2010]  (19)
10.54A*
 Revised form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement [Non-Employee Director] [for use under
2010 Stock Incentive Plan]  (17)
10.54B*
 Revised form of Restricted Stock Award Agreement [Employee] [for use under Clean
Harbors, Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan]  (17)
10.54C*
 Revised form of Performance-Based Restricted Stock Award Agreement [for use under Clean
Harbors, Inc. 2010 Stock Incentive Plan]  (17)
10.54D* Amendment to Section 8 and 10(i) of the Company’s 2010 Stock Incentive Plan  (20)
10.56* Mike Battles accepted offer letter effective as of January 6, 2016  (21)
10.57* Clean Harbors, Inc. 2019 CEO Annual Incentive Bonus Plan  (22)
21 Subsidiaries  Filed herewith
23 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm  Filed herewith
24 Power of Attorney  Filed herewith
31.1 Rule 13a-14a/15d-14(a) Certification of the CEO Alan S. McKim  Filed herewith
31.2 Rule 13a-14a/15d-14(a) Certification of the CFO Michael L. Battles  Filed herewith
32 Section 1350 Certifications  Filed herewith
101
 The following materials from the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year
ended December 31, 2019, formatted in iXBRL (Inline eXtensible Business Reporting
Language): (i) Consolidated Balance Sheets, (ii) Consolidated Statements of Operations, (iii)
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income, (iv) Consolidated Statements of Cash
Flows, (v) Consolidated Statements of Stockholders' Equity and (vi) Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements, tagged as blocks of text  (23)
104
 Cover page from the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
December 31, 2019, formatted in iXBRL and contained in Exhibit 101.   
_______________________________________________
* A “management contract or compensatory plan or arrangement” filed as an exhibit to this report pursuant to Item 15(a)(3)
of Form 10-K.
92
Table Of Contents
(1) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on February 28,
2002.
(2) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 10-K Annual Report for the Year
ended December 31, 2001.
(3) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 10-Q Quarterly Report for the
Quarterly Period ended March 31, 2002.
(4) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on September 25,
2002.
(5) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 10-Q Quarterly Report for the
Quarterly Period ended June 30, 2003.
(6) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on October 31, 2012.
(7) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on May 19, 2005.
(8) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on May 12, 2011.
(9) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on December 22,
2014.
(10) Incorporated by reference to prospectus supplement dated November 28, 2012 filed on November 28, 2012 under the
Company’s Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-185141).
(11) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on November 2,
2016.
(12) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company’s 8-K Report filed on June 30, 2017.
(13) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Report on Form 8-K filed on July 20, 2018.
(14) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on July 3, 2019.
(15) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company’s Form 8-K Report filed on April 17, 2018.
(16) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company’s Form 10-Q Quarterly Report for the
quarterly period ended March 31, 1999.
(17) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 10-K Annual Report for the Year
ended December 31, 2010.
(18) Incorporated by reference to Appendix B to the Company’s definitive proxy statement for its 2017 annual meeting of
shareholders filed on April 26, 2017.
(19) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company’s Form 8-K Report filed on May 14, 2010.
(20) Incorporated by reference to Appendix B to the Company’s definitive proxy statement for its annual meeting of
shareholders filed on March 22, 2013.
(21) Incorporated by reference to the similarly numbered exhibit to the Company's Form 8-K Report filed on January 11, 2016.
(22) Incorporated by reference to Appendix A to the Company’s definitive proxy statement for its 2019 annual meeting of
shareholders filed on April 24, 2019.
(23) These interactive data files are furnished herewith and deemed not filed or part of a registration statement or prospectus
for purposes of Sections 11 or 12 of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, are deemed not filed for
93
Table Of Contents
purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and otherwise are not subject to liability
under those sections.
94
